CHAPTER I.
Passion! thou chainless fury! to what depths
Of dire perdition, dost thou drive the man
Who gives thee entertainment!
Sedley
.
I know not whether any philosopher has
ever made the observation, that, the heart which
is the most susceptible of gratitude, is also
the most readily excited to revenge. But
it is a truth which, for its confirmation,
requires
not the testimony of philosophers. It
has human nature for its foundation, and
experience
for its support. Indeed it is
reasonable
to suppose that he who is very sensible of
kindness will be equally so of injuries. Both
feelings spring from the same source, acuteness
of sensation. Hence the frequent saying in
relation
to a man of sensibility, that he is either a very
warm friend, or a very bitter enemy. There are
indeed exceptions. But to what rule is there
not? There may be, nay, there actually are,
kind and amiable people whose sensibilities are
altogether on the side of good nature. But
these are generally tame and inefficient beings,
who are either devoid of sagacity to see when
they are injured, or destitute of courage to
show resentment.
Such was not Adam Balantyne, the worthy
and able master of a classical academy, which,
sixty years ago, flourished near the village of
Dilworth on the banks of the Brandywine.
Balantyne was a man of sensibilities almost
morbidly acute. He was kind, benevolent,
and rigidly honourable. The poor and
oppressed
always shared his aid and commanded
his sympathy, while the splendid and the
haughty, were the objects of his aversion or
contempt.
Balantyne was a native of Scotland, and
descended
of a respectable family which had long
flourished in the neighbourhood of Kilmarnock,
in Ayrshire. Being a younger son, he knew
from his earliest days, that on his own
exertions
alone must he depend for subsistence.
He, therefore, industriously availed himself of
the opportunity which his father afforded him,
of acquiring a good classical education, and in
due time entered the University of Glasgow,
with the view of becoming a minister of the
Scottish church.
Possessing all the characteristic good sense
and industrious habits of his countrymen,
Balantyne's
progress in learning, and his correctness
B 2
of deportment while at college, were all
that his friends could wish, and afforded
promising
omens of his future comfort and
respectability
in life. His studies, however, were
chiefly of that theological and mathematical
description
,
which tends more to store the mind
with abstract knowledge, and strengthen the
moral and religious feelings, than to enlarge
the understanding, impart experience of the
world, or refine the taste and polish the
manners
.
In short, although not exactly qualified
to shine in a world where showy talents and
bustling accomplishments, rather than strict
integrity and solid acquirements, are the
instruments
of success, he was well fitted for the quiet
and useful profession he had chosen; and had
the fairest prospects of passing a contented and
happy life as the venerated pastor of some
peaceful congregation in his native land.
But destiny had otherwise ordered it; for
according
to his own frequent and forcible saying:
Let a man do what he will,
Fortune will be fortune still.
The first thing that seriously disturbed the
mind of Balantyne, and produced any agitation
in the even tenor of his course, was that feeling
which almost invariably creates the earliest
important commotion in the lives of men,
namely, love. From the same feeling also
proceeded all the untoward events which
embittered
his latter days. Yet, Oh! love
thou divine, but mysterious passion! let me not
do injustice to thee! If to Balantyne thou wert
the cause of long and acute suffering, thou wert
also the source of unspeakable joys. Thou
gavest to his arms, in holy wedlock, a being
on whom he doated almost to sinfulness, for
he adored her as, his conscience often told him,
his Maker alone should be adored, with the
whole intensity of his heartthe whole energy
of his soul.
This beloved being was a native of
Perthshire
,
and had come to Glasgow, where she
had some affluent relations, for the
completion
of her education. Balantyne was in the
last year of his studentship, when he became
acquainted with her. The susceptibility of his
feelings has been already mentioned. The
impression
made upon them by the charms of
Mary Stuart, for that was the name of the
lovely one of whom we are speaking, were
never, while life lasted, to be effaced. He
wooed her affections, and he gained them. But
their marriage was, for the present, opposed
by her father. In about two years, however,
Balantyne had the good fortune to receive a
call to the ministry of a very respectable
congregation
at Crieff, in the vicinity of the
residence
of his beloved, whom shortly after his
ordination, he had the happiness of making
his own.
The felicity of our young clergyman
continued
uninterrupted for nearly three years, in
which time he was made the delighted father
of a blooming daughter, the perfect image of
her mother. But then there came a blighta
cruel, incurable blight, upon the too exquisite
happiness of the sensitive Balantyne. The
charms of his young and lovely wife, had
attracted
the attention and awakened the
licentious
passions of a gay officer of a band of
military stationed at Crieff, who immediately
formed the resolution, in despite of all
consequences
,
to gain her over to his wishes. Her
virtue, however, prevailed against his arts; and
he was foiled in every attempt to seduce her
affections. But aware of the sensitive feelings
of her husband, she was unwilling to inflict
upon them a wound so severe as she knew would
follow a disclosure of the unhallowed attempts
that had been made upon her fidelity. She
concealed them, therefore, in her own breast,
at the same time taking every precaution to
avoid giving the officer an opportunity of
repeating
his insults. But lieutenant Hazelton,
was too deeply enamoured, and too slightly
imbued with either moral or honourable
principles
,
to be deterred from his pursuit by the
proofs he had received of her inflexible virtue.
He soon discovered that she had not apprised
her husband of his conduct. From this
circumstance
,
he augured favourably of his final
success
.
He now determined to ingratiate
himself
into Balantyne's good opinion, by affecting
seriousness and piety. The unsuspecting
clergyman
thought him sincere, and admitted him
to his intimacy.
Mrs. Balantyne herself began to be less
alarmed at his presence. He had by letter
assured her that he exceedingly regretted his
behaviour towards her; and she believed it
possible that he might be really sincere in his
professions of reform. Still she entertained
sufficient doubts to render her vigilant and
guarded against any renewal of his misconduct.
Her reserve but inflamed his desires. His
impatience became too strong for restraint; and
he, at length, since he found artifice ineffectual,
began to meditate violence. For this purpose,
he secretly watched her movements, followed
her in her walks, and even lay in wait around
her dwelling, to discover when she might be
solitary, and unprotected by her husband or
domestics.
Alas! that wickedness should ever triumph!
But such is the ordination of Providence. It
is to us mysterious that it should be so. But
we have only imperfect conceptions of the final
result of things. With such conceptions we
cannot but feel troubled when the wicked
succeed
in guilt, and are permitted, for the
gratification
of their criminal purposes, to destroy
the happines of the innocent. If, in our trouble,
we should grieve at the existence of undeserved
calamity, we trust that the limited conceptions
with which the Dispenser of all gifts, has
endowed
us, will be admitted in extenuation. It is
surely natural to deplore whatever appears to us
unmerited evil, although it be presumptuous and
sinful to doubt that it tends to a just and
beneficent
end.
The unrelenting wolf seized the lamb by
surprise, when the shepherd was away, and the
fold unguarded. Mr. Balantyne was absent on
professional business. He had but two men
servants, who were both gone on some distant
duty. A female servant alone remained at
home with her mistress. Lieutenant Hazelton
found means to attach this girl to his interest.
The opportunity was tempting. He embraced
it. At his approach, the girl withdrew from
the house, and left her mistress to receive him
alone, which she did with dignified but
constrained
composure.
My dear madam, said he, excuse my
bold intrusion at this happy moment. I have
been so long banished from your society that I
have on this occasion, resolved to encounter all
hazards to be alone with you, if but for an
instant
,
that I may ascertain whether there be no
possibility of softening your feelings towards
me.
Do you mean, Sir, she replied, to
repeat
your former insults? If so, I shall be
obliged to call my servant to my protection,
and have your base conduct exposed to the
world.
Your servant, he observed, pointing to a
window which looked into a lawn of
considerable
extent, you perceive is beyond your
hearing. Your husband and your other
domestics
,
I know, are all at a distance, and cannot
interrupt our interview. Be patient, therefore,
while I say that my passion for you is as ardent
as ever.
Lieutenant Hazelton, said she, do you
not consider this conduct dishonourable? Your
intrusion, under the circumstances you
describe
,
is mean, and may, in the eyes of an
ill-judging
world, be injurious to my reputation.
I beseech you, therefore, if you have any
regard
whatever for my welfare, to show it by
immediately departing from this house.
What! he exclaimed, shall I forego an
opportunity of happiness like this! No, by
heavens, loveliest of women, you know not
the extent of my passion, nor the terrible
lengths to which it is capable of driving me,
or you would not ask it. Oh! resist me not
rather sooth, and molify, and quiet the
burning
that is within methe flames enkindled by
thy beauty, or I shall become distracted
frantic
madunfit
to answer for my conduct.
Oh! drive me not to violence!
Seeing determination in his countenance, as
well as fury in his words, she was seized with
despair; she grasped a kitchen knife which lay
on a table near her. But she was irresolute to
use it, and he soon wrested it from her. The
scene became appalling. I shall cease the
description
.
A terrible crime was perpetrated,
and the happiness of Mr. Balantyne in this
world had terminated for ever. He returned
to receive the heart-rending account of the fatal
calamity from the pale and trembling lips of a
dying wife. She breathed her last in his
embrace
.
He took his infant daughter in his
arms. He laid her beside her dead mother.
The child placed its little hand gently on the
cheek now insensible to its pressure. The
father thought of the murderous worker of that
terrible changethe spirit of revenge seized
his whole soul. The meekness of the
Christian
the
forbearance and the magnanimity of
the clergyman were forgottenthe feelings of
the man, the lover, the husbandthe outraged,
the bereavedthe cruelly bereaved husband,
raged furiously in his bosom, and triumphed
over wisdom, patience and Christian duty.
The destiny of Balantyne was changed, and so
seemed his nature. He imprinted one long
kiss on the lips of his wife and child. He then
hastened to a closet, whence he took two
pistols
,
and loaded them. He then wrote as
follows
to his father-in-law.
I go in search of vengeance or of death.
Either or both will be welcome. Take care of
my child!
He proceeded to the quarters of Hazelton.
He was not there. But he told the tale of his
grief, and the intention of his visit, to another
officer, whom he requested to convey a
challenge
to the murderer. The officer readily
undertook
the task, expressing his admiration of
the courageous magnanimity of the clergyman
who sought satisfaction in this chivalrous
manner
,
rather than, by bringing the criminal to the
bar of justice, reduce him to the disgrace, which
he justly deserved, of dying as a felon.
Haste to the murderer, cried Balantyne.
Bring him to my presence. No hand but
mine must inflict upon him the vengeance
for which the spirit of my murdered saint so
loudly calls. Oh! I burn for justice! The
operations of the law would be too slow to allay
the fever of revenge that glows within me, and
agonizes my whole frame!
I admire your energy and your courage
Speak not of my courage! exclaimed
C
Balantyne, impatiently interrupting the officer.
I have none, for death will be welcome to
me. Only let me destroy the fiend who has
murdered my beloved, and I shall even be glad
to receive death at his hands, that my fate
may be like hers. Haste on thy errand, if ye
have any compassion for my wretchedness.
The villain shall meet you, said the
officer
,
and that, too, immediately. If he refuse,
I will brand him as a coward, spit in his face,
and drag him by the hair into your presence.
In about fifteen minutes the meeting took
place. The culprit approached the injured
husband, pale, trembling and conscience-struck.
Until informed by the officer, he knew not that
Mrs. Balantyne, whom he had left in a state of
indescribable mental agony, was actually dead.
The news struck him like a thunderbolt to the
heart; and, in passive silence, he attended his
conductor to the presence of the avenger.
Ha! comest thou, fiend of destruction!
cried the enfuriated Balantyne, in tones that
made the criminal tremble in every joint. I
am commissioned by Eternal Justice, as the
avenger of blood. But I will not destroy thee
defenceless. Take either of these weapons,
and kill me, and end the wretchedness thou
hast caused; for whether thou dost or not, by
my hand thou shalt assuredly die!
Hazelton spoke nothe scarcely raised his
eyes from the ground. But he took one of the
pistols. The officer separated the opponents ten
paces, gave the signal, and Hazelton fell to the
earth with his death-wound, without having
lifted his weapon against his adversary.
God of mercy! exclaimed Balantyne,
when he heard the groans of the fallen
criminal
,
and saw that he had not defended himself.
I am a murderer!I have embrued my hands
in the blood of a human being! My
wretchedness
is completefor I am an offender against
Heaven!
His words failed him. He groaned bitterly.
All his desire of vengeance, and with it, all his
energy had fled. His eyes rolled fearfully in
their sockets. The light left them. His teeth
chattered, his hands became clenched, his
knees trembled and bent under him, and he
fell upon the ground convulsed with the most
intense pangs of terror and remorse.
Hazelton looked up and saw his pitiable
state. I am the author of all this calamity,
he cried. My death is approaching. I am
justly slain. Tell that good man, that he has
not committed a murder, but a righteous act;
and inform my friends, that it is my dying
request, that he shall not be prosecuted. Oh!
what a change from the innocence and
happiness
of yesterday, to the guilt and
wretchedness
of to-day! Oh! beware; beware of
hearkening
to the suggestions of unruly passions!
So saying, he caught the hand of the officer
with a death-grasp, and expired.
CHAPTER II.
Canst thou not minister to a mind diseased,
Pluck from the memory a rooted sorrow,
Raze out the written troubles of the brain,
And with some sweet oblivious antidote,
Cleanse the stuff'd bosom of that perilous stuff,
Which weighs upon the heart?
Shakspeare
.
The agony of remorse in the mind of
Balantyne
,
being thus superadded to the pangs of
grief, threw him into an alarming fever,
accompanied
with frightful delirium. The care
of his friends, however, and the natural vigour
of his constitution, carried him safely through
this complication of bodily and mental suffering.
But it was not until the lapse of several weeks,
that his delirium subsided sufficiently to
permit
such an exercise of the memory as enabled
him to form an accurate conception of what had
happened. Since the occurrence of the fatal
events until the taking place of this favourable
crisis, a continual chaos of distressing images
had agitated his mind, and communicated to
his ravings the terrific wildness of maniacal
frenzy. Time, however, the great soother of
all sorrow, gradually restored him to health
and tranquillity, though not to happiness. His
daughter was now the sole object of his
attachment
;
and on her account only, was he desirous
c 2
to live. Indeed, except in what concerned
her, he felt no interest in the affairs of the
world; but for her sake, he was willing to
struggle, for some time longer, with the miseries
of an undesirable existence.
On recovering sufficiently to bear the fatigue
of a journey, he felt it necessary to withdraw
from scenes which perpetually reminded him
of his former happiness and his present misery.
He, therefore, removed with his daughter, to
the place of his birth, in expectation that the
revival of youthful associations, might
mitigate
the severity of the grief which preyed upon
his heart. Time and the attention of his friends,
aided this change of scene, and restored his
feelings to, at least, a partial state of tranquillity.
But to remove his grief altogether, was out of
the question. It had taken too firm a hold on
his heart. Like an instrument of torture it had
grappled too fiercely with his feelings, not to
leave behind deep and permanent vestiges
of its power. Who, indeed, has endured
a calamity like his, that could ever forget it?
Nor was it the calamity alone that rendered his
reflections tormenting. His conscience told
him that he was guilty of blood; that he had
slain a human being; thereby infringing the
majesty of the law, and snatching from offended
justice, the sword which she alone ought to
wield. In vain did his friends urge, when
attempting
to sooth the stings of the
compunctious
visitings that festered in his bosom, that
the injury he had sustained was so peculiar and so
aggravated, as to form an extenuation,
approaching
almost to a justification, of the punishment
he had inflicted on the perpetrator of the
horrible
outrage that had destroyed his happiness;
and that, although he had acted under the
influence
of feelings driven almost to madness, he
had regulated his conduct by the most rigid
rules of honour. The verdict of the world was
therefore in his favour; and while all liberal
minds commiserated his misfortunes, they
awarded him applause rather than censure for
the manliness of his proceedings.
These suggestions had little other offect than
what proceeded from the kindness which they
manifested on the part of his friends, in
tranquillizing
his mind. The idea of having
destroyed
human life, was intolerable to his
contemplations
.
The sense of the injury he had
endured daily became weaker, while that of the
deed he had committed waxed stronger. Time
may be a curer of grief, but it is no remedy
for remorse. The heart which is innocent may
become resigned to remediless misfortune, but
every recollection of guilt is a renewal of
torment
and terror.
The sorrows of Balantyne had, as may well
be supposed, incapacitated him for his
professional
duties. Time, therefore, by lying
heavily
on his hands, contributed greatly to
preserve
his thoughts in the melancholy direction
they had taken. He became, at length,
sensible
that idleness but fostered the malady that
tormented him, and, if relief from his
sufferings
was at all to be obtained, it could only be
from occupation. He had been advised to
travel; and he began to believe that remoteness
from the land of his misfortunes, if it should
not obliterate their remembrance, might, at
least, weaken their impression.
With this view he turned his eyes towards
the North American colonies, then beginning
to acquire a high degree of importance in the
estimation of the people of Europe. The colony
of Pennsylvania, in particular, was viewed with
much interest, on account of the wise and humane
policy of its institutions, the benevolent and
peaceful character of its principal settlers, and
the rapid growth and prosperity of its chief city.
To this land, therefore, which to the
imagination
of Balantyne, seemed a new Arcadia just
arisen in a virgin world, as yet unstained with
those crimes and calamities, the memorials of
which met him at every step in his native
island, he resolved to go, and endeavour to
bury, amidst its tranquil shades, all recollections
of the disasters and sorrows with which he had
been so severely tried. All his effects were
soon turned into money. A passage was
secured
in a vessel bound from Greenock to
Philadelphia, and the heart-rent Balantyne,
accompanied
by his child and her nurse, bade
adieu to his early friends and his native land
for ever.
After a tedious passage of ten weeks, the
fugitive from sorrow was landed in October
1764, at Newcastle. He made but a short stay
in that place, nor did he explore the country
long in search of a residence. His imagination
had long figured to him some sequestered spot
amidst the peaceful shades of Pennsylvania, as
his destined home, where he should enjoy
tranquillity of mind, and watch over the tender
years of his daughter, drawing comfort from
her evolving intellect, her innocent
cheerfulness
,
and her filial attention. He, therefore,
hastened at once beyond the line of Delaware,
and on entering Pennsylvania, he almost felt,
so strong was the power of long-cherished
imaginings, as if he trod on charmed ground.
He resolved to wander no farther in search
of an abode. He heard of a small
plantation
which was for sale in the vicinity. He
visited it. It was situated on the north bank
of the Brandywine; and the neat dwelling
that was upon it, appearing to his fancy both
secluded and picturesque, he resolved that it
should be the termination of his pilgrimage.
He became its purchaser, and hiring a couple
of servants as cultivators of his small farm, his
mind became tranquilized in the possession
of a home which seemed to be beyond the
reach of any of those stormy currents of life
which agitate and beset the more busy and
populous districts of mankind.
His daughter was at this time about five
years of age, healthy, lively, interesting and
faultlessly beautiful. Many a long look of
parental
fondness and solicitude, did Balantyne
take of this dear relic of his days of happiness;
and many a solitary hour did he pass in
meditating
on her present state of innocence and
freedom from care, and in praying to Heaven
that it might never be reversed by any
calamities
.
Neither the education nor habits of Balantyne
had qualified him for secular business, and his
heaviness of heart, rendered him still more
indisposed
for active exertions as a husbandman,
than he might otherwise have been. In a few
years, he became weary of attending to the
affairs of his plantation. He rented it,
therefore
,
to one of his servants, retaining in his
own possession only the dwelling house with a
few surrounding acres. He now gave himself
up entirely to studious habits, and to the
education
of his daughter. Such a course of life,
however, was soon found to produce injurious
effects on both his mind and his body. His
health began to give way, and the
remembrance
of the deed which occasioned his
remorse
,
returned with almost its former
violence
.
It happened, fortunately for Balantyne, that
he had for some time past attracted the
sympathy
of a benevolent and intelligent Quaker,
resident
in the neighbourhood, who courted his
intimacy, and gained his confidence. The
name of this respectable member of the
peaceful
sect, was Elias Meredith. He had been
made acquainted with the story of Balantyne's
sorrows, and he felt a strong interest in his
welfare. He became grieved to witness the
daily increase of the melancholy that preyed
upon one he esteemed; and he had the sagacity
to perceive that want of occupation afforded
the heart-burning malady an unobstructed
opportunity
to commit its ravages.
Friend Balantyne, said he one day that
he found the latter labouring under an unusual
depression of mind, thee knowest that I
feel for thy condition. I will, therefore,
venture
to give thee advice, which, I believe,
thou wilt take in good part, whether thou wilt
adopt it or not. I have observed, that thy
heaviness of spirit hath increased greatly, since
thou hast given up attending to worldly
matters
.
Thee attendest to no business, and thee
followest no amusement. There is nothing,
therefore, but thy attention to thy child, to
divert thy thoughts from subjects of sorrow.
This is not sufficient to preserve either thy
body in health, or thy mind in tranquillity.
Does thee not think, that a more active life
would be better for thee?
It might be so, replied Balantyne. But,
alas, I have no energy for such a life. My
chief desire is to implant the principles of
virtue
,
and the precepts of wisdom, in the mind of
my daughter, and my only enjoyment is to
behold
them take root and flourish there.
It is a natural desireit is a laudable
enjoyment
,
replied his friend. But I may say unto
thee, as the wise man saith, `The way of the
slothful
man is a hedge of thorns.' Thee hast found
it so; for since thou hast had nothing to do,
thou hast been pierced to the quick.I would
advise thee to follow some employment by
which thy thoughts may be diverted, and thy
time rendered useful.
I appreciate the wisdom of your advice,
and I am aware of your friendly motives,
said Balantyne. But I am reluctant to
relinquish
meditations which, however painful
to my heart, and detrimental to my health, are
sacred to my imagination; while to the sorrows
they inflict, I feel it a duty to submit as to a
penalty due for my transgressions. And to
what end should I employ myself in the affairs
of the world? I am unskilled in its ways, and
have no relish for its doings. If I were to
embark
on its current, having neither energy nor
experience to direct my course, I should in all
probability, be baffled in my efforts, and
perhaps
,
lose the little competence with which
Providence has supplied me for the use of my
child.
I would not have thee undertake what thee
knowest not how to perform, answered the
prudent Quaker. But I know thee has skill
in many things. Thee is a learned man, and
could teach the youth of the country, by
which thee might become useful to thy
neighbours
,
and increase thy own provision; whilst
thy mind would be employed on subjects that
would not, as now, render thee miserable.
I should, indeed, wish to be useful in that
way, said Balantyne; but I fear I am
incapable
of undergoing the drudgery of such an
employment. And I know not whether I should
sufficiently evince my attachment to the memory
of my beloved wife, if I were to permit any other
subject of contemplation to occupy her place.
No; thou beatified spirit of my murdered
saint! thy husband shall never cease to
contemplate
thy virtues and deplore thy loss!
Friend Balantyne, said Elias, thee
seems, at present, too much affected to receive
D
the counsel I would give thee. But if thee
will be calm I will reason with thee. Does
thee think that thy wife's spirit knows what
thee now does or feels?
I would not for worlds believe otherwise,
answered Balantyne. To hold, in
imagination
,
that communion with her, of which in
her home of bliss, I feel her to be conscious,
lends to my heart the sweetest throb that my
earthly existence can afford.
Thee is fanciful in thy enjoyments,
observed
Elias. But thee knows that thy
thinking too much really makes thee unhappy.
Besides thee neglects thy duty to thy
neighbours
,
for thee has power to be useful, and I
think thee has also the desire. If thee would
make an effort, I think thee would become
pleased with occupation which would be a
relief
to thy mind, and profitable in a worldly
point of view.
As to worldly profit, said Balantyne, I
care but little. I have a competence for
myself
and my child. I have no desire for
splendour
;
I have no ambition for power. What
then would the accumulation of riches avail
me?
Thee mistakes me, said Elias; I would
not have thee to be industrious altogether from
mercenary views. But, as I said before, thee
has a duty to perform. Thee can be useful,
and should not permit the talent that is given
thee to remain unprofitable.
Your remarks, I acknowledge, are just,
said Balantyne. There is wisdom in your
speech, but, alas, as you cannot feel what I
feel, you cannot judge as I judge. Yet I am
pleased with the interest you take in my
concerns
,
and am thankful that there is one man
in the land wherein I am a stranger, who
wishes too see me happy.
I am, indeed, interested in thy welfare,
said his friend, and as thee takes my
interference
in good part, I do not despair of being
useful to thee. The spirit of thy wife, now in
Heaven, feels, as thee believes, an interest in
thy present well-being, and in that of thy
child:does thee not wish thy conduct to have
her approbation?
Truly I do; and I trust it has; replied
Balantyne.
I fear thee is mistaken, said Elias; a
blessed spirit like hers never can approve of
grieving uselessly, or of living uselessly.
Ah! what hast thou said? asked
Balantyne
with emotion. That touches me sorely.
Can she disapprove of my grief, when it is for
her I grieve? or can life be spent uselessly,
which is spent in penitence for a deed of
rashness
and of guilt?
Friend Balantyne, said Elias, calmly, but
firmly, I wish not to inflame but to sooth the
wounds of thy mind. Bethink thee that thy
wife is now happy. Does thee grieve for
that?
Oh! noI should not, ejaculated
Balantyne
,
thoughtfully. Perhaps I have been sinful
in grieving so much.
As to thy deed of rashness, continued
the Quaker; can thee think that by the guilt
of ruining thy health, and, perhaps, shortening
thy life, thou canst atone for it? Assuredly
one crime cannot be propitiated by the
commission
of another. Thee is a Christian, and
knows where lies the true propitiation for sins.
Thee is a divine, and art aware that
amendment
and utility of life, rather than
lamentation
and penance, are the acceptable offerings
to the Deity.
My sincere friend and counsellor, cried
Balantyne, catching the Quaker by the hand,
thou speakest truth. I delight to hear thee.
At that moment his little Mary, for his
daughter bore the name of her mother, came
into the apartment, and ran smiling towards
her father. He caught her in his arms, and
affectionately embraced her. His friend
availed
himself of the incident.
It is for that child's sake as well as thy
own, said he, that I would counsel thee. She
is now lively, cheerful and happy. She is
yet too young to have caught any of thy
mournful
manner. But a short time will enable her
to perceive thy affliction. If thou throw it not
off, she will feel for thee, grieve with thee,
and become as unhappy as thyself. For her
sake, therefore, suppress thy discontent; cast
off thy gloom. Set her an example of
industry
,
and, if thee can, of cheerfulness, and her
mother's spirit will undoubtedly bless thee.
Ah! you have touched a chord that thrills
through my heart, cried Balantyne. Best
of my friends, you have prevailed. I shall
endeavour
to forget my sorrows; and if I should
not mix much with the world, I shall
endeavour
to be useful to it. I am resolved to adopt
your suggestions, and become an instructor of
youth, so that whatever else my conscience
may lay to my charge, it shall not henceforth
have to accuse me of idleness.
Balantyne kept his resolution. He
established
,
convenient to his residence, a classical
Academy, where many of the youths of that
day, who afterwards became active in the busy
scenes that agitated the country, received those
stores of knowledge, and that cultivation of
intellect
,
which enabled them to acquit
themselves
with so much ability, amidst the
important
scenes in which they became involved.
D 2
CHAPTER III.
Though deep thy woesthough fiercely the decree
Which doom'd our race to sorrow, falls on thee;
Think not thou bear'st the common lot alone;
I too the point of sorrow's shaft have known;
Perhaps, not with such venomed force, the dart
Has carried vengeance to my bleeding heart:
Yet gladly have I sought and found the cure
Which softens pain, or strengthens to endure;
'Tis that our thoughts and energies be given,
On earth to duty, and to hope in Heaven!
Scrap Book
.
The good Elias, from whose judicious
counsel
Balantyne soon derived all the benefits
that had been anticipated, had himself
experienced
the grief which springs from the loss
of those we love. His misfortunes had not,
indeed, been attended with the peculiar
horrors
which marked those of the unhappy
Balantyne
.
Neither was his mind of that
imaginative
character, which loves to picture to
itself, in the strongest colours, whatever of good
or evil may befall it. He knew the condition
of man on earth was liability to fluctuations
between
good and evil, between happiness and
misery; and that the uncertainty of the
duration
of either, nay, of life itself, was so well
established, that a wise man should have the
probability of change in his condition so
familiarised
to his mind, as never to be taken by
surprise, and thrown into too much elation by
good, or too much depression by bad fortune.
Early habits have, indeed, immense influence
in forming the character. It is true, they
cannot
altogether eradicate the natural
disposition
.
They have neither the omnipotent power
ascribed to them by one set of philosophers, nor
are they so inefficient in their operation on the
mind, as is asserted by another. The feelings
of Elias were acute, his sympathies strong, and
his temper originally irritable. But early
instruction
had apprised him of the evil effects
of indulging these propensities, and habit had
accustomed him to exert the power of
reflection
in controlling them. But it was in
resistance
to the last mentioned trait, his irritability,
that he was taught to make the greatest efforts;
and over this he had, by the time he reached the
years of manhood, acquired such an ascendency,
that no occurrence could provoke him into a
display of anger. Resentment and revenge
were, in consequence, feelings to which he had
long become a stranger. The kindlier
impulses
were allowed more indulgence, as they
generally are by the prudent and peaceful
community
to which he belonged, because less
inimical
to that tranquillity of disposition and
evenness of conduct, on which they have
found the chief portion of human felicity in a
turbulent world, like ours, to depend.
And herein lay the great distinction between
Elias and Balantyne. The latter could reason
as well, and see as clearly the duty and
advantages
of suppressing the more violent emotions,
but he had not in youth been disciplined to the
task. He had been well educated, both morally
and religiously. The theories of right and
wrong, and of wisdom and folly, he well
understood
,
and of the advantage of acting
according
to their dictates, he was thoroughly
convinced. But discipline had not sufficiently
trained him to the practice. Habit, therefore,
had not rendered it easy.
Thus, while Balantyne was less qualified,
from previous preparation, to endure
misfortune
than his friend, it had fallen upon him
with redoubled weight, and in a more
aggravated
and terrible form. His calamities had
been singular, not only in kind but in severity.
Those of his more passive and imperturable
friend, trying as they were, had not been
accompanied
by circumstances of such
peculiarity
;
nor had they been of sudden or
unexpected
occurrence. He had lost the wife of his
youth on whom he doated; but she had gone
slowly and gradually away, in consumption.
He had lost his two only children; but the one
had survived its birth only a few weeks, and
the other scarcely two years. Bereft of wife
and children, he had long felt forlorn in the
world; but he had never become discontented
with it, nor withdrawn from it his countenance.
He still had comforts left for which he was
thankful; and for those of which he had been
deprived, dearly as he prized them, he dared
not murmur.
He continued a widower, for he could not
place those affections on another female, which
had been so entirely engrossed by her whom
he had lost. He possessed a competent estate,
lived in comfortable elegance, and
notwithstanding
the regrets which would sometimes
obtrude upon him, his friends, who were
numerous
,
were never rendered uneasy in his
society, by any appearance of sullenness or
discontent.
The chief object of his solicitude, of late
years, was the son of a deceased brother, to
whom he had been appointed guardian. At
the time Mr. Balantyne established his
academy
,
this youth was about twelve years of age.
He resided with his mother, at a short distance
from his uncle's. His father had died when he
was but two years old; and his mother, who was
a native of England, and an Episcopalian, had
not implanted in his mind the peculiarly
quiescent
sentiments, nor trained his manners to the
precise habits of his father's sect. Still, as she
was a virtuous and intelligent woman, and as all
her affections were centered in her Edward, for
that was her son's name, she took great care to
implant early in his mind, the seeds of sound
morality, and to imbue him with a strong sense
of the beauty and glory of an honourable life.
This amiable woman was a great favourite
with her discreet brother-in-law. After she
had become a widow, although young,
handsome
and affluent, she had rejected several
advantageous
offers of marriage, having
resolved
,
from respect to the memory of her
husband, to admit the addresses of no suitor
whatever, but to devote her attention to
cultivating
the mind, establishing the principles,
and forming the manners of her son. Such
conduct could not but endear her to the
discerning
and upright Elias; and although it
would have been a source of much satisfaction
to him, had his nephew been brought up in the
principles of his own sect, yet as he had no
pretence
to interfere with the rights of so excellent
a mother, he had too much good sense, and,
towards her, too much good feeling, to make
the attempt.
Edward Meredith was one of the first pupils
placed under the care of Mr. Balantyne, when
that gentleman opened his Academy. Sprightly,
gay, and in vigorous health, in love with all the
world, and all the world in love with him, no
happier being could then exist on this
perishable
globe, than the light-hearted Edward. Life
to him opened, indeed, with a sweetly vernal
dawn. Wherever he went, all was smiles and
sunshine. The flowers of existence alone caught
his attention, as if nothing else was springing
up around himor if a weed or a thorn chanced
to obtrude itself in his way, he passed it with
heedless indifference, and soon forgot that it
had disturbed him.
Thus passed the gay morning of his life, calm
and unclouded. But in his sixteenth year, an
incident occurred which threatened greatly to
agitate the scene, and gave to his bosom the first
serious feeling of perplexity and alarm. It was a
beautiful evening in the month of May. He had
passed the afternoon in his favourite recreation,
that of fowling in the woods, and was returning
home with about twenty wild pigeons, as the
trophies
of his success, when, late in the evening, in
the vicinity of his mother's residence, he
overheard
some voices in a thick wood through which
he was passing. He approached them cautiously,
and heard the following alarming dialogue.
But, Sir Robert, what if you should be
mistaken in the lady after all?
I tell you, Frank, it is Matilda. And we are
both once more unmarried, for I have
ascertained
,
that the sly Quaker, who carried her
off, has thought proper to take himself off, and
leave her a rich and buxom widow, with but
one son. She and I might yet fulfil the terms
of the nabob Colonel's will, and compel Captain
Harris to cash back the sicca rupees on which
he has so long fattened.
Sir Robert, observed Frank, think of
former times, and despair of success.
Hang it, cried Sir Robert, why rub
open old sores. She must have forgotten those
youthful sallies by this time. I dare say that
she can estimate the value of a hundred
thousand
pounds too well, to reject them on account
of a little spleen.
I doubt it, said Frank. She was never
avaricious; and if this lady be really your
cousin
,
she already enjoys affluence, and will not
be tempted by money into a match that she
dislikes. Resorting to force will be rather a
dangerous
matter. She has a strong household of
servants; and a stripling son as active as a young
colt, and who can point a gun with as good an
aim as any rifleman in your company.
I tell you, Frank, returned Sir Robert,
I'll have no more preaching about it. If she
will not comply civilly, I'll have her seized
and carried on ship-board, where I will
compel
her to go through the ceremony, in spite of
all the servants and striplings, and broad-brims
and buckskins in America. Nay, I know not but
this might be the best plan to begin with. By
heavens, she looks handsome yet. I gazed at her
by stealth to-day until I imagined that my
youthful
days were returned, and my youthful
passions
rekindled. But a truce with sentiments.
Let us return to our tavern, where we shall
remain
incog, and mature the matter.
An extremely wise proposal, Sir Robert.
I agree to it with all my heart. There is
jolly beverage at the White Buck, which will
sharpen our wits.
The speakers departed, and in doing so,
afforded
Edward a view of their persons, which,
however, did not enable him to distinguish
them, as they were both carefully muffled in
large cloaks. The apprehension of some
mischief
being plotted against his mother, was
naturally
excited in his mind. The object of the
conspiracy was a lady named Matilda, whose
servants were numerous, and who had a son yet
a stripling. To his mother alone, of all the
ladies he knew, did each of these circumstances
apply. He hastened to her. He informed her
of the strange dialogue and of his own fears.
She became agitated.
Yes, my son, said she, you are right.
Danger threatens us from a man from whose
power I once with difficulty escaped, but from
whom I should have supposed that time and
distance had now formed an effectual
protection
.
I must immediately confer with your
uncle on this emergency.
Elias was sent for, and soon made his
appearance
.
Mrs. Meredith, after informing him
of the alarming dialogue which had been
overheard
by her son, related to him the particulars
which are to be found in the next chapter.
E
CHAPTER IV.
Cherish'd and lov'd, her youthful days were spent
Amidst each earthly blessing butcontent,
Each fond adorer fill'd her soul with dread;
At length the gay and flattering scene she fled,
And far from crowds, beneath a foreign sky,
She found that love contentment could supply!
Scrap Book
.
I have no doubt, said Mrs. Meredith,
that I am the person against whom the
designs
of this man are directed. It seems,
indeed
,
strange that, after the lapse of eighteen
years, he should discover me in a retired
corner
of a distant country, and stranger yet, that
he should still be actuated with a desire to
disturb
my peace.
You are already acquainted with part of my
history before I arrived, as your brother's
wife, in this country. You are aware, that my
father's name was Harris, that he was a Colonel
in the service of the English East India
Company
,
and that having lost my mother in my
infancy, I was, on my father being ordered to
India, with his regiment, which was in my
ninth year, placed under the care of a sister of
my mother, then the widow of Sir Robert
Radnor. This lady was a notable, pleasant,
and rather morally disposed woman, and I
believe sincerely attached to me. She had one
son, her only child, the inheritor of his father's
title and property. This youth was about three
years older than myself. He was the idol of
his mother, and consequently a wilful and
wayward boy. His temper was boisterous and
turbulent, and to his mother, notwithstanding
all the tenderness she lavished upon him, he
was frequently disobedient and sometimes rude.
To me, however, he always manifested great
attention; and I was scarcely fourteen when he
declared himself my lover. I was perhaps too
young to be susceptible of tender emotions; but
whether or not, neither the person, conduct,
manners, nor disposition of my cousin, were
calculated to make an impression on my heart. I
had, in fact, imbibed an insurmountable aversion
towards him. Before his declaration, his
complaisance
to me, demanded and always obtained
mine in return. But after that event, I could
barely tolerate him. He ascribed my coldness
to youthful shyness, and romantically
pretended
to love me the more for it.
Affairs remained in this state for several
months, when his mother interfered in his
behalf
.
My father had acquired great wealth in
India; and in point of fortune, placing out of
view the affection which I believe she really
felt for me, I was an eligible match for her son.
Her interference, however, produced towards
him no favourable change in my sentiments.
I now began to experience great diversity of
treatment from her. Sometimes I was
flattered
and caressed, and at other times threatened
and abused. The young baronet, in the
meantime
,
never ceased persecuting me with his
addresses, so that my situation became very
unpleasant, and I took the resolution to write
to my father on the subject.
My aunt, however, had anticipated me in
this measure. In less than two months after I
had written, I received a letter from my father,
in which he stated, that the prospect of a union
between me and Sir Robert Radnor, afforded
him great satisfaction; and he trusted that my
feelings towards Sir Robert, fully responded
to the ardent affection the latter professed for
me. In which case, it would be the greatest
pleasure of his life, to give his parental
sanction
to our nuptials.
This letter did not answer the designs of
my persecutors, so completely as they wished.
It contained a recommendation, but laid on me
no injunction, in relation to the proposed match.
I, therefore, felt at liberty still to reject the
baronet's addresses; and I hoped, that when,
from my own letter, my father should become
acquainted with the true state of my feelings,
he would not urge me into a measure against
which I entertained such strong repugnance.
In the meantime an occurrence took place,
which awakened in my bosom new feelings,
and gave a new direction to the tenor of my
life. My aunt had some slight indisposition,
which drove her to Bath. I accompanied her.
One day, as we sat in our drawing room, we
heard the noise of some tumult on the street.
We hastened to a window. We saw a crowd,
and soon understood that an officer of the law
was dragging a poor man to prison for debt.
His wife had overtaken the procession at this
spot, and when we first looked out, she was
pathetically
,
but vainly imploring the relentless
creditor, who was present, for mercy. The
unfeeling
man, irritated at having his barbarity
thus exposed on the street, rudely and with
insulting
language, drove the distracted woman
from him. The word `shame! shame!' burst
from the crowd. Several persons of the
affluent
classes, had stopped to look upon the scene
and sympathized with the sufferers, so far as to
join in the cry of indignation that had been
raised. But they did no more! and the
procession
was again moving forward, when a young
man, habited as a Quaker, hastened towards
the creditor, who was at that moment pushing
the debtor's wife, with some violence, out of
his way.
`What does thee mean,' demanded he,
`by thy violence towards this woman?'
`It is none of your business, replied the
E 2
man, surlily, again pushing the woman from
before
him, and directing the bailiff to move
forward
with the prisoner.
The young Quaker caught the poor woman's
arm in his.
`Fear not,' said he, `I will protect thee.
Tell me thy grievance!That man is too angry
to be spoken with.'
`Alas!' she replied, `they are dragging
my husband to prison for debt, and my poor
children shall be doomed to starvation.'
`What is the amount of thy claim against
this poor man?' asked the stranger, again
addressing
the creditor.
I heard no more. I felt I had been inactive
too long. An impulse had suddenly seized
me, which was uncontrollable. I was
impelled
by a fatality which I could not resist, and
was, indeed, hardly responsible for what I
did. I hurried down stairs, and my aunt had
scarcely noticed my departure from the room,
before I was in the midst of the crowd, pressing
my purse into the hands of the debtor's wife.
Take this, I beg of you, said I, and if
it be sufficient to rescue your husband from
the hands of these cruel men, let him be set
at liberty immediately. If not sufficient, I will
furnish whatever additional sum shall be
necessary
.
` He is no longer a prisoner,' answered the
woman refusing to accept the money I offered.
The bounty of that blessed young gentleman
has released him.Oh! let me, let me thank
him.
I looked up. I caught he young man's
glance. It warmed my heart; it was so
expressive
of kindness and benevolence.
` Fair young lady,' said he, `I have
satisfied
this harsh creditor, and the prisoner
is free. But thee has a good heart which
should not be deprived of its gratification. This
woman ought to accept of thy benefaction, for
I understand that she is very poor, and that
her children are in want of proper sustenance.'
` Oh! do, I beg thee, take it,' said I to the
woman, forcing the money into her hand. She
received it; and I hurried back, in extreme
confusion, to the apartment where I had left
my astonished aunt. I had scarcely explained
to her the impulse under which I had acted,
when my confusion was increased by a
message
from the young stranger, who called
himself
,
Edward Meredith, requesting permission
to wait upon me, which my aunt readily
granted
.
He entered, apologised for the freedom
he had taken; but said he, addressing me
` Thy goodness of heart, which was so
powerful
as to overcome thy evident reluctance to
appear in a crowd, struck me as something so
rare and admirable, in a young lady of thy
rank, that I could not resist my desire to
express
to thee how much I respect thee for it.
I arrived in Bath only this morning, and have
taken lodgings in the inn opposite to this
house. If thy aunt and thee have no
objection
,
permission to visit you sometimes, while
I remain in Bath, will afford me much
pleasure
.'
My aunt signified her acquiescence.But I
will not detain you with a repetition of the
conversation
which ensued. It produced an
impression
on my heart in favour of your brother;
for you are aware that this youth was he; the
recollection of which to this day makes it glow
with precious and dear feelings. He visited
us frequently, and soon took occasion to
declare
that he loved me, and I did not deny
for I could not be disingenuous with one whom
I conceived to be all candour and goodness
that his affection was returned.
This sweet intercourse of united hearts was
soon interrupted. My cousin, Sir Robert,
joined
us at Bath, and with the Argus eye of a
jealous lover, discovered what his mother had
not even suspected.
` It cannot be possible,' said she, when her
son informed her of his convictions on the
subject
,
`that a girl so gay and lively as Matilda,
should encourage the addresses of a plain and
formal Quaker! You must be mistaken, Sir
Robert. Your jealousy alarms you needlessly.
The thing is quite impossible.'
It was resolved, however, that we should
leave Bath immediately; and much to my
regret
,
I was obliged to withdraw from the
society
of him who had given to my heart a new
feeling, and lent my life sensations of
endearment
and delight it had never before
experienced
.
We returned to our former residence in
London, where I was subjected to the
unremitting
and vexatious solicitations of my cousin,
to become his wife. His mother was scarcely
less urgent than himself, and their united
importunities
on this hateful subject rendered me
truly miserable. In the course of a few weeks,
the impatience of the young baronet, irritated,
as he was, by the unyielding and unqualified
firmness of my refusal, became irrepressible,
and his manner of addressing me assumed a
boldness it had never exhibited before. He
upbraided me with my attachment to your
brother
,
and threatened vengeance upon the latter
for what he called his audacity in making
pretensions
to my favour. My alarm, lest these
threats should be performed, added greatly to my
unhappiness. I wished exceedingly to apprize
Edward of his danger, and to urge him to fly
from the country, or at least avoid meeting with
the incensed baronet. But with Edward, I had
no means of communicating. Since leaving
Bath, I had neither seen him, nor heard of
him, and delicacy forbade me to attempt
inquiring
after him.
About six weeks after our return to London,
I was constrained to accompany my aunt to a
country-lodge, near Hatfield, belonging to Sir
Robert who followed us the next day.
Having
stopped at an inn on the road for
refreshment
,
our footman, to my great astonishment,
took an opportunity of slipping the following
note into my hand, whispering, `Read this in
private.'
`A scheme is laid to entrap or enforce thee
to marry thy cousin. If thee wilt be firm,
Providence may enable me to rescue thee from
thy tormentors. I watch all their movements,
but in such attire as prevents them from
discovering
me. May Heaven protect thee!
`Thy loving friend,
E.
Meredith
.'
This communication revived my spirits. The
second day after we reached the lodge, my
aunt put into my hands a letter from my
father
,
in which, after remonstrating with me for
rejecting the addressess of Sir Robert, he laid
his parental injunctions on me to receive him
without delay, as my husband, threatening me
with his utmost displeasure in the event of my
refusal.
Never!' said I; `never will I receive him
as my husband. My father knows not the
extent
of the sacrifice he demands. But whether
or not, even a father has no right to command
his child to be wretched.'
That evening, as I sat alone in my own
chamber, absorbed in melancholy reflections on
my unhappy situation, the door slowly opened,
and the dreaded figure of my cousin presented
itself. After some fulsome panegyrics on my
my beauty, and vehement declarations of the
ardour of his passion, he protested, that since
he had obtained my father's approval of our
union, he would not leave me, until a day
should be fixed for its accomplishment.
I remained firm. I was indignant at his
unmanly
intrusion on my privacy, and I declared
that no power on earth should ever compel me
to be his.
His countenance became inflamed, his eyes
darted looks of terrific rage, and he swore that
if, by to-morrow evening at the same hour, I
did not yield to his entreaties, he would do a
deed of horror, by which my happiness would
be for ever sacrificed to the gratification of his
passions, and at the recollection of which I
should tremble to the latest hour of my
existence
.
He then withdrew, locking the door
on the outside, as if resolved to prevent my
escape from the catastrophe he had threatened.
In an agony of grief and terror, I threw
myself
on my knees and supplicated Heaven for
deliverance from the power of my tormentor.
My mind being too much agitated to permit
sleep and feeling too much alarmed to resign
myself to the defenceless condition to which
my retiring to bed would reduce me, since the
key of my chamber was in possession of the
object of my terror, I sat up, and resigned
myself
to the most gloomy meditations on my
prospects. In this state I was startled, at about
one o'clock in the morning, with a low voice
whispering at my window. I soon recognised
it to be that of our footman. He displayed a
letter. I opened the window and received it.
It was from Edward.
`I know the extremity to which thou art
reduced,' said he, `and the evils that threaten
thee. If thou wouldst escape them, fly
immediately
.
Francis, thy footman is faithful,
entrust
thyself to him. He will bring thee to
where I am waiting for thee, having every
thing arranged for thy safe conveyance from
the reach of thy persecutors.'
I blessed Heaven for this interposition. In
a few minutes I was ready, and descended the
ladder which was affixed to my window. A
few minutes more placed me in a carriage
beside
my Edward. We drove off rapidly, my
heart beating with that species of delightful
trepidation
which a bird may be supposed to feel
when it has escaped from the snares of the
fowler. In less than a week we were
privately
married at Bristol, and embarked the next
day in a ship bound for Philadelphia. The
remainder
of my story you know. You were
witness to my happiness for the few years that
Heaven permitted me to enjoy the best and
dearest of husbands, and you are aware of the
reverence and love with which I have
cherished
his memory, as well as the assiduity with
which I have endeavoured to perform my
duty
to the dear pledge which he has left me,
my beloved son, watching over whose welfare
is the charm that has long formed the chief
enjoyment of my life.
F
CHAPTER V.
Again I'll try her. She escaped me once;
But there's no sleek-face now to charm young Cupid,
Into rebellion. Plutus is my friend;
And little Cupid may, perhaps, be won,
By gentle dalliance, to draw forth his bow,
And send a conq'ring arrow to her heart.
Scrap Book
.
The peaceful and prudent Elias was of
opinion
that it was preferable to shun danger by
flying from it, than run the risk of encountering
it by disregarding timely warning. When,
therefore, Mrs. Meredith had ended her
narrative
,
it was arranged that, for the present
night, strict watch should be kept by her
servants
,
and every suspicious or unknown
person
prevented from approaching the house;
and that to-morrow she should proceed, escorted
by a number of friends, to Philadelphia, in the
midst of the dense population of which, she
would, by the exercise of common caution, be
more secure from personal danger than in the
comparative solitude where she lived. Elias
having given the necessary directions to the
servants whom Edward undertook to keep to
their duty during the night, returned to his
own house, in order to make preparations for
to-morrow's journey.
At an early hour in the morning, a
stranger
approached the guarded premises, who
requested
admission to the presence of their
mistress
.
You must first declare your name and
intentions
,
said Edward: I am mistaken, if I
did not hear your voice in a conversation of no
very safe import yesterday evening in the
woods.
It may be so, replied the stranger, not
in the least daunted. Nevertheless I am the
friend of Mrs. Meredith. Tell her that
Francis
Holmes wishes to see her. Show her that
piece of coin in token of my veracity, and she
will not refuse me admittance.
Edward hastened with the message to his
mother. She immediately recognised the coin,
which was an ancient gold piece that her
husband
had presented to Francis among other
tokens of his regard.
Francis Holmes, said she, was once my
friend, and I trust he is so still. He is the
faithful footman who enabled me to escape from
a fearful danger. Let him be admitted.
Edward accordingly introduced Francis.
Francis, said Mrs. Meredith, you are
welcome. It is long since we have seen each
other. I doubt not that the motive of your
present visit, is as friendly as was your former
conduct.
Never, returned Francis, shall I be
otherwise
than a friend to the daughter of my first
master, whose kindness snatched me from
beggary
,
and gave me education and a livelihood;
and the wife of the benevolent man whose
bounty saved my parents from ruin, when a
harsh landlord had seized their all. Happy
indeed am I once more to behold my young
mistress; for you will permit me still to call
you soto be the friend of whom I pledged
myself to my first benefactor, when on leaving
her to go to India, he begged that I should,
for his sake and hers, remain as a servant in
the family, to whose protection he had
committed
her. Yes, Mrs. Meredith, I am your
friend, and visit you now for a friendly
purpose
.
Well, I will believe you, Francis, said
Mrs. Meredith, notwithstanding language
well calculated to alarm me, was no later than
last evening, heard to pass between you and
the former troubler of my peace, Sir Robert
Radnor, in whose service, I find you still are.
No, replied Francis, I am not, properly
speaking, in his service. I am no longer a
menial. Your husband's liberality for the
share I had in effecting your escape, of which
Sir Robert, to this day, knows nothing, enabled
me to withdraw from servitude, and assist my
father in stocking and cultivating the little
farm which the same liberality had shortly
before
,
enabled him to retain. About two years
afterwards, my parents died; and having then
no person to provide for, I sold my farm and
resolved to live at my ease, in a species of
frugal independence, which I was soon the
better
enabled to do by a legacy of a thousand
pounds bequeathed to me by your father.
Ah! said Mrs. Meredith, can you tell
me any particulars relative to my father's
death? It was long after it took place before
I heard of it. My husband had recently died,
and my whole attention was occupied in
studying
the welfare of my infant son. Besides, not
knowing whether Sir Robert Radnor was
married
,
I was afraid to make my residence known,
lest I should be again persecuted by his
addresses
.
I, therefore, made no inquiry, and
I obtained no information on which I could
rely. I was merely told that he died on his
passage
home from India, and that, in resentment
for my rejection of Sir Robert, he had
bequeathed
me none of his property.
Part only of that information is true,
replied
Francis. It was on his passage home
that he died. But he knew nothing of your
marriage at the time of his death; and with
the exception of a few legacies, he left you his
entire fortune, on condition that you should
marry Sir Robert. In the event of your
rejecting
him, you were to receive only ten
thousand
pounds, and in that case, Sir Robert
F 2
was to receive but five thousand. The
residue
of his property was bequeathed to his
brother
,
Thomas Harris, of Liverpool, since
deceased
,
whose son now enjoys it.
Thank Heaven! he had not cast me so
far from his affections as I was informed, said
Mrs. Meredith. In death, imposed on as he
was by my persecutors, he still bore for me a
father's affection. By this information, you
have removed the load which has, of late years,
pressed most heavily on my feelings. But let
me ask, why am I again threatened with
persecution
by Sir Robert Radnor?
To explain this is the main object of my
present visit. Hear me with patience while I
relate to you some of the events of Sir Robert's
career after you fled from his power. When your
flight became known, Sir Robert doubted not
that the young Quaker, with whom you had
become acquainted at Bath, had carried you
off. I and two or three other servants were
immediately summoned; and, with the enraged
baronet at our head, we started on fleet horses
in pursuit. I was aware of the road you had
taken and managed to lead our company into
another. Sir Robert was persuaded that you
would be heard of at Bath, and we hastened
thither. But gaining no intelligence there, we
were about setting off for Bristol, when I
proposed
that we should disperse in different
directions
,
as the most probable means of succeeding
in our views. Sir Robert approved of the plan,
and offered a large reward to him who should
first bring satisfactory information respecting
you to Bath, where, as a central point, he
proposed
to remain, until such information should
reach him. I volunteered to take the way to
Bristol; and was despatched thither, and was
much pleased to learn, that a ship had thence
sailed for America the day before my arrival.
I doubted not that you were in her, and were
consequently safe from our pursuit. I returned
to Bath. Sir Robert could not believe that
you had time to embark in the Bristol vessel.
I then suggested the probability of your
concealment
in London, with the view of sailing
thence, as we had not been able to trace you
in the west of England. We, in
consequence
,
returned to the metropolis, and after
various ineffectual inquiries, Sir Robert began
to entertain the idea of following you to
America
.
It was a chimerical scheme from which
his mother and friends at that time with
difficulty
dissuaded him. He still, however,
entertained
the idea, if it were only, as he said,
to chastise the presumptuous Quaker who had
stolen you from him. In fact, all British eyes
were shortly afterwards turned to the western
continent on which an important war was
raging
,
and the gallant Wolfe and his compeers
in arms, were reaping immortal laurels.
The imagination of Sir Robert, in every
thing enthusiastic, now took a military turn. He
purchased a captain's commission, and in
April
,
1758, embarked for New York. Shortly
after his arrival there, he, at a ball given by
the citizens to the military officers, met with
a beautiful girl of whom he became violently
enamoured, and after a few weeks' courtship,
led her to the altar. In a few weeks more, he
was obliged to join his regiment at Albany.
His wife accompanied him, and they remained
there during the winter. In the spring, he was
ordered to join the division of the army which
marched, under Sir William Johnson, against
the French forts on the lakes. The delicate
state of his wife's health prevented her from
attending him on this active service, and she
returned to New-York, to reside with her
father
,
who was a respectable merchant in that
city.
The regiment to which Sir Robert belonged,
being detached to the assistance of General
Wolfe in his attack upon Quebec, arrived in
time to participate in the glory of the battle of
Abraham, in which the baronet was
dangerously
wounded. During his confinement, which
was protracted many weeks, he received
information
from New York, that his wife had
died in child-bed, and that the child, a daughter,
had survived its mother but a few hours. His
physicians now declared that the milder air of
his native country was necessary to accelerate
his recovery, and restore him to his former
health. He accordingly embarked for
England
,
where he soon recovered; and, becoming
smitten with the graces of a daughter of a
country
gentleman, he married her. This lady died
about eighteen months ago, without leaving him
any offspring.
Very recently his attention became again
directed towards you. Your uncle Harris of
Liverpool, to whom your father
bequeathed
his fortune, had died, leaving to
inherit
his vast wealth, only one son, a wild
youth who is likely soon to squander it
away by extravagance. Sir Robert, by some
means, became informed of the place of your
residence, and of your being a widow. He
conceived
it possible, therefore, to induce you to
fulfil the letter of your father's will by
marrying
him, and thereby become entitled to the
fortune now in possession of a spendthrift. It
is for this purpose he is at present in this
neighbourhood. Obvious reasons render him
unwilling to appear before you personally,
until
he shall ascertain the state of your feelings
towards him, as well as your views in relation
to the proposal he wishes to make. To save
you both the pain of an interview, should your
feelings be opposed to one, I undertook the
task I have performed, of laying the subject
before you. I now leave the result to the
decision
of your own judgment and feelings.
It is, indeed, a strange account of things
that you have given me, said Mrs. Meredith.
But let me ask, if Sir Robert be desirous of
making friendly overtures to me, what he
could mean by the threats he used yesterday,
to have me carried by force on ship-board?
Mrs. Meredith, replied Francis, I would
not be the friend of your welfare, which I
profess
to be, if I were to deceive you in any
respect
.
I shall, therefore, acknowledge that Sir
Robert, having but little expectation that
persuasion
will induce you to accede to his wishes,
builds his hopes of success chiefly on
intimidation
.
Francis, said Mrs. Meredith, your
candour
and honesty convince me that you are
still my friend. I sincerely thank you for the
intelligence you have given me. My
resolution
respecting Sir Robert requires no
deliberation
.
It is at once taken. The wealth of
worlds would not induce me to marry such a
man. Tell him so, I request you; and tell him
also to abandon his views of violence against
me, otherwise I shall appeal to the authorities
of the land for protection, and have him dealt
with, as a conspirator against my safety and
happiness.
Be assured, madam, replied Francis, I
shall convey to him your message, and enforce
his abandonment of this wild scheme with all
my influence. Believe me, when I say, that
my only reason for adhering to his society, at
present, is to frustrate as far as I can, any
outrage
he may attempt against you.
Francis then withdrew, resolved to
continue
his friendly exertions in behalf of so
deserving
a lady. The ill success of his
negotiation
was precisely what he expected, and,
perhaps
,
what he approved. His chief object was
gained by the information he had given Mrs.
Meredith of her danger, and he was gratified
with the belief, that he had inspired her with
full confidence in his friendship. To
communicate
the result to the testy and wayward
baronet
at the White Buck, was now his task,
and it was far from being an agreeable one.
A paroxysm of rage and a storm of abuse, he
knew would be the consequence. But he was
prepared not only to witness, but, if necessary,
to endure it, in the performance of his duty.
CHAPTER VI.
Oh, liberty! inspiring sound! how dear
To noble bosoms is thy sweet possession!
Mean is the soul would barter thee for gold,
Or, fawn on kings to live a gilded slave.
Oh! sacred Heaven! let Freedom be my lot,
Though in a cottage, far removed from grandeur,
And I'll not envy any titled slave
Whose life luxuriates in a monarch's smiles.
Sedley
.
The diligent and anxious Elias had made
every necessary preparation for the removal of
Mrs. Meredith to Philadelphia, and he arrived
at her house with his escort shortly after
Francis
had left it. Mrs. Meredith's alarm,
however
,
had now greatly subsided. She believed
that she had in Francis, an active and vigilant
friend, who would conteract the evil designs of
the baronet, or at least afford her timely notice
for providing against them. But the wary
Elias was not so easily satisfied on this point.
Thy persecutor is rich, said he, and thy
friend may become frail, if strongly tempted;
or he may, if he takes thy part too openly,
become the object of thy tormentor's dislike,
peradventure his victim; for who can set
bounds to the atrocities of the wicked? The
city is the safer place for thee in the present
emergency; and thy son's residence there, a
matter which thee has for sometime
contemplated
,
will contribute to his improvement,
and being under thy own eye, there will be
little danger of his acquiring vicious or
improper
habits. My cousin, Isaac Ellworth and his
wife, will gladly receive thee, having often
wished thee to sojourn, for a season, with them,
that thee might enjoy the society of the ctiy.
Mrs. Meredith yielded to these reasons,
and that evening the young and delighted
Edward, for the first time in his life, found
himself in the beautful and flourishing
metropolis
of his native country. Edward was now
upon the borders of seventeen, with a heart
joyous, generous, open, and susceptible to
every
impression of novelty, and every impulse
of sympathy and delight. He soon formed a
large circle of acquaintances among the
respectable
young men of the city, with whom his
manners became at once assimilated. His
mother
was delighted with the daily improvement
he exhibited in manly appearance, in polish of
manners, expansion of intellect, and knowledge
of the ways of man. It is true, that she felt
occasional apprehensions, lest amidst the
temptations
that surrounded him, he might deviate
from the path of rigid morality, and suffer his
principles to be corrupted by the fascinations
of pleasure. But, as yet she had nothing of
which to complain; and she was too much
delighted
at witnessing his felicity to interrupt it
by any manifestation of doubts respecting the
G
stability of his principles and the continued
propriety of his conduct.
She had been five or six weeks in the city,
before she heard any thing concerning the
movements of Sir Robert. She then received a
letter from Francis, from which the following
passage is extracted.
The rage of Sir Robert, when I reported
your message to him, was excessive; and it
became
still more so, when he learned that you
had withdrawn from the neighbourhood. He
vented better reproaches against me, ascribing
your flight to my unseasonable exposure of
his designs. He at length became convinced
that you had been alarmed before my
interview
with you, and acquitted me of any
intention
to betray him. He followed you to
Philadelphia, and remained there,
incognito
,
about a week. But perceiving that you were too
well protected by your friends, to afford him an
opportunity of effecting any project of abduction
against you, he began to listen to the voice of
reason, and to perceive the folly of his conduct.
I had left him, my own affairs requiring my
presence in New York. He followed me to
that city, as soon as he became convinced of
the impracticability of forcing you into a
marriage
.
He there spent some days, making
inquiries
after the relations of his American wife.
He was informed that her father had been dead
many years, and that her only sister had long
ago removed, with her husband, to some other
place of residence. Where this was he had
now no time, and perhaps little inclination
to trace, for having obtained the command
of a troop of calvary, he was ordered by Sir
Guy Carleton to assume his military duty at
Boston, the inhabitants of which city have
become
extremely violent in their manifestations
of hostility to the measures of the British
government
.
I intend to remain in New-York for some
time, having formed a connexion which, as I
begin to feel wearied of a wandering life, may
terminate in domesticating me here. If not, I
shall take a trip to Boston, to enjoy the society
of some old acquaintances who are now in the
army there.
This letter having quieted Mrs. Meredith's
fears of suffering any immediate outrage from
the violence of Sir Robert Radnor, she
returned
to her residence on the Brandywine.
Her son accompanied her, and, although he
was far from being wearied of the society and
amusements of Philadelphia, he felt a real
satisfaction
,
for he was somewhat of a
sentimentalist
,
at being again amidst his native woods.
At this period, the spirit of political
discussion
animated all classes of people in America.
That opposition to the British authority which,
shortly afterwards, produced the bold measure of
the declaration of the independence of this great
country, was every day waxing stronger.
Patriotism
had taken firm root in the breasts of
the eminent and masterly spirits of the age, as
well as of the great mass of the people. The
feeling that the rights of the colonies were
infringed
,
and the opinion that such
infringement
ought to be opposed, prevailed from one
extremity of the continent to the other, not
universally
,
it is true, for there were many who
felt and thought differently, but with such
predominating
influence as to give impulse and
direction to all public measures. It happened,
fortunately for the cause of America, that a
great proportion of those who disapproved of
the principles and conduct of her friends, and
considered the patriotism of the day sedition,
were men of peaceful habits, inactive and
unwarlike. This was particularly the case
in Pennsylvania, where the sect of the Quakers,
quiescent in feeling, and religiously averse to
war, possessed great influence, not only from
their numbers, but from their wealth, and the
peculiar correctness of their moral deportment.
Had these men been as active and warlike as
the Eastern and Southern royalists, and had
they thrown the weight of their great resources
into the scale of the latter, the balance might
have turned against the country, and rendered
the efforts of her patriots, at that time at least,
to rescue her from a foreign yoke, abortive.
But the same principles which induced the
Quakers to acquiesce in the arbitrary measures
of the British government, namely, a
submissive
spirit and aversion to bloodshed,
prevented
them from presenting any essential
resistance
to the efforts of those who boldly took
up arms in their country's cause. Hence
thousands
of Americans who were opposed in
principle
to the struggle for independence, were
altogether neutral in practice. They surveyed
the scenes of devastation and carnage that
surrounded
them with horror; admiring, no doubt,
the courage, and pitying the sufferings of the
brave men who faced and defied the terrors of
the times, but, at the same time, lamenting and
condemning what they esteemed their rashness
and delusion.
Among this class of sentimental opponents
to the military patriotism of the times, we are
reluctantly obliged to rank our good friend,
Elias Meredith. He often and deeply deplored
the infatuation of that hot-headed generation of
men, as he called them, who preferred
plunging
into all the evils of a bloody war, to the
paying of a small sum of money, merely
because
it was demanded from them as a tax, to
the levying of which the customary formality
of voting for it by their own representatives
was not attached.
G 2
Because a small wrong is done thee, he
would say to his nephew, who, during his visit
to Philadelphia, had become strongly tainted
with whiggism, is it any reason why thee
should do thyself a great wrong? If a stronger
man than myself attempts to force six-pence
from me, would I not be foolish, if I were to
grapple and fight with him, at the risk of my
life, in order to save it? No; rather than
engage in mortal combat with any one, I would
choose to give up all that I possess; for of what
value would riches be to me, if I were slain? Or
should I slay my antagonist in a quarrel which
I might avoid, what comfort could wealth ever
afterwards afford me? Solomon saith truly,
`Better is a dry morsel, and quietness
therewith
,
than an house full of sacrifices with
strife?'
Such reasoning made but little impression
on the judgment, and still less on the feelings
of Edward. The degradation of tamely
submitting
to injustice, he considered intolerable to
any generous spirit. And what, he would
ask, could be more pusillanimous or
contemptible
than for a whole people to submit quietly
to be despoiled of the fruits of their industry,
at the will and pleasure of dictatorial and
hectoring
foreigners? It cannot be either true
religion
or sound morality which would condemn
resistance to such flagrant injustice.
This difference of political sentiment,
however
,
although freely avowed on the part of
Edward, occasioned no personal variance
between
him and his uncle. Elias disliked no
man merely on account of opinions. The most
honest mind, he believed, may be mistaken in
judgment; and, if power ever exercises any
species of oppression more unjust and
barbarous
than another, he considered it to be that
which attempts to enforce opinion and destroy
the freedom of conscience.
The country was now fast assuming an
armed
attitude, and preparing with remarkable
energy and resolution, for the bloody crisis
which was fast approaching. Blood had, indeed,
been already shed, for the battle of Lexington
was fought, and a military enthusiasm had
seized
upon the minds of all the generous patriots
in the land. Edward had not escaped the
ardour
;
but a due deference to the feelings not
only of his uncle, but his mother, (for against
her views and wishes, he had also to contend,)
prevented him, for some time, from arraying
himself openly as a soldier beneath the standard
of that cause to which he had given his
affections
.
The whiggism of Edward had also to
contend
with the reasonings and remonstrances of
another individual, for the extent of whose
knowledge and the soundness of whose
judgment
,
he had long cherished an habitual
respect
,
this was his excellent preceptor, Adam
Balantyne. The peaceful habits of this
gentleman
,
his long cherished veneration for the
name of Britain, and his thorough conviction,
that the British constitution was the best
model
of government that could be framed by
man, rendered him extremely hostile to the
insurrectionary doctrines and movements now
so prevalent in America. With his
characteristic
warmth, he did not hesitate to proclaim
his sentiments, and with his national
propersity
to abstract disquisition, he never declined
to enter into the arguments which the friends
of the mother country, at that busy period of
political animadversion and theorizing, adduced
in behalf of her cause.
As these arguments have been long since
exploded, it would be useless to protract this
history by introducing them here. I shall
therefore
take the liberty of concluding this chapter,
by informing the reader, as an inducement for
him to proceed in the work, that he will find,
by the example which the story of Balantyne
will furnish, that the influence of theoretical
convictions or abstract opinions on the mind,
is but feeble when it happens to come into
collision with awakened and strongly excited
passions.
CHAPTER VII.
Yes, 'tis my country's callher foes are come
Dissuade me not; her voice I must obey
This is the hour for patriots to assume
The garb of war, and form the dread array,
And in the battle earn the glorious plume
Of vict'ry; and amidst the deadly fray,
Inscribe, with bloody steel, th' invader's doom,
And sink oppression deep into oblivion's tomb.
Scrap Book
.
It will not be supposed that, when the dark
hour of his country's trials approached, a young
man of the feelings and principles of Edward
Meredith
,
would remain long content with favouring
her only with his good wishes. The first occasion
on which he made any active movement in her
behalf, was when the ship Polly arrived in the
Delaware, with a cargo of the well-known
obnoxiously
taxed tea. He happened to be on a visit
to Philadelphia when this event was announced,
and a town meeting, at which upwards of eight
thousand people were assembled, was held in
the State-house yard, to deliberate on the
measures
that should be adopted to prevent the tea
from being landed.
At this meeting a
deputation
was appointed to wait on the commander
of the ship, and demand his departure from the
country with his unwelcome cargo on pain of
witnessing a repetition of the tea transaction at
Boston.
In order to enforce this demand, a number of
the young men of the city volunteered to
accompany
the deputation to the vessel.
Meredith
joined them. Under the name of
Liberty
Boys, they proceeded to the vessel, and
by their resolute bearing, soon convinced her
commander, that his wisest course was to
comply
with the public wish, and carry his
ungracious
cargo back to the Thames.
While on board of this ship, Meredith fell
into conversation with a young man of good
address and pleasing appearance, who had come
in her, as a passenger from England. To his
great surprise and satisfaction, he soon
discovered
this person to be his relative, Harris,
the inheritor of his grandfather's property,
whom Francis had described, as a youth of so
much extravagance and dissipation.
Although from previous information,
Meredith
had no reason to be prepossessed in favour
of this young man, yet the natural generosity of
his disposition, and a feeling of real satisfaction
at meeting, for the first time, with a relative of
his mother, now afar from his own home,
induced
him to give him a sincere and hearty welcome,
and to invite him to the hospitality of his
mother's
board. The invitation was accepted; and,
Meredith, instead of returning to the city with
the Liberty Boys, proceeded with his
cousin
to his own residence.
Charles Harris was received by Mrs.
Meredith
with much kindness. He, indeed,
exhibited
a frankness of manner and a candour of
speech, with which she could not fail to be
pleased.
I am aware, said he, as soon as the
conversation
permitted him to touch upon family
matters, that the large fortune which I
derived
from my uncle, your father, you had every
natural reason to expect should have devolved
upon you. But as I could have had no agency
in the framing of your father's will, being but
a child at the time of his death, you must hold
me guiltless of having made any unfair
interference
with your claims. I also firmly believe,
that my father was equally guiltless with
myself
;
and for accepting the property legally
bequeathed
to him, you can hardly consider him
censurable.
I never blamed either you or your father
in that affair, observed Mrs. Meredith. I
knew too well on whom the burden of
accusation
should be laid, to cast it on the innocent.
But, thank Heaven, the plotters against me
only partially succeeded. They deprived me
of my father's property, but even his will
proves that they could not deprive me of his
affections; and in the attainment of the great
end they had in view, which was to induce
me, by the allurements of wealth, to marry a
man I detested, they were disappointed. By
their representations, they had caused my
father
to set his heart upon my becoming the
wife of Sir Robert Radnor, to effect which his
will was evidently framed. But even here my
father showed a parental tenderness which has
afforded me much consolation; for anticipating
the possibility of my persisting in despite of
every inducement to refuse Sir Robert, he, in
that event, secured me a competence. It is
true, I have never received this legacy, nor even
applied for it. But it has yielded me a
satisfaction
superior to wealth in the conviction I
have drawn from it, that, in his last moments,
my father's affections, notwithstanding all the
efforts of my enemies, were not alienated from
me.
It is true, replied Harris, that your
father
bequeathed you ten thousand pounds, and
that mine should have paid it to you. But, as
you observe, you never made application for it,
and it remains a debt unpaid. It should be my
duty now to discharge it, and it would be my
pleasure, were it in my power. But I must
confess that my extravagances have ruined me;
and at the age of twenty-four, I, who
inherited
a splendid fortune, have been obliged to fly
from my native country, to avoid the pursuit
of my creditors and the terrors of a jail.
Let not my claim upon you, said Mrs.
Meredith, give you any uneasiness.
Providence
has blessed me with abundance; and in
your misfortunes, I should, indeed, be
barbarous
,
if I were to press upon you for that of
which I have no need. Nay; if your ill
fortune
approaches to any thing like poverty,
speak freely: I shall, in that case, hold it my
duty to lend you aid.
Your kindness deserves my best thanks,
returned Harris, and will soften the regret,
with which, in my wanderings in a foreign
land, I shall reflect on the short-lived
splendour
I enjoyed in my native country. But I
have no immediate occasion for pecuniary aid.
I have saved from the wreck of my fortune, a
sufficiency for all the comforts of life, and in
its extravagances I have resolved no longer to
indulge.
Your loss of fortune may then be
advantageous
to you, said Mrs. Meredith, by
teaching you how to moderate your desires
and conform to the duties of useful and
orderly
life. But I wish not to preach to you. I
trust that your own good sense, after the
experience
you have had, will render admonitory
lessons from others unnecessary. Yet let me
observe, as respects myself, that there is one
consequence flowing from your loss of fortune
which is so valuable to me, that I, indeed,
consider
it cheaply purchased by the loss of my
H
legacy. I mean the removal of those
mercenary
inducements which lately prompted Sir
Robert Radnor to renew his efforts to force me
into matrimony. When he learns that your
fortune is lost, he will no longer wish for my
hand to entitle him to wrest it from you.
Indeed! observed Harris, unconsciously
betraying some emotion, I knew not that Sir
Robert had thought of troubling you on that
ground. But if an increase of fortune was his
object, that inducement no longer exists. My
poverty, therefore, may contribute to your
peace, a consideration which will form one of
the chief consolations that shall enable me to
bear it.
The plausibility of Harris's sentiments, his
seeming penitence for his former dissolute
conduct
,
and the apparent resignation with which
he bore his loss of property, added to his near
relationship to her father, awakened the
sympathies
of Mrs. Meredith for him, and she so
warmly pressed him to make his residence in
her house, that he consented, for the present,
to do so.
The benevolent Elias also manifested much
friendship for Harris, whom he looked upon as a
young man, who being disgusted with the follies,
and wounded by the artifices and malevolence of
the world, had fled into the bosom of their
secluded
society, in order to enjoy an opportunity for
reflection
and amendment. As for Edward, his
feelings
towards his new-found relative were of the
most cordial description. He looked upon him
with respect as well as affection, not only
because
he was unfortunate, but because he was
a few years older, and had seen much more of
the world, than himself. He listened with
delight
to the accounts which Harris frequently
gave him, of the polish and splendour of
English
society and manners in the higher ranks.
The wealth, grandeur, magnificence, and
power
of that noble island, the native land of his
mother, as well as the soil from which his
paternal
ancestors had sprung, forcibly seized
upon
his imagination, and warmed his heart with
a glow of pride, as often as he would listen to
Harris descanting on these themes. But such
pride and its attendant partiality would
immediately
vanish, when he reflectedbut
reflected
with a sighthat, at that moment, that
country
,
otherwise so glorious, had become the
oppressor
of his ownnay, had actually
unsheathed
the sword; and assumed the attitude of a
tyrant
desirous to establish unjust pretensions and
arbitrary rule at the expense of an incalculable
amount of human suffering, carnage, and
desolation
.
But on this subject, the sentiments of
Meredith
and Harris were at variance. Harris was
a staunch adherent to the interests of Britain,
while Meredith zealously advocated the
American
cause. The cousins did not, however, in
their discussions on the subject, indulge in any
acrimonious feelings, for each had liberality
enough to respect the partiality of the other
for the land of his birth. But Meredith was
frequently subjected to much pain in being
obliged to withdraw from the debate in
deference
to his mother and his uncle, who both
favoured the side that Harris had espoused.
Mr. Balantyne also, as has been already stated,
was strongly attached to the same side, and his
intimacy, for reasons which will afterwards
appear, Harris began soon assiduously to
cultivate
.
The esteem and confidence of one so
little experienced in the arts of the designing
portion of mankind, as the secluded and
warmhearted
preceptor of Dilworth, were easily
gained by the insinuating Harris. This young
adventurer, therefore, became, in a short time,
a frequent and welcome visiter at the house of
Balantyne.
Meredith's nearest connexions and most
venerated
friends were thus in political sentiment
arrayed against him. Yet he adhered fast to
the faith he had espoused, and had it not been
for the remonstrances of his mother, his zeal
would have driven him at once into the ranks
of the brave men who were now in arms for
the rights and liberties of his country.
But Meredith was not without friends
numerous
friendswhose opinions countenanced
and encouraged his patriotism. The vicinity
in which he resided abounded with active and
ardent whigs, sufficient not merely to
outnumber
the tories, but to direct and regulate all
the public measures of the district. At the
present time, when we know the result of the
agitations of that momentous periodwhen we
enjoy, in security and prosperity, the
invaluable
rights then contended for, and, amidst such
great and fearful opposition, so heroically and
gloriously achieved, it is with difficulty that
we can conceive the distresses and the terrors
the agonizing trials of both mind and body
which then afflicted the community.
Party-spirit
reigned triumphant in all its rancour;
and let loose upon society the demons of
discord
to embitter the feelings of men, and
frequently
to break asunder those ties of
friendship
and affinity which form the most precious
and endearing solace of existence. Fathers and
sons became hostile to each other, and brothers
became the most inveterate foes. Hence
domestic
tranquillity, that greatest good of man
on earth, was banished from the abode of
thousands of unhappy families; and there were
few indeed, in which its existence was not in
some degree disturbed, and its continuance
rendered
precarious.
Such ever has been, and ever will be the
woful effects of great national excitements,
H 2
whether religious or political. On all such
occasions, the minds of men will embrace
different
views, and cherish different opinions.
Arguments will take place, and produce zeal
and enthusiasm. Irritation will follow, and
then will come strifestrife even unto blood
and destructionand amidst the clamours of
impatient zeal or enfuriated revenge, the gentle
voice of friendship or consanguinity will
either
not be heard or be disregarded.
CHAPTER VIII.
In joyous youth, what soul hath never known
Thought, feeling, taste, harmonious to its own!
Who hath not paused while Beauty's pensive eye
Asked from his heart the homage of a sigh?
Who hath not owned with rapture-smitten frame,
The power of grace, the magic of a name?
Campbell
.
But the time, at length, arrived, when the
spirit of Meredith could no longer resist the
call of his country. The battle of Bunker's
Hill, fortunate and glorious for the arms of
America, awakened in the minds of her youth
a military ardour which drove them in
thousands
to her standard. This was greatly
increased
by the appointment of Washington to
the command of her armies. Many who were
before timid, now became resolute, and felt
confidence in the final result of the struggle,
since they saw that their undisciplined and
ill-appointed
levies, could resist the veteran
soldiers
of Britain, and that they had now
obtained
a leader in whose consummate skill
they could repose the most implicit reliance.
Animated with the martial feelings which
had thus become so prevalent among the
patriots
of the day, Meredith felt desirous of
proceeding
at once to the head quarters of
Washington
and offering his services. His mother's
entreaties
and his uncle's remonstrances, however,
had, as yet, influence sufficient to prevent this.
But he could not be altogether an idle spectator
of his country's struggle. Bands of tories became
active in the neighbourhood of the Brandywine,
and the whigs found it necessary to arm in
their own defence. This afforded an
opportunity
for Meredith to become active. He raised
a band of partizan volunteers, self-clothed and
self-armed in defence of the district. To this,
his friends made but little opposition, in the
hopes that such indulgence might satisfy his
wishes, and prevent him from leaving home to
join the regular army.
Meredith and Harris now became avowed
enemies. A coolness had for some time existed
between them, arising at first from a cause not
connected with politics, although their political
differences, now that they had sundered, tended
no doubt to widen the breach.
Meredith had become attached to a young
lady of Philadelphia, the niece and heiress of
an elderly, infirm gentleman, named Lewis.
He had first met with her at the Yellow-Springs,
where she attended her uncle, who was
making
trial of the waters for his health. It was
on an August afternoon. Meredith had some
errand in the vicinity of the Springs. He rode
slowly on a narrow path, through a thick wood,
which led, by a shorter course, than the main
road, to the place he wished to visit. He was
within a quarter of a mile of the Springs, in
a lonely dell, hidden by tall and dark trees,
where all was silent and solitary, when he heard
a female voice scream for help. It proceeded
from the close woods on his left, which he
could not penetrate on horseback. He
dismounted
,
and dashing through the brush-wood,
in a moment burst into a small glade, when
he saw a stout fierce-looking man in the act of
robbing an elderly gentlemen, while a young
lady, on her knees, was imploring the ruffian
for mercy. The approach of Meredith was,
however, more effectual than her entreaties,
for on the instant of his appearance, the robber
fled, having made booty of only a small purse
containing a few guineas, which the lady in
her fright had presented to him in the hope of
preventing further violence.
Ah! it is the scoundrel Fitzpatrick!
exclaimed
Meredith. He has too long escaped
the gallows! He was about to pursue the
ruffian
;
but the tones of the sweetest voice he had
ever heard, arrested his attention. Oh! help
help to save my uncle, or he will die!
were the words that thrilled to his heart, and
stopped his pursuit of Fitzpatrick.
He hastened to the gentleman. He found
him lying on the ground with his countenance
discoloured, his eyes swollen, and his whole
frame making a convulsive effort for the
recovery
of breath. The lady had unbound his
cravat, and from her, Meredith learned that the
robber, in making his attack, had seized the
old man by the throat and nearly strangled
him. Meredith raised the sufferer in his arms,
and he soon recovered sufficiently to permit
being
conveyed to his lodging at the Springs.
This incident produced a commotion in the
feelings of Meredith which he never before
experienced. It was not the exultation of
rescuing
a lady and gentleman from robbery, nor
the alarm produced by the dangerous condition
in which the gentleman was found, that so
strangely agitated him. It was a more endearing
and sweeter sensation than such circumstances
could inspire. It was the delight with which he
beheld the bewitching looks of Harriet Lewis,
for so was this beautful being named; the
rapture
with which he listened to her grateful
words uttered in tones sweeter than the honey of
music to his heart.Was he in love? He knew
not. It might be so. Yet how could it be?
He knew too little of this fascinating lady to
warrant such a serious feeling as love. But
certainly
there was something delightfully strange
in the effects of her presence upon his
sensations
.
Nay; reflecting upon her, in her
absence
,
produced in his heart emotions of
pleasure
which it had never before experienced;
emotions in which it now became his chief
luxury to indulge. If it was not love, what
then could it be? It was a feeling of delight
in meditating on hera feeling of rapture in
conversing with hera passionin fact, he
could not long conceal it from himself; it was
the divine passion of love that had, with all
its intensity, seized upon his young and ardent
heart.
I shall not sentimentalize upon the state of
Meredith's feelings at this time, however
tempting the opportunity may be to the writer
of a history like this, which professes to detail
the impulses, as well as the actions of the
characters
that form its subject. My work is
limited
to certain bounds which must not be
exceeded
;
and as the events to be related are
numerous, I must be frugal of the space
allotted
to impulses and sentiments.
During the ensuing three weeks, at the
termination
of which, Mr. Lewis recovered
sufficiently
to be able to return to Philadelphia,
Meredith found, or fancied he had found,
business
sufficient to require his continuance at the
Springs. But when the sound of his Harriet's
parting
words, had died upon his ears, he discovered
that the Springs were intolerably dull, and that
he had no longer any business to detain him
there. He soon, however, made a pretence
for visiting the city; and, as Harris proposed
to accompany him, for the transaction of some
affairs arising from letters he had just
received
from England, he could not with propriety
refuse his society.
They were on horseback, and riding on a
tolerably good road, in a gay conversable
humour
,
when the subject of gallantry to the
ladies
happening to be introduced, Harris
abruptly
,
as if suddenly recollecting some forgotten
piece of intelligence, observed, By the bye,
Edward, you had a most enviable adventure
lately at the Yellow Springs: and quite a
romantic
business too, I understand.
To what do you allude? asked Edward
in some confusion. Oh! oh! replied Harris,
if it be a mysterous affair, I beg pardon for
adverting to it. Really I heard a month ago
of your vanquishing the robber; and have had
many surmises and conjectures to account for
your being so close-mouthed on the subject.
How you received your information, said
Edward, I know not. But you have received,
at least part of it, incorrectly. I had no
combat
with a robber, and therefore could not
vanquish one.
Come, comeno evasions! returned
Harris
.
If you did not literally subdue the rogue,
you put him to flight, which is much the
same thing; and you had the chivalric delight
of rescuing venerable age and distressed
beauty
out of his hands. Now you see I know
something
about the matter!
Since you know so much, your curiosity,
Mr. Harris, ought to be at rest, for you can
have lost but little from my silence on the
subject
.
True, I know the most of your adventure
with the robber. But, of course, from your
own information only can I become
acquainted
with the progress which the fair lady's
charms have made on your heart. Pray, now
be candid and open-minded for once, and let
me know whether she has really smitten
you?
Sir, replied Edward, impatiently, since
your mirth has driven you into the scoffing
vein, I have no objection to be personally
your butt. But I would remind you of the
impropriety, and caution you against the
imprudence
of mingling with your jests, any
allusion
to a young and respectable female.
Oh! a truce with such gravity! I have no
wish to offend. But if my cousin, Edward
Meredith, cannot tolerate from me, a little
familiar
levity, where on all this wide continent
of sulky and touchy humours, may I venture
to indulge a jest?
Among your intrusive countrymen,
perhaps
,
whose overbearing conduct has latterly
proved that they have no great consideration
I
for the rights or the feelings of others. It is
therefore to be presumed that they can have
but little for their own. Their insensibility in
these matters, may enable them to bear with
patience what they so readily inflict upon
others.
Come, come, my dear fellow, you are too
warm. My countrymen have nothing to do with
the question. In what manner have I
offended
you?
By speaking flippantly of a young lady I
esteem.
Upon honour, I intended her no disrespect.
How could I? I know nothing in reference
to her but what is respectable. Besides I have
myself some interest in maintaining her credit
for respectability, since, according to a
discovery
I have just made, I believe I have the
honour to be her relation.
Her relation! How! What have you
discovered
concerning her?
Staystay! Do'nt be impatient. My
discovery
is easily told. One of my letters from
England received yesterday, informs me that
David Lewis, Esqr. now of Philadelphia,
formerly
a merchant in New York, is full cousin
to my motherand moreover, from my said
mother, I have an introductory letter to the said
David Lewis, to deliver which in
propria
persona
is the motive of my present visit to the
city, and consequently the reason why you are
now troubled with my obnoxious company.
I claim no right to
Nay, nayno explanations. They are not
needed.But permit me to observe, that I am
much mistaken, if your venerable acquaintance
is not the identical Mr. Lewis whom I am
about to visit as my relation, and of whose
niece, therefore, far be it from me to speak
flippantly.
Meredith's reply was prevented by the
sudden
appearance of a man wrapped in a large
cloak so as to conceal both his person and his
face, who hastily placed in his hand a small
packet, and without speaking, hurried back
into the woods from which he had issued.
Meredith opened the packet, and perceiving
the signature to a few roughly written lines,
he exclaimed,
It is the outlaw, Fitzpatrick! Let us
pursue
and seize him. Justice has been too long
defrauded of him.
He was starting in pursuit, when Harris
caught the rein of his bridle, and checked his
movements.
Meredith, said he, be not so rash. If
you now venture into that wood, I predict that
you will soon be a dead man. Fitzpatrick is
not there alone, or he would not have
ventured
to expose himself to our view. Ha! hear
ye that!
Loud huzzas, at that instant, rang through
the wood from evidently more than a dozen
voices, after which the sound of a solitary fife
was heard, moving gradually away to the air
of God save the king.
You are right, Harris, said Meredith;
there is a band of tories there. I perhaps owe
my present safety to your royalism. But let
me read the outlaw's packet. Ha! in this fold
there is money; a twenty dollar bill,
continental
currency.But what says the scrawl.
This is rebel money in which you have faith.
Give it to your sweetheart, Miss Lewis, for
the five guineas of gold I took from her. I
do not wish to rob a young lady, especially
when she is handsome; but I have use for the
gold, and if she can do any good with this
rebellious
money, she is welcome. I should have had
no objection to have strangled the old fellow,
because
they say he has a spice of whiggery in his
heart. Mr. Meredith, you have a good uncle
and a good mother; but I would warn you not
to tempt your fate, too far, by persisting in
open rebellion against the Lord's anointed.
Your well wisher,
James Fitzpatrick
.
P. S. Tell Miss Lewis not to consider me
a common robber, but to forgive the fright I
put her into. I came by the twenty dollars
honestly, having compelled one of your militia
captains who was in pursuit of me, to stand
and deliver it.
Faith, an odd kind of honesty this. But
Fitzparick is certainly no common robber.
In my opinion, said Harris, he is an
honour to your country. He adheres manfully
to his allegiance; and opposes in his own
singular
manner, the torrent of rebellious
principles
which has overwhelmed the land, and
swept away all the ancient barriers of social
order and political subordination.
We only resist oppression! exclaimed
Meredith, we only contend for our rights.
If this be rebellion, nature and reason lend it
their sanction, and impose it on freemen as
an incumbent duty, in the performance of
which none but grovellers and cowards would
refuse to embark!
My dear Meredith, said Harris, you
are an enthusiast. I wish to Heaven you were
so in a good cause. But let us drop politics,
if you please. In these times they inflame the
blood too much. Is there any other subject in
the discussion of which we might engage with
less warmth of feeling and more coolness of
judgment?
I have little inclination for argument on
any subject at present, replied Meredith.
We are now approaching the vicinity of the
city, and I am desirous of entering it with
unruffled
feelings.
I 2
Then a truce with hard words until some
fitter occasion, said Harris; and the
appearances
of the country through which they
passed
,
becoming, as they approached the city,
more and more diversified by cultivation,
afforded
,
during the remainder of their journey,
topics for conversation, on which they could
freely descant, and differ, and bandy jests,
without
increasing the acrimony of their already
embittered feelings.
CHAPTER IX.
If Hope's creative spirit cannot raise
One trophy sacred to thy future days,
Scorn the dull crowd that haunt the gloomy shrine
Of hopeless love, to murmur and repine!
But, should a sigh of milder mood express
Thy heart-warm wishes true to happiness,
Through thy wild heart some hapless hour may miss
The peaceful tenor of unvaried bliss,
Yet still may Hope her talisman employ
To snatch from Heaven anticipated joy.
Campbell
.
Harris's claims to relationship being in fact
well founded, were easily admitted by Mr.
Lewis. The agreeable exterior and plausible
manners of this young man, have already been
noticed. Well educated, and accustomed to
the most polished society in Great Britain, he
had acquired, in addition to his natural gaiety
and cheerfulness, an artificial suavity and an
accommodating courtesy of behaviour,
especially
in the presence of ladies, which
rendered
him a uniform favourite with the sex.
Even men whose judgments attached but slight
importance to such superficial accomplishments
in comparison with the more solid qualities of
the mind and heart, found more satisfaction in
his society than that of many on whose
sincerity
and soundness of principles they could
more fully rely.
It is not to be wondered at, that, with such
companionable qualities added to his claim of
relationship, this agreeable young man should
soon be permitted to enjoy much intimacy and
favour with Harriet Lewis. He, indeed,
became
assiduous in his attentions to her, and
exerted
all his arts of pleasing to win her favour.
She was pleased with his manners and flattered
by his attentions, and, therefore, felt pleasure in
his society. With the anxious eye of a devoted
lover, Meredith beheld the sudden rise of this
intimacy between Harriet and Harris; and the
feelings of jealousy became added to the
former
causes of his dislike of the latter; and as
he could not be deceitful, and affect cordiality
which he did not feel, his manners as well as
his feelings became cool towards his cousin.
Harris soon perceived this change in the
manners of Meredith, and he had too much
discernment not to know the cause. He
triumphed
in it. It was exactly what he
wished
for. He had never felt a sincere
friendship
for Meredithperhaps never for any one,
for his heart was not made for friendship. And
for some time past, he had cherished feelings
altogether inimical to his cousin. And
Meredith
well knew that he was estranged; but he
did not suppose him hostile. The arts of
dissimulation
possessed and practised by Harris,
would have been sufficient to deceive one much
more experienced in the world, than the
youthful
,
candid and unsuspicious Meredith. Even
now, when the latter scarcely concealed his
aversion, the former affected not to perceive
it, but evinced more than usual cordiality
towards
one on whom he secretly rejoiced to
have the power of inflicting pain. With a
refined
cruelty, and a serpent-like disposition, he
attempted to wind himself into a breast where
he knew he was unwelcome, that he might add
venom to the wounds he had already given.
In this, however, he did not succeed. The
single-heartedness of Meredith foiled the arts
of his enemy; for no flattery could extort from
him a feigned regard or induce him to place
confidence where he felt dislike.
The hypocrisy of Harris, however,
answered
one purpose on which he set considerable
value. It deprived Meredith of any pretence
for coming to an avowed rupture, an event for
which his open temper exceedingly longed.
Preserving, by this means, access to the object
who was writhing under the influence of his
torturing subtleties, the tormentor could enjoy
the malignant satisfaction of witnessing the
effects
of his artful inflictions, which, with the
capricious power of mysterious agency, he could
modify, diminish, or increase according to his
pleasure or the policy of the occasion.
The true causes of Harris's hostility towards
Meredith had a foundation much deeper than
their political variance, and older than his
introduction
to Harriet Lewis. The dissimilarity
of their dispositions would have prevented them
from ever becoming very confidential friends,
but, without the aid of some more serious cause for
dissatisfaction, might not have interrupted the
harmony of good companionship, and social
courtesy, which for some time existed between
them.
But that cause must now be unfolded. Ah!
when I think of it, and its terrible consequences,
how does my indignation kindle against the
memory of the worker of that deed of
iniquity
!
It is true, he was subjected to the
fierceness
of a father's vengeance, and was made to
shrink with terror, and tremble through all his
frame, before the awful denunications of a
mysterious
agent of Eternal Justice. But could the
infliction of vengeance undo the crime he had
committed, or restore to the victims of his
guilt that happiness of which he had despeiled
them. Ah! nonevernever in this world,
were they again to know happiness, which had
fled from its mansion in their bosoms, like the
dove from the ark, to return no more!
At the time Harris arrived in America,
Mary Balantyne was approaching her sixteenth
year, and if ever there was a fascinating being
at that age, she was one. Archness, liveliness,
innocence, happiness, beamed from her
countenance
,
which was illuminated with gay looks
and playful smiles. She had, from her
childhood
,
been a favourite with Edward Meredith.
He was about four years her senior. His
attendance
at her father's seminary afforded him
daily opportunities of observing her dawning
beauties, and, at the same time, of becoming
acquainted with the excellent qualities of her
mind, to the cultivation of which her father
had been anxiously attentive. After what has
been stated in relation to her father's solicitude
for her welfare, and the devotion with which
he applied himself to the implanting in her
mind correct and virtuous principles, it needs
scarcely be added that an abhorrence of vice
and an attachment to virtue, had become so
habitual to her as almost to form an identity
with her nature. She could not think but in
accordance with integrity and truth, nor could
she cherish a desire that was not virtuous.
Often and often as Meredith beheld her
budding
graces opening into womanhood, and
breathing around her the vernal sweets of
youth, beauty, and purity, would feelings
warmer than the fraternal ones he had been
long accustomed to cherish towards her,
intrude
into his bosom; but he was obliged to
check such dangerous emotions. He dared
not think of a closer connexion with her than
that of an endearing and disinterested
friendship
.
For his mother, whose sway over his
mind was then supreme, amiable and
intelligent
as she was, had aristocratical feelings on
the subject of matrimony, and had formed
expectations
of seeing her son united to one of
the highest females, for rank and fortune, in
the land. She had early observed Edward's
partiality for the lovely flower that was
budding
in the bowers of Dilworth; and fair and
sweet as she confessed that flower to be, she
deemed it too humble and lowly to match with
the splendid fortunes which she conceived to
be in store for him. She, therefore,
repeatedly
exhorted him to guard against forming any
tender connexion with Miss Balantyne. She
even laid her injunctions on him to that effect,
and Edward obeyed them. He had long
delighted
to gaze on the beauties of Miss
Balantyne
;
but these beauties had been hitherto,
perhaps, too infantile, to inspire him with a
serious and lasting passion. This, as we have
seen, it was reserved for the matured charms
of Harriet Lewis, to inspire. But the
welfare
of Mary Balantyne was, notwithstanding,
dear to his heart. A generous concern also for
that of her father operated on his feelings; for
from him he had derived much instruction for
which he was grateful. Yet, perhaps, his
being
the father of the interesting Mary, formed,
in reality, the chief claim which Balantyne had
upon Edward's regard. Be this as it might,
he was, next to his uncle, Elias, the man, in
all the world, for whom he entertained the
highest veneration.
These were the feelings cherished by
Meredith
towards Balantyne and his daughter,
when Harris became acquainted with them,
and owing to congeniality of political opinions,
gained the confidence of the loyal North
Briton
,
who looked upon the young Englishman
as his countryman. Harris, therefore, soon
became a favourite guest at Dilworth, and the
attractions of Miss Balantyne made him a
frequent
one.
The libertine principles of Harris were not
unknown to Meredith, who had been often the
confidential auditor of his numerous and
expensive
gallantries in the British metropolis.
It was with much uneasiness, therefore, that
he observed a man of this description
insinuating
himself into the affection of the innocent
and artless Mary. Harris, not aware of the
deep interest which Edward took in the
welfare
of this young woman, one evening, as they
rambled along the banks of the Brandywine,
confessed, in his loose, affable, and
confidential
way, that he was greatly enamoured of
Miss Balantyne, that he had declared to her
his passion, and had reason to believe that it
was fully returned.
K
Then you are resolved on matrimony, I
suppose? said Edward, jocularly.
Matrimony! no, faith, returned Harris,
I am not such a fool as that amounts to. In
the bowers of love, it is for a mistress, not a
wife that I have always sought; and it is not
the smiles of a pretty girl, however fascinating,
in the woods of America, that shall make me
change my habits.
Meredith was thrown into seriousness by
this reply. He remained silent for some
moments
.
He then said with firmness:
Mr. Harris, you have made an insinuation
to which I cannot listen with complaisance
nor reply with levity. The daughters of
America
shall never, in general terms, be spoken
of lightly in my hearing, without meeting with
a defender. With respect to the one whose
affections you say you have courted for no
honourable purposemark me, sir, in her
welfare
I am particularly interested. I shall
henceforth
watch your intercourse with her; and
should I discover in your conduct any
tendency
of a dishonourable nature, from that
moment
I shall cast you from my friendship, and
take upon myself to avenge her cause.
Hey day! master champion! retorted
Harris, with affected indifference, but evidently
much surprised and provoked. You would
fight for the reputation of a favourite fair one,
however frail, would you? But, master
Edward
,
whenever I am so fortunate as to win
the love of a pretty girl, hang me, if I shall
ask your permission to enjoy the blessing!
Hear me! said Meredith; I will cut
this altercation short, by declaring solemnly,
that if you attempt, in any manner, by either
word or deed, to injure the spotless fame of
Mary Balantyne, I shall hunt you over the
face of the earth, until I inflict upon you the
vengeance that justice shall require!
And does Edward Meredith suppose that
Charles Harris shall not be easily found, when
he is wanted for the purpose of combat? But in
whose quarrel does the mettlesome Edward
wish now to embark? Whom have I
slandered
?
By heavens, not Miss Balantyne, whom
I love too tenderly to injure. But master
Edward, your vehemence awakes a strong
suspicion
that you are somewhat of a rival to me
in the affections of this girl. If so, speak out,
that we may understand each other, and we
shall soon find means of settling our
controversy
.
I am not the lover of Miss Balantyne in
the sense you suppose, returned Meredith.
But I am her sincere and warm friend, and,
as such shall ever be ready to defend her
reputation
against a calumniator, or revenge it,
if need be, upon a seducer. You have heard
my determition. Reflect upon it, and act
accordingly
.
Farewell! I shall waste no more
words at present.
So saying, Meredith turned abruptly into a
different path, on which he observed some
people advancing, and left the astonished and
irritated Harris cursing equally his own
imprudent
communication, and his cousin's
impetuosity
.
From this time Meredith and Harris placed
no confidence in each other. The latter made
some pretence to Mrs. Meredith for
withdrawing
his residence from her house, and took
lodgings in the village of Dilworth. The
meeting
of Meredith with Miss Lewis, and the
occurrences
related in the last chapter took place,
shortly after this estrangement, and will
account
for the high and fretful tone of their
conversation on their way to Philadelphia.
The assiduity of Harris's attentions to Miss
Lewis, was at first greatly induced by his desire
of inflicting pain on Meredith; and his success
in this matter afforded him, as we have seen, no
small triumph. The gay and light-hearted
beauty for whom Meredith sighed, also
observed
his uneasiness, for what woman was ever
blind to the workings of jealousy in the mind
of her lover? She internally exulted in this
proof of the power of her charms over a young
man whom she truly loved. She, therefore,
for some time, encouraged the attentions of
Harris more than she otherwise would have
done; for, although possessed of a truly good
heart, which rendered her averse to give pain
to any one, yet she had a sufficient
sprinkling
of that vanity, generally incident to young
and flattered beauties, which inspires them with
coquetry, and causes them to derive pleasure
from the anxieties and jealousies of their most
favoured lovers.
Miss Lewis, however, was not disposed to
push her coquetry, in this instance, to excess.
Her heart really preferred Meredith to any
other suitor, and she did not wish to sport with
his feelings so far as either to alienate them
from herself, or impel him to a serious and
hazardous
hostility with Harris. When Edward,
therefore, driven almost to desperation by her
indulgence of the familiarities of his cousin,
resolved, even at the risk of incurring her
displeasure
,
to declare to her his feelings on the
subject, and require from her an explanation
of her conduct, that he might know whether
or not, he yet possessed any place in her
regards
,
she afforded him entire satisfaction on
the subject.
I think, said she, that the relationship
existing between Harris and me, fully
sanctions
the intimacy of which you complain. At
the same time, I confess, that I have
intentionally
K 2
encouraged his attentions for the purpose
of trying the sincerity of your attachment, and
also, because I was willing to punish you for
being so easily made jealous.
Oh! Harriet, how could you take
pleasure
in giving me pain!
Mr. Meredith, said she, if you choose
to torment yourself, when I think proper to
enjoy the society of my friends, it is your own
fault. I really cannot consent to abandon the
enjoyments of social life, in order to keep you
in good temper.
You mistake me, Miss Lewis; I do not
wish such a sacrifice. But you, indeed, of late
seemed to prefer the society of Harris to
mine.
Seemed
that word is truly spoken, said
she. It was but a
seeming
preference.
Besides
you are not my cousin.
But cousins, he observed, may be lovers,
and are often dangerous playmates.
Edward! she replied, you are really
provokingly suspicious. Have I not already
made avowals sufficient to convince you of my
preference. If you are not satisfied, I assure
you I will not fall on my knees and implore
you to believe me. I have not affected to
doubt the sincerity of your professions, and I
consider it a very bad compliment to my
veracity
that you should doubt mine.
Do not be offended, Miss Lewis, said he.
It is the very ardor of my affections which
renders me anxious to have the assurance of
yours made doubly sure. But I am now
satisfied
.
I will no longer doubt that I am, in
truth,
the preferred of your heart
.
Then, since you are become reasonable
again, there is my hand, she said, smiling.
I give it in token of a sincere heart; and I
hope that, for the future, you will not permit
my civilities to my friends, to arouse your
jealousy
.
Meredith caught the beautiful hand thus
offered
to him, imprinted on it a burning kiss,
which sent blushes to the lovely countenance
of its owner, and caused her, in some confusion,
to snatch it from his grasp.
Come, come, Edward, said she, you are
too violent. Let us hasten to the company of
our friends, and appear as if we cared nothing
for each other.
You are a most teazing, most bewitching,
and endearing, lovely girl. I am, in every
thing, your slave, and must obey you, replied
Edward, now in the height of good humour
and happiness; and he accompanied her to a
brilliant evening party to which they had been
engaged. Harris was present. Miss Lewis
altered not her manner towards him. She was
as cordial and familiar with him as usual. He
often cast upon Edward a look of malicious
triumph. But Edward was now proof against
its intended effects; and the officious tormentor
was astonished and mortified to observe, that
instead of the scowl of vexation and anger,
which his exulting glances were accustomed to
extort from the writhing object of his malice,
they were now only answered with haughty
contempt or provoking indifference. On this
evening, therefore, the triumph was on the
part of Edward; and Harris, with all his
dexterity
at dissimulation, could not avoid
betraying
symptoms of discomfiture and chagrin
which did not escape the observation of Miss
Lewis; and it afforded her no small satisfaction,
especially as she saw that it was also perceived
by Edward.
CHAPTER X.
Accursed is the man who lays a snare for the innocence of a maiden;
who deceives the confiding heart of a young beauty. Neither a robber
on the highway, nor an assassin who destroys life in the dark for a
hire, nor a worker in conjurations who, for vengeful purposes, seeks
familiarity with malignant spirits, is more wicked and detestable.
Execrated by angels and men, he is a fit companion for fiends only,
that he may be the object of their mockery, and subjected to endure all
the pangs that are accumulated in the infernal store-house of torments.
Talmud
.
The next day Edward returned home, but
Harris remained in Philadelphia. They had
now in reality become too much estranged to
be either safe or pleasant companions; and
from this time, all intercourse of a friendly
nature ceased between them. Harris continued
to reside in the city; and began to entertain
serious views in regard to Miss Lewis. He
soon discovered that her heart was, in reality,
Edward's, and he was now tormented with
those pangs of jealousy, with which he had so
maliciously attempted to afflict his rival. When
he made his addresses seriously to Miss Lewis,
she became at once reserved in her conduct
towards him; and, as a lover, she no longer
admitted him to those familiarities in which,
as a relative, she had indulged him. Although
determined to persevere in his suit, for he was
confident that he should, in time, overcome
her aversion, he, for a season, left the city,
and returned to his lodgings at Dilworth.
He had several inducements for taking this
step. During his absence, Harriet's suavity
towards him might return. Meredith was
likely to be long and far separated from her;
for he was informed that his military
propensities
had, in despite of the remonstrances
of his mother and uncle, induced him to
accept
a captain's commission in the
Pennsylvania
line, and that he was preparing to join
the army under Washington. This separation
might be followed by a diminution of her
affection
for his rival and her aversion for
himself
,
which, by waiting for a proper occasion,
he might turn to his advantage. He resolved,
therefore, for the present, to abstain from
pressing
his suit, lest, by an ill-timed urgency, he
should irritate her into an irreconcileable
aversion
towards him.
But Harris had a still more powerful
motive
than this for returning to the
Brandywine
.
In love, it has been already observed
that he was a libertine. Several years of his
life had been passed in extreme profligacy and
licentiousness. He had been extravagant
almost
to bankruptcy, and had wooed pleasure to
satiety. He had escaped to America from
creditors
and courtezans, with the remnant of a
large furtune, an enfeebled frame, a languid
mind, and a half-repentant resolution. His
residence
on the banks of the Brandywine, afar from
the blandishments of vice and the seductions
of fashion, soon restored his frame to vigour,
his mind to activity, and his tastes and
inclinations
to their former voluptuous propensities.
His extravagant habits alone did not return,
for his means were less, and his temptations
fewer. Besides, it is probable that experience
had taught him the folly of that superfluous
waste which produces neither benefit nor
pleasure
administers
not to vanity, nor gratifies
desire.
One of the principal distinctions between a
virtuous lover and a voluptuary, is, that the
former concentrates all his affections and
desires
upon one object, while the latter divides
them among many. The passion of Harris
was, perhaps, as strong for Harriet Lewis as
for Mary Balantyne. His views respecting
them, however, were different. The one he
desired for his wife; the other he had selected
for his victim. Harriet was an heiress, and
the dissipation of the greater part of his own
fortune, naturally rendered him desirous of
repairing
the loss by a measure so eligible as
marrying
a rich and beautiful female whom he
passionately
loved. She was besides of that rank in
society and that elevation of character, which
rendered his attainment of her in any but an
honourable way out of the question. On
marriage
with her, therefore, if he could possibly
effect it, he had set his mind. But his designs
with respect to the humble and artless Mary
Balantyne, were more flagitiousthey were
purely sensual. They were conceived in
grossness
,
they were prosecuted with heartless
cunning
and refined deception, and they were
accomplished
with an unshrinking depravity
a remorseless villany worthy only to actuate
the heart of a demon.
The United Colonies had been declared
Independent
States. The
Great Act
of the
Great Congress
of 1776, had broken the
chains which held our New World in bondage
to the Old, and the allegiance of the West to
the East was annihilated for ever. Thousands,
therefore, whose scruples had hitherto
prevented
them from obeying the impulse of their
patriotism
,
now felt absolved from all obligations
of political duty to Great Britain, and
hastened
to encounter her armies as the enemies and
invaders of their new-born country.
On the other hand, those who were attached
to the interests of Great Britainand they were
numerous in the landbecame more zealous
than ever in her cause, expressing loudly their
indignation against the bold measures of the
times, and frequently banding together in
armed
opposition to the efforts of the young nation
so gloriously struggling into existence. The
patriots had, therefore, to contend, not with
foreign
enemies only, but with domestic traitors,
whose public hostility was often stimulated by
private malice or personal resentment, to the
commission of acts of devastation and cruelty
more revolting to humanity than any
committed
by the foreign foe.
Elias Meredith and Adam Balantyne were,
as has been already stated, both favourable to
the British cause. But they were men of peace;
and exerted all their influence to restrain the
excesses of the tory bands that infested their
neighbourhood. Elias in particular deplored
the desolations and the cruelties that were daily
taking place. His heart of late had greatly
sided with his country, although his sentiments
still continued in opposition to the measures
she had adopted.
Alas! said he to Balantyne one day, that
he visited him, after an atrocious midnight
attack
by the tories upon a whig familyour
neighbour John Barton's family has suffered
much. One of his sons has been slain, and
one of his daughters so cruelly treated that she
is not expected to live, while a great portion of
his substance has been carried off or wantonly
destroyed. The young man, Charles Harris,
with whom thee is very intimate, and for
whom I myself long entertained an esteem, is
accused of having been active in this matter,
in conjunction with James Fitzpatrick, who is
already outlawed by the new rulers. Could
L
thy advice not prevail on thy friend to leave
off practices which are unworthy of a
Christian
,
and no way beneficial, but rather
injurious
to the cause of the king, his master?
I deprecate as much as you can, the
adoption
of such sanguinary efforts to intimidate
the country into submission; for that is the
excuse assigned for these outrages, answered
Balantyne. The loyalty of Mr. Harris carries
him, I fear, too far from the path of Christian
humanity. He is over-zealous in a good cause.
I have remonstrated with him already, although
to but little purpose. I will commune with
him again on the subject, and shall endeavour
to convince him of the impolicy as well as
inhumanity
of such doings.
Friend Balantyne, observed Elias, let
me be plain with thee in the matter of this
young man. I have heard that he seeketh the
love of thy daughter who is an extremely
young damsel, and may too easily be duped
out of her affections, by a man skilled in
flattery
and artifice. If her influence over him should
enable thee to restrain his excesses, it would
be using it for a good purpose. But it behoveth
thee to watch over thy daughter's safety, lest
she be taken unaware, and become entangled
in the snares of the deceitful and the wicked.
I know your friendly motives for this
advice
,
replied Balantyne. The affection of
Mr. Harris for my daughter has not been
concealed
from me, and he has declared his
intentions
to be honourable. The extreme youth
of my daughter and the unsettled state of the
times, render me unwilling that, at the present
period, she should enter the marriage state;
and Harris has agreed not to press the affair so
far, until a more favourable juncture.
In this he evinces discretion, said Elias.
But his recent conduct makes me doubt the
soundness of his principles, as well as the
goodness of his heart. Might he not win thy
daughter's affections, and then with the
instability
of many young men who affect
gallantries
,
throw them wantonly away, and leave
her to sorrow and a broken heart. For her
sake and thy own, I wish thee to look well to
this matter.
Balantyne was struck with the earnestness
of his friend. He pressed his hand gratefully.
What you have said, he replied, has
strongly affected me. My child has, I believe,
already placed her affections on this young
man. I pray Heaven that he may be faithful.
But should he not, I will endeavour to fortify her
against the disappointment. In the mean time,
prudence requires that she should afford him
less of her society than usual, and in this
matter
I shall take care that she be circumspect.
The anxious father, accordingly, gave his
parental caution to his daughter. She heard
him with considerable emotion. To doubt the
fidelity of Charles Harris to her, after all his
ardent vows and passionate protestations of love,
was a feeling which, at the first impulse, she
could not endure. It would be, she said,
a profanation of the sacred principle of truth,
for Charles is all honour and integrityhis
promises are solemn obligations which bind
his soul, and which it is impossible for him to
break!
Oh! dear deluding power of confiding love!
How sweet are the seasons when thou presidest
over the soul, and keepest aloof, by thy
enchantments
,
all intruding views of a sorrowful
future!
Oh happy days, when youthful bosoms prove
The dear delusions of confiding love!
But, alas! such happiness is always
transitory
.
There can never again be a Paradise on
earth, else the endearing union of enamoured
hearts would, some time or other, lend a
sweetness
to the cup of life that should never be
mingled with any taint of fear, suspicion,
jealousy
,
or regret. But an oracle has said that
The course of true love never did run smooth;
and all experience has confirmed the
melancholy
assertion. Mary Balantyne could not,
at this time, be persuaded of it; but, alas, even
she, in the midst of all her blooming hopes,
was doomed to feel that love's
Sad power to generous hearts may bring
Delirious anguish on his fiery wing.
Incredulous, however, as Mary was in
relation
to the possibility of Charles withdrawing
his affections from her, her father
succeeded
in exacting from her a promise that she
would see him less frequently, and yield him
less encouragement, than heretofore. But
Balantyne's solicitude on the subject was
too great to be content with this promise,
although
he doubted not that she would fulfil it.
He determined himself to desire Harris to
discontinue his addresses, until circumstances
should render the prospect of their union more
certain.
This intimation was received by Harris with
much chagrin. His passion for Mary was in
truth one of the strongest that had ever
excited
his feelings. But it was a passion of the
senses, not of the affections. It had
comparatively
little regard for the welfare of its
object
.
Its own gratification was the great end
at which it aimed; and for this it longed with
an importunate and burning desire.
Harris, notwithstanding his utter
regardlessness
of moral obligations, and his general
indifference
respecting the consequences of his
actions to others, had yet so much
consideration
L 2
for the innocence and happiness of this
sweet girl, as often caused him to pause in the
contemplation of his designs against her
purity
.
But these hesitations in the pursuit of
crime were with him, though frequent, but
feeble
.
Like meteors in a midnight storm, they
gleamed amidst the dark tumult, but were
unable
to check its course.
Balantyne's interference produced some
restraint
on the intercourse of the lovers. Mary,
as she had promised, for several weeks
avoided
the places where they had been accustomed
to meet; and Harris respected the mandate of
her father, so far as not to be guilty of any
observable intrusion on her society. They
sometimes met, but it was in the presence of
others, and apparently by accident; and the
timidity
of Mary on such occasions, always drove
her from the scene as soon as propriety would
permit.
This forbearance on the part of Harris, though
partly owing to the compunctious visitings just
mentioned, were chiefly occasioned by the
troubled
state of the country, which gave him
constant
occupation in arranging and directing the
marauding enterprises of some bands of tories
which he was commissioned by Sir William
Howe to organize in the neighbourhood of the
Brandywine. But the militia of the country
soon became so well trained to the duty of
hunting down these marauders, that wherever
they appeared, they were attacked and
dispersed
,
and pursued with retaliating fury,
until
they were too much weakened or
intimidated
to continue their nefarious practices.
The services of Harris to the royal cause
being
no longer available in this mode of
warfare
,
about the latter end of October, Sir
William
Howe appointed him to the command of
a troop of cavalry attached to the main army,
which he was required to join without delay.
On receiving Sir William's orders, he felt
much regret at being obliged to leave the
vicinity
of Mary Balantyne's residence, and he
determined not to depart, until he should
obtain
an interview with her, and, if possible,
accomplish
the great object of his unhallowed
desires. An interview was easily obtained; for
the affectionate Mary, when informed of his
intended departure, became feverishly anxious
once more to be with him, that she might gaze
upon his beloved countenance, and receive from
his impassioned lips, the farewell assurance of
his lasting love.
The meeting took place in a secluded spot,
about a quarter of a mile from Balantyne's
residence
.
It was on the bank of a streamlet
that gurgled briskly beneath the intermingling
branches of the weeping willow. All around
the spot the trees and undergrowth grew so tall
and close as to form an umbrageous canopy
which screened it from the glaring beams of
day, and also rendered it inaccessible to the
approach of any intruder, save by one narrow
and winding path made by the cattle in
passing
to the rivulet for drink. A short distance
from where this path crossed the stream,
Harris
had formed, upon a dry and grassy portion
of the bank, a small arbour among the willows;
and here it was that he had first openly
revealed
his passion for Mary, and had frequently
withdrawn with her from the world, in order
to repeat the tale of his love. Mary, all
guiltless
and innocent as she was, saw no harm, and
could dream of no danger in these sweet and
happy interviews with the man she loved; and
Harris, as yet, had never ventured either by
word or deed, to alarm her delicacy. With a
confiding but palpitating heart, therefore, she
stole from her father's side on this fatal
evening
;
and as unsuspicious of guile as a lamb
going
to the slaughter, she hastened to the arms
of her betrayer.
Harris having reached the arbour some time
before her, his mind became occupied in
contemplating
the deed he was about to commit;
and wicked and callous-hearted as he was,
when he reflected on its direful consequences
to the beautiful and innocent being who was to
be its victim, and who loved him so tenderly,
it is no wonder that he felt frequent
compunctions
,
and wavered in his guilty purpose. Oh!
that some kind accident had prevented the victim
from coming to the sacrifice, the very fiend
who longed for the unhallowed oblation, would
have had cause to rejoice in his disappointment.
But the victim came. It was one of those
serene and balmy evenings whose softness is so
peculiar to a Pennsylvanian Indian summer, and
when, in the words of a Pennsylvanian poet,
A sacred feeling, grateful and serene,
At nature's cheering gray and fading green,
O'er man's pleased soul enlivening influence throws,
As oft life's lamp burns brighter at its close.
In such delicious evenings the very elements
seem to conspire with the softening influence
of love, to render the heart yielding, and to
diffuse through the touched frame the warm
thrillings of mysterious desire. Harris soon
perceived the approach of the beauteous
object
of his wishes. She advanced lightly and
timidly, with a fluttering heart, like a
fascinated
bird which rushes into the power of the
wily serpent that allures it to destruction.
* * * He enfolded her to his hearthe
poured vows of everlasting fidelity into her
ear, and on this eve of a long separation, she
could not refuse to interchange them. An
impetuous
,
burning, long-continued kiss, in which
an interchange of souls seemed also to have
taken place, sealed the compact.
We are now one! he exclaimed. We
are now united in the sight of Heaven and of
angels; and neither religion, virtue, nor nature
require the cold and cumbersome formalities
of men to confirm our solemn nuptials, or
render
holy our most rapturous and impassioned
caresses.
His sophistical eloquence flowed like
intoxicating
poison into her ears. She replied not. A
spella delirium had come upon her. He
pressed
her to his bosom. Instinctive modesty was once
more awakened. She attempted to repel him
But she was overcomeshe was
undone
. The
sun went down upon their guilty loves, and
gathering darkness enveloped a scence which
had become accursed by the ruin of innocence.
Alas! how changed now were the feelings
of Mary Balantyne? With what horror did
her thoughts revolve upon what she had
become
?
The spell that had enwrapt her senses
was over. The intoxication of impassioned
love was gone. The faculty of reason had
returned
to her mind, and she saw that she had
fallen from a high and happy state of purity
and a good conscience, into crime, pollution,
degradation, and unabating self-condemnation.
Absorbed in these appalling reflections, and
viewing her situation with astonishment and
horror, she remained silent for many minutes
after the completion of her ruin, as if she was
afraid to hear the sound of her own voice,
now become the voice of a sinner.
Harris beheld the agony of her mind. He
saw the desolation he had producedthe
irretrievable
ruin he had brought upon one of the
loveliest of the daughters of men.
Hard-hearted
as he was, he could not but pity her, and
he almost regretted the triumph he had gained.
He attempted to comfort her; but she seemed not
to hear him, for she answered not. At length
utterance came to her, and she exclaimed
Oh! God! have I lived for this! I am a
wretcha guilty wretch!Oh! my father
my father!Oh! Charles, what have you
brought me to! Oh! pity me, and lead me
to the presence of my father, and let our
nuptials
be instantly solemnized, or I shall go
mad!
She caught his arm to led him onward. He
saw the frenzy of her soul, and felt the
stirrings
of pity, so that he resisted her not. He
supported her homewards, till they came near
to her father's house. He then stopped
suddenly
.
His heart had recovered all its selfish
feelings and habitual callousness.
Mary, said he, we must part here.
Never! she cried; Oh, never shall we
part, until in the presence of men, you
acknowledge
me to be your wife, and prevent my
heart from breaking.
Mary, he said, you know not the
insurmountable
obstacles that are, at present, in
the way of such an acknowledgment. Insist
not on it.It cannot be.
What! she exclaimed bitterly; and will
you leave me deserted amidst the ruin you
have brought upon me!Oh! Charlesdear
Charles, you will not. She threw herself on
her knees before her despoiler; she caught him
by the arm, and looked imploringly upon his
face. Oh! I entreat thee, she said, by the
love I have lavished upon thee, and by all thy
hopes of mercy from Heaven, to do me justice,
and save me from distraction! If thou hatest
me, I will not ask thee to live with me. Only
do me justice! and thou mayest forsake me the
moment after, if thou canst be so cruel.
Upon my soul, he replied, I pity thee
from my heart, and I will deceive thee no
longer. Marry thee I never can. I have
another
,
a higher and more eligible object in view.
Thou hast deserved better treatment from me,
I confess. But I was impelled to what I have
done, by the irresistible fascinations of thy
beauty. I exonerate thee from blame; yet as
I know thou art polluted, neither honour,
interest
,
nor feeling will permit me to join my
fate with thine.
Then, she cried wildly, and with an
energy which astonished him, perdition is
thine, for Heaven will assuredly avenge me!
Ha! he exclaimed, dost thou threaten
me? The wind of summer might as well
try to shake the immoveable fastness of the
everlasting hills, as thou to frighten me into a
marraige with thee. Our interview to-night
began in love; it now terminates in hatred;
and our intercourse ends for ever!
So saying he rudely separated himself from
her and departed.
Not for ever! she cried hysterically,
nonowe shall yet again meet! She
hurried
to her father's house. As she approached she
saw his revered figure through one of the
windows
.
She shrieked, and ran deliriously to the
steps that led to the door, where she fainted and
fell. Her father having discovered her
absence
,
but ignorant of where she had gone,
was anxiously awaiting her return. He heard
her shriek, he knew her voice; in alarm he
hastened to the door. He raised her in his
arms; he carried her in. Assistance was soon
procured. Proper means for restoring her
were resorted to. She recovered; but it was
to a life of distraction and misery. Not
happiness
only, but hope itself, the last earthly
comfort which lingers in the troubled mind,
had forsaken her; and despondency took
possession
of her soul.
Still she had a tie on earth. There still
remained
to her, amidst her desolation, one
individual
in whose happiness she felt interested;
7 M
and for whose sake, hopeless as she was, she
resisted the suggestions of despair. That
individual
was her father, whose life seemed
bound up in hers. Before her recovery, great
was his perplexity to know the cause of her
distress; and as soon as she could converse, he
anxiously questioned her on the subject. An
instinctive reluctance to make known her
degradation
,
prevented her from revealing it, even
before her mind became sufficiently calm for
reflection. When she could reflect, however,
upon the course she ought to pursue, the
affliction
into which a knowledge of the truth would
plunge her father, and a persuasion that no
advantage
could result from its communication,
determined her to withhold it. She knew that
to no species of disgrace would her father be
so sensitive as to that which she had suffered.
To inform him of it, would totally destroy the
comfort of his remaining days; perhaps, even
bring him with sorrow to a premature grave.
But how account for the distress into which
she had fallen, and the grief under which she
continued to labour, and which it was beyond
her power to conceal? Her father's solicitude
rendered him pressing in his inquiries. Total
silence would be considered perversity, and
might give rise to suspicions as dreadful as
the truth. Ought she to deceive her father?
Ought she to invent a fiction, and relate an
untruth
?
It was an alternative to which no
selfish
consideration could induce her to stoop.
But on this occasion prudential suggestions and
filial affection came in aid of the feelings of
self. Yet positive falsehood she was
determined
to avoid. She told part of the trying tale.
She confessed that she had held an interview
with Harristhat she had stepped beyond the
limits of delicacy and pressed him to the
solemnization
of their nuptials before his
departure
that
he had insulted and abused her, and
left her abruptly with a declaration that he
loved her no longer, and would hold no more
intercourse with herthat the rudeness of his
manner had thrown her into the state in which
her father had found her, and that the shock
she had sustained in the disappointment of her
fondest hopes and the disseverment of her
dearest affections, continued to prey upon her
spirits, and produced the despondency under
which she now laboured.
In this season of affliction, the good Elias
did not desert his friend. His consoling
attentions
were given with the kindness of a
brother
,
and his counsels with the wisdom of a
sage.
Thy daughter, said he, has had a
fortunate
escape from an inseparable connexion with
a villain. The discovery of his depravity may
for awhile occasion her bitter feelings; but time
and pious reflections are remedies which
seldom
fail to cure such sorrows as hers. Cheer
her, therefore, and strengthen her mind by
the precepts of that religion of which thee
was once a public teacher, and fear not, but thee
will yet see her contented and happy.
Alas! little did Elias or Balantyne imagine
that the sorrows of the unfortunate Mary
sprung from a source productive of deeper and
more permanent distress than could ever arise
from the failure of even love's sweet hopes.
Little did either of them suppose that the
sharp gnawings of conscious degradationof
shame and remorse for the loss of innocence
and purity which nothing could restorewere
the venomed furies that corroded her heart,
and from the tortures of which all the stores
of earthly consolation could afford her no
relief
.
CHAPTER XI.
The darkest moment just precedes the dawn.
And the fiercest blast the commencement of tranquillity;
So when the fever is at its height, the crisis is at hand;
And as soon as the severest pang has been felt recovery begins.
Zoroaster
.
The most gloomy period of the
Revolutionary
struggle had now arrived. After the
defeat
at Long Island and the capture of
New-York
,
a series of disasters befell the patriotic
cause, which formed the dark season that has
been emphatically termed,
the time that tried
men's souls
. The great object of the enemy
was to obtain possession of Philadelphia, the
capital of the Union, the seat of Congress, and
the place from which it drew its chief resources.
The invaders had overrun the Jerseys, and had
pushed their advanced posts as far as Trenton.
The army of Washington, the only force
opposed
to their further progress, had dwindled,
by the combined effects of defeats, desertions,
and the expiration of the enlistment of many
regiments at this critical juncture, to very little
more than two thousand men, and these were
destitute of almost all the necessary equipments
of an army.
But the regular histories of the country have
dwelt largely and pathetically on the woful
condition and sad prospects of America at this
M 2
midnight of her calamities. On the zeal, the
prudence, the perseverance and the skill of one
man alone, did the patriotic and unwavering
Congress, and all who despaired not yet of the
destinies of the country, rely, under Providence,
for safety and final deliverance from their
calamities
.Need
that man be named here?
The hearts of Americans will answer, No;
we know our guardian was
Washington
.
As a measure of prudence, Congress had
removed
from Philadelphia to the town of York;
and Washington, with the small devoted band
of heroes that still adhered to him, hovered on
the Pennsylvania side of the Delaware,
determined
to dispute the passage of that river with
the whole force of the enemy, in defence of the
city.
At this juncture the inhabitants of
Philadelphia
were not wanting in exertions. A supply
of clothing, arms and ammunition, was given to
the almost destitute army, and citizens to the
number of fifteen hundred enrolled themselves
in the ranks of their defenders. These supplies
inspired the mind of Washington with
renewed
energy; and he conceived the design of
striking a blow which might revive the
drooping
spirits of the country, and perhaps turn
the balance of fortune in her favour.
It was on the evening of the twenty-third
of December, 1776, that Edward Meredith
received
a summons from Washington, to attend
him at his quarters without delay. Edward
obeyed, and, in a few minutes, was in the
presence
of his illustrious commander.
Captain Meredith, said the chief, I am
aware of your zeal for the great cause in which
we are embarked, and my estimation of your
prudence and courage will be amply proved by
the proposal I am about to make. You know
the deplorable condition to which our army is
reduced, and the danger to which our chief
city is exposed. If under the present
circumstances
,
that city should fall into the hands
of the enemy, the courage of our firmest friends
may fail, our reputation abroad may fatally
suffer, and our cause be ruined. To avert such
a catastrophe, are you willing to undertake the
performance of a piece of very dangerous
duty?
Perfectly willing, replied Meredith,
elated
with the idea that Washington had thought
him worthy of being selected for such a
purpose. In obeying your excellency's
orders, I will not shrink from any danger
whatever.
Heaven bless you, said the chief, and
protect you in the enterprise which, I trust,
will result in the rescue of your country from
her present state of distress and despondency.
The advanced post of the enemy is at Trenton.
I wish to know its strength and the nature of
the position it occupies. If it be such as will
warrant an attack, I am seized with a strong
desire to carry it, either by surprise or by
storm. Our success will, at this moment, be
attended with incalculable advantages to our
cause. You must undertake the dangerous
office
of a spy, whether in the character of a
deserter
,
or in the disguise of a tory, I leave
it with yourself to determine. But you must
endeavour, by to-morrow evening, to bring me
such information as will enable me to adopt
the best measures for succeeding in my
design
.
I am proud of this mark of the confidence
of your Excellency, replied Meredith, and
your will shall be obeyed.
Meredith disguised himself as an elderly
farmer
of the Quaker persuasion, a character
which he could without difficulty sustain, and
which, he conceived, would subject him much
less to interrogation, than that of a deserter.
He passed up the Pennsylvania side of the
river
.
When nearly opposite Trenton, he
purchased
,
at a farm-house, some turkies, with
which, on the morning of Christmas eve he
crossed the Delaware, and appeared in the
Trenton market. His poultry being of a choice
description, was soon purchased by some
Hessian
and British officers, who ordered him to
carry it to the barracks. He obeyed, and
falling
into conversation with a communicative
British soldier, he soon obtained all the
information
he required.
He now left the town by the road leading
up the river, in order to avoid suspicion of
having come from below. He had proceeded
but a short distance, when he met a small
party
of light horse, who had been foraging,
guarding a wagon loaded with provisions,
which was driven by a countryman towards
the town. As they approached, he knew one of the
horsemen to be his cousin, Harris. He hastened
into the adjoining wood, to avoid too near a
contact with one who might recognise him.
To his great consternation, the party called
after
him, and ordered him to stand still. The
wood being close, he determined to trust to
that circumstance and his own dexterity in
penetrating it, for safety, rather than encounter
the risk of an investigation in the presence of
an enemy who personally knew him.
Instantly
half a dozen bullets were sent into the
wood after him, but happily the trees
effectually
sheltered him from injury.
A damned rebel, I'll warrant him, although
a Quaker, cried one of the horsemen; but
I'll catch him: and he hastened into the woods
on foot in pursuit. Meredith, however, was as
nimble as he, and feared not to be overtaken.
But he soon came unexpectedly to the edge of
a high precipice that beetled over the river,
and over which he had no alternative but to
leap or await his pursuer. He preferred the
latter
,
having but little fear of facing one individual,
since he was secretly armed with a pistol and
a small dagger. His pursuer he knew to be
Harris. He had a reluctance to take his life;
but it was necessary for his own safety, as well
as for the success of his enterprise, that he
should disable him. He threw himself down
behind the trunk of a large fallen tree, that was
convenient. Harris approaching hastily and
incautiously
,
soon received a pistol-ball in one of
his legs, which broke it, and he fell. At the
same moment he discharged his pistol, but its
contents were arrested by the tree behind
which Meredith had taken shelter. The
latter
spoke not, but hurried to the next
farm-house
,
where meeting with a young lad, he
sent him to the aid of Harris, and without
more delay or obstruction re-crossed the river.
Another hour brought him into the presence of
Washington, who thus gained the requisite
intelligence
,
which enabled him to form the
judicious
and well-timed measure which resulted
in the capture of the Hessians and British at
Trenton, an exploit, whose brilliance broke like
the first dawning of a glorious day, upon the
darkness which had so long overshadowed the
American cause.
It would be encroaching on the province of
regular history to detail the series of
successful
exploits performed by the army of
Washington
,
after the spell of misfortune was thus
broken by the victory at Trenton. The defeat
of the enemy at Princeton soon followed, and
the whole of the Jerseys were in a short time
freed from the presence of the invaders, who
being driven from post to post, were compelled
to take shelter in their fastnesses on Staten
Island
,
or in New York.
At the battle of Princeton, however, an
incident
occurred which it is proper here to
relate
.
The enemy had broken and victory had
declared for the American cause, when it fell
to the lot of Meredith at the head of his troop
to pursue some retreating British cavalry. The
rugged and wooded nature of the country
compelled
the fugitives, and consequently the
pursuers
,
to separate into small parties, each
taking
different directions. An officer whom
Meredith
had kept particularly in view as one
worthy of capture, at the bottom of a hill, darted
suddenly into the woods by an obscure path on
the left. Meredith followed singly, calling on
the fugitive to surrender. But the latter
continued
his flight, until his horse stumbled and
threw him. The Briton, now on foot,
discharged
a pistol at Meredith, whose horse received
its contents in his head and instantly fell. Both
riders being now dismounted, looked at each
other for some moments. The fire-arms of
neither being loaded, they were about joining
combat with their swords, when a voice known
to both called on them to forbear. The next
moment
Francis Holmes rode in between them.
I call upon you, said he, not to shed
kindred blood. Sir Robert Radnor, your
antagonist
is the son of the lady of your first
love, and he has done you no personal injury.
True, returned Sir Robert. His father
ran away with Matilda. But he is not
responsible
for his father's acts.
But, Sir Robert, you are responsible for
your own, observed Meredith, and I now
demand satisfaction for my mother's wrongs?
Hush, cried Francis, I forbid hostilities
of every kind. Ye are kinsmen and must not
fight. He who first attacks the other, shall
have me also for his foe.
Let Sir Robert surrender as a prisoner of
war, cried Meredith, and I shall sheathe
my sword.
Never! shouted Sir Robert.
I forbid that also! said Francis.
Remember
,
Mr. Meredith, I too am in the king's
service, and you will scarcely be able to
capture
us both; for if battle must be, I must fight
in behalf of my own party.
Let the youngster become our prisoner!
cried Sir Robert. We are two to one, and
it would be disgraceful to permit his escape.
I think not so, said Francis; it would
be magnanimity. Public duty does not always
require the sacrifice of private friendship. Take
my hand, Mr. Meredith, I am, on your
mother's
account, your friend; and, in Heaven's
name, let us have no bloodshed at present.
Meredith's good-nature, added to the
necessity
which he now saw he was under of
yielding
,
prevailed, and he cordially took the hand
which was extended to him, after which he
exchanged
a short salutation with his kinsman,
and departed. His horse having been killed,
he was obliged to retrace his way to the main
road on foot. He had scarcely gained it, when
he was overtaken by Francis.
I come, said the latter, to inquire
whether
,
if I surrender myself as your prisoner,
you will permit me to live in peace, on my
parole, and, if you think proper, under your
protection, in the vicinity of your residence on
the Brandywine?
I shall accept your surrender on those
terms, replied Meredith, but with the
warning
,
that if you should, in any manner, attempt
to injure our cause by communicating any
information
relative to us to the enemy, I will
not promise you safety. Spies have been of
late repeatedly detected in our camp, and have
more than once died for their temerity.
N
I declare by the honour of a soldier and
the faith of a Christian, returned Francis, that
I harbour against your cause no sinister design
whatever, and that I never shall be tempted
to turn your betrayer. I come to you in truth
and sincerity. I am tired of war. I long for
tranquillity. Sir Robert and I have not been
the most cordial friends for some time past;
and he has just hinted that his duty would
compel him to report at head-quarters, my
interference
to prevent your being made
prisoner
,
the issue of which report I have no great
desire to abide. I, therefore, knowing his
fire-arms
to be unloaded, watched an opportunity
when he had gained some distance on the path
before me, to wheel suddenly about, gallop
after you, and make to you the proposal you
have heard. I shall fight no more against you;
but I must stipulate that I shall not be
compelled
to fight against my own country.
I guarantee to you perfect freedom from
any such compulsion, said Meredith. You
were the friend of my mother. You shall, if
you please, reside with her. In these
dangerous
times, your vigilance and activity may
contribute to her protection in my absence. I
shall, therefore, deem your presence in her
household, of much importance; and am
pleased
at the good fortune which has thrown you
in my way as a friend, for I shall take
care to prevent your being considered a
prisoner
.
Your proposal charms me, replied
Francis
.
I know not in what better terms to
express
the satisfaction it affords me than to say
that, from your father himself, if he were alive,
I could desire no greater instance of
friendship
.
But Francis, observed Edward, let me
ask how a man of your peaceful habits, came
to leave his home,for I believe you wrote
once to my mother that you were about
domesticating
in New York,to follow the rude
and tumultuous trade of a soldier in active
service?
Ah! that scheme of domestication,
replied
Francis, turned out an awkward affair.
In fact, the damsel jilted me. But happily I
had only imagined myself in love, and,
therefore
,
as I soon discovered my mistake, I did
not much grieve for the misfortune. I left New
York, however, on account of it, and went to
Boston, where I became a sort of military
attendant
upon my old master, Sir Robert
Radnor
,
the hardness of whose steel I prevented
you from feeling to-day.
You saved him from feeling the hardness
of mine, I believe, said Edward; but of
that, enough.You perceive that, at present,
we have won the day. We must now hasten
to report ourselves to our commander.
Edward and Francis were soon in the
presence
of Washington.
Ah! you have made a captive? said the
chief.
No; replied Meredith, this is a personal
friend, who being tired of war, has voluntarily
surrendered himself to me, on condition that
I should obtain for him permission to live at
peace amongst us, as a neutral. I accepted of
the terms, and now ask your excellency's
confirmation
of them.
Beware of spies! said Washington. They
have become rather numerous of late.
I pledge myself for the sincerity of this
man, replied Meredith. He is an old
family
favourite, and is too honest for the
business
of a spy.
Enough, returned Washington. Be it
as you wish. I have full confidence in your
recommendation. Besides, you have a right to
ask and receive from me a much greater
favour
than this.
Francis received his passports, and in a few
days had the pleasure of delivering to Mrs.
Meredith a cheerful and very welcome letter
from her son, and of being settled as an
inmate
of her family.
CHAPTER XII.
Callous to the best feelings of humanity, must be his heart, who
would not grieve for the premature doom of a young and beautiful
woman. What then must be the depraved condition of his nature, who
could deliberately devise that doom and barbarously persevere in
effecting
it?
Wharton
.
It could not be considered peculiar to Adam
Balantyne, that bitters and sweets had mingled
in the cup of his life, for in whose life-cup have
they not mingled? But the predominance of the
bitters over the sweets had in his been
unusually
great: nay; the bitters had, at one time,
been so intense as almost to extinguish every
perception of the sweets. One ingredient only
remained to soften and ameliorate their venom,
and enable him to tolerate existence,it was
his daughter. Her caresses were the balm that
soothed his afflictionsher smiles the sun-shine
that dispersed the clouds of his despair. To this
daughter, therefore, he was attached with parental
ties more than ordinarily strong. From her alone
he drew comfort, and for her sake alone did he
feel it desirable to live. All his thoughts, his
anxieties, his prayers, were for her, and on her
welfare depended all his earthly happiness;
and alas! through her that happiness was
doomed
to be blasted for ever.
As the summer of 1777 advanced, the
depression
N 2
which, since her last fatal interview
with Harris, weighed down the spirits of Mary
Balantyne, visibly increased. In vain did her
anxious
parent endeavour to discover the cause of
this aggravation of her affliction. She carefully
concealed it. She seldom appeared in company,
and when she did, the paleness and pensive
expression of her countenance, and the
thoughtful
abstraction of her manner, indicated the
terrible devastation which some unknown grief
was making upon her heart.
Her father seldom left her at this period.
But being one day invited to visit his friend,
Elias, she urged him to comply, alleging that
any means by which his mind could be even
temporarily diverted from its present solicitude,
would tend to relieve her own sorrows. He
yielded to her wishes, and set out for the
residence
of his kind-hearted neighbour. The
unhappy state of the times formed the
engrossing
topic of conversation between these two
men of peace, and domestic calamities were
for a time forgot in the all-absorbing subject of
the fierce war that surrounded them. It was
drawing towards the evening, but the friends
had not yet thought of parting, when one of
Balantyne's servants suddenly entered the
chamber where they sat, and almost breathless
with haste and terror, informed them that Miss
Balantyne was dying.
The alarmed father hastened home. He flew
to the chamber of his daughter. She was not
quite dead, but she was oppressed with a heavy
and overpowering stupor which had paralyzed
all her faculties, and rendered her powerless
and inert. She was in fact fast approaching to
a state of utter insensibility. The vital spark
seemed quivering on the verge of entire and
absolute extinction.
Oh! my daughter, what has occasioned this
dreadful stroke! cried the heart-pierced father
as he bent imploringly over her, where she lay
speechless on the couch of sorrow. Speak,
my dear child; speak to thy fatherOh! say,
what has caused this new calamity? Heaven
save thee, my beloved, my innocent child,
he continued, as he observed that she languidly
made signs of being conscious of his presence.
He caught her hand, she feebly pressed it.
Her lips moved in the articulation of some low
sounds. He bent to hear them. He thought
she mentioned her writing desk. He hurried
to it. On opening it, he found the following
letter.
My Dear Father
,
I can live no longer. My life has
been for some months but one continued
paroxysm
of mental agony. My existence much
longer would bring upon you the most
indelible
and unmitigable disgrace that could, by a
daughter, be inflicted on a father. My last
interview
with Harris proved
fatal to my
honour
.
He ruined me, and then abandoned me
for ever.That interview! alas, it was a stolen
one, unknown to you, and granted at his
entreaty
contrary to your injunctions. Oh! how
I have been punished for my disobedience!
No one has as yet perceived the effects of my
guilt in the alteration of my person. But in
a short time it would become too apparent
for concealment. Then, then, my father, you
would be disgraced for ever; and were I to
live, I would see you dying broken-hearted
and I the cause! But I will not live to witness
such a calamity. In opium there is power to
destroy
life, by lulling the senses into lethargy
and dissolving the springs of animation. I have
provided myself with the precious drug which
is to relieve me for ever from that load of
earthly misery which has become too great for
me longer to endure. Farewell, my beloved
father. Oh! do not curse me when I shall be
dead, for my last prayer to Heaven shall
ascend
for thee.
The wretched father scarcely took time to
read through this letter, every word of which
sent a venomed dagger to his heart and a
burning
arrow through his brain.
Leave me and my daughter together,
said he to the attendants in this chamber of
grief. I alone shall witness the extinction
of her life.
He was obeyed. He locked the
chamber-door
inside, and, for several hours, poured forth
his agonized feelings alone, or was overheard
only by superior beings, who, even in their
happy sphere, could not but feel sorrow for
the incalculable weight of misery which he
bore. At length the servants were admitted,
and he gave orders in relation to his
daughter's
funeral with a calmness that surprised
them, and which they ascribed to that fearful
lassitude which is often induced by despair. He
then sent for his friend Elias, who instantly
obyed the summons.
I have at length, said he to his friend,
drunk of sorrow to the very dregs of the
cup. Life has now no charm for me; yet for
one purposeinquire not what that iswill I
endure it.
What the purpose is that thee would
conceal
,
it is not my part to inquire, replied
Elias. But I know thy principles to be good,
and that as a Christian thee dost fear thy
Maker. I hope, therefore, that great as thy
sufferings
are, thee will remember the duty of
submission which is incumbent on all rational
creatures, to the great Creator, who can
produce
light out of darkness, and turn even our
calamities into blessings.
I am grateful for the consolation thou
wouldst afford, replied Balantyne, for I
know thy friendship is sincere. But my
knowledge
that the wretchedness of this life cannot
last long is my chief consolation. I am unfit,
at present, to attend to my worldly affairs.
Wilt thou undertake their management for a
few days, and see that all things in relation to
my daughter's funeral be decently
conducted
?
Elias readily consented to charge himself
with the task thus entrusted to him. I have
another request to make, said Balantyne. You
may think it an extraordinary one; but I wish
greatly to be indulged in it. I desire to be
permitted to remain in the chamber with my
daughter's corpse, after her shroud and coffin
are provided, with no attendant but Francis
Holmes, who, I doubt not, will readily wait
on me on this melancholy occasion.
Francis agreed without hesitation to watch
with the afflicted father over the corpse of his
daughter. He had, ever since his coming to
reside in the neighbourhood, cultivated the
friendship, and had gained much of the
confidence
of Balantyne. In their political
sentiments
and aversion to war, they perfectly
agreed; and in the misfortunes of his new
friend, Francis truly sympathized. Balantyne
had, on his part, imbibed such a high opinion
of the shrewdness, activity and management
of Francis, as well as confidence in his zeal to
serve him, that he selected him on the present
occasion as the companion who could most
readily enter into his feelings, and effect the
performance of his wishes.
When Francis arrived, he found Balantyne
sitting alone, according to his wish, by the side
of the corpse. The latter immediately secured
the door.
Francis, said he, I will now entrust you
with a secret which you must
never
reveal.
Will you in compassion to a man bereaved of
all earthly happiness, promise me, by the faith
and honour of a virtuous bosom, that you
never
will?
I promise you, replied Francis, without
hesitation, for I know that you will ask me
to keep no secret which it would be my duty
reveal.
Then read that heart-rending letter, and
see the extent of my misery, and of a
heartless
villain's guilt. So saying, he handed him
the letter which he had found in his
daughter's
writing-desk.
He is, indeed, a fiend in human form, who
has done this! exclaimed Francis on reading
the letter. Justice demands that he should
be punished.
Yes; yes! cried the distracted father, with
a deep groan. Surely vengeance on such a
wretch must have the sanction of Heaven. Oh!
my heart burns for vengeance on the destroyer
of my lovelymy tendermy unoffending
daughter! I shall never know rest until I
have satisfaction for the terrible desolation he
has brought upon me.
But how!what do you contemplate
against him? asked Francis coolly. How
can you bring him to justice? You have
already
suffered much for pushing revenge to
the extent of bloodshed.
For taking away a human life, I have
indeed
been made miserable, replied Balantyne,
thoughtfully.Nono, I will not slay
him.
What then? Will you apply to his
commander
for justice? asked Francis.
It were needless, returned Balantyne.
My accusation would be disregarded, and
my child's shame made known.
For the same reason, you dare not in any
manner, expose her destroyer's infamy to the
world. How then do you propose to punish
him?
Alas! I know not! returned the
disconsolate
father. Leave me for the present. I
am bewildered with grief. I am heart-broken
and distracted. In half an hour, let us confer
again.
Francis retired, and the unhappy Balantyne
throwing himself on a couch, gave vent, in
unwitnessed
tears, to the sorrows that preyed upon
his heart. These tears were the first he had
shed since this last calamity had assailed him.
They afforded him some reliefthey
moderated
the fever that was burning in his brain
and giving delirium to his thoughts. When
Francis returned, he found him much more
collected, and better qualified to reason on the
course of life he should pursue. That course
was soon determined on; and Francis
engaged
to adhere to him in its prosecution as a
friend, an adviser, and assistant. My own
concerns, said he, require but little of my
attention. Your life has been hitherto a
path-way
of thorns which have sorely wounded
you; and now, alas, they pierce you to the
quick. I feel for you too strongly to refuse
my aid amidst your distress. On my fidelity
and attention you may rely; and whatever
consolation
it may be, at any time, in my power
to bestow, shall freely and zealously be yours.
Write thenwrite immediately to the
destroyer
,
an account of the awful result of his
villany, said Balantyne. Let him feel, as
soon as possible, the tortures of remorse, if he
be capable of feeling them. I have endured
remorse
,
and know the terrible severity of its
gnawings. If he has the conscience or the
O
heart of a human being, he will never know
earthly happiness after he receives
information
of the destruction he has brought on her
who trusted in him and who loved him. Haste,
therefore, to write. It is but justice to make
him miserable without delay.
Mary Balantyne had been beloved by every
one who knew her. Even the maidens who
envied her beauty, were propitiated by the
kindness and gentleness of her manners; and,
as for the youths of her acquaintance, they had
always been unanimious in their respect for her
virtue and admiration of her loveliness. Her
premature death was, therefore, greatly
lamented
;
and her bier was accompanied to the grave
by a numerous assemblage of real mourners.
Among these, there was one young man who
felt more deeply than the rest. He had long
loved her with a passion as ardent,
disinterested
and constant, as ever burned in a lover's
bosom. But she did not return his affection.
Perhaps she had been too young when he first
declared itperhaps he was too timid and
reserved
to press his suit with sufficient ardour
or perhapsBut why attempt the vain task of
accounting for the caprice of a young maiden's
fancy who knows that she is handsome, and
who feels that she is born to be admired? Mary
Balantyne could and did accord to William
Barton, her most cordial esteem, but her love
alas! it was fated to be bestowed upon one
who deserved it not; one who abused the
precious
boon and, without compunction, destroyed
the beauteous donor. And such men have been
on earth; yea, such are even now to be found
on its polluted surface, mingling unblushingly,
and unmarked as villains, among their
fellow-men
!
Oh, Heaven! forgive those who,
knowing
that such things are, wonder at thy
forbearing
to lift the arm of vengeance to
extirpate
the wretches from the limits of thy fair
creation!
William Barton was the son of that John
Barton whose sufferings from tory atrocities
have already been noticed as awakening the
sympathies and indignation of Elias and
Balantyne
.
He had been long a favourite pupil
of the latter, and from the earliest dawn of his
affections he had placed them entirely on the
fascinating Mary. She was his dream by night,
and his contemplation by day. She was in
truth all he could fancy of female loveliness
and perfection. And although unable to elicit
reciprocal feelings in her bosom, he was not
the less ardently devoted to her as the sole
idol of his earthly worship.
During the funeral he was the object of
universal but respectful commiseration; and
after all others had withdrawn from the grave,
he remained alone there to weep over the
hallowed
spot. The observant eyes of Francis
Holmes beheld him, and when all the people
were gone, and solitude and silence once more
surrounded the place, he approached him.
Forgive my interruption of your sorrows,
young man, said he. Believe me, I
sympathize
with you, and approach you in friendship,
and with an earnest desire to administer to
you consolation.
Can you restore to my sight the fair being
who lies beneath this earth? said the mourner.
If you cannot, you will try to console me in
vain. When she lived, I loved her too well
for my own happiness: and over her grave I
may be permitted to mourn at the early
extinction
of those charms on which I have so
often gazed with rapture, but which, alas! I
shall behold no more.
William Barton, you are reputed to be a
valliant and active youth, returned Francis,
and such I should expect, would not give
way to unavailing sorrow. I have heard of
your bold enterprises against the tory bands
that lately infested this neighbourhood, and
have been informed that you have taken from
them ample satisfaction for the injury they
inflicted
on your father's family. One of them
he too who dealt the blow against your
kindred
was
the destroyer of your love
Ha! name him not! interrupted Barton.
His very name is torture to me.
Would you have him brought to a sense
of his wickedness? Would you make him feel
how much he has injured you? Would you
wish him punished for his villany towards her
you loved, and have lost for ever? said
Francis
.
Ask him who is weary, if he will have
resthim who is hungry, if he will have food,
or the thirsty man, if he will accept of a
cooling
draught. Yes; bring the destroyer only
within my reach, and I shall be satisfied.
Meet me to-night at the house of the
father
of your lost Mary, and you will learn that
which will yield consolation to you both in
your present affliction. I will explain no
further
now. But fail not to come, and you shall
have comfort.
I would avoid that venerable man in his
present distress, observed Barton, lest the
presence of one who loved his daughter so
well, might aggravate his sorrow. But there
is an earnestness in your manner which
persuades
me that you mean well, and I shall
meet you.
I am the friend of Balantyne, and you
O 2
shall find me yours also; therefore, fail not,
said Francis; and leaving Barton to his
mournful
meditations over the grave of her he
loved, he hastened to the residence of
Balantyne
.
CHAPTER XIII.
Why canst thou not, philosophy, resolve
Whether the spirits of the dead e'er walk
The earth, to speak with those they've left behind?
If thou know'st not, philosophy, confess
Thy ignorance, and dare not to dispute
What thou canst not disprove.
Shirtey
.
The success which attended the judicious
and active movements of Washington during
the winter and spring of 1777, having
frustrated
the efforts of Sir William Howe to
penetrate
to Philadelphia, by way of the Jerseys,
he, in the fall of the same year, resolved to
attempt effecting that object by another route.
Accordingly, aided by the powerful fleet
commanded
by his brother, Lord Howe, he landed
in full force, near Elkton, at the head of the
Cheaspeake Bay.
Washington, well aware that the possession
of Philadelphia was the great object of this
enterprise, hastened with his whole force
to oppose the advancing enemy. After much
manuvering and some skirmishing, the two
armies met on the 11th of September, on the
banks of the Brandywine, when a general
engagement
ensued, which resulted in the
British
effecting their passage over the river and
driving the Americans from the field of battle.
The tories, in consequence, once more
acquired
the ascendancy in the neigbourhood of
Dilworth
;
and Harris, now captain of a company
of dragoons, being once more among his old
confederates, became very active in
re-organizing
their scattered bands. The notorious
Fitzpatrick
again appeared at the head of his
desperadoes
;
and excesses which the regular troops
of Britain were not permitted to commit, were,
without hesitation, perpetrated upon the lives
and properties of the whigs of the district, by
those lawless natives of the country.
Balantyne was not, at this time, an
inhabitant
of the neighbourhood. Shortly after the
calamity related in the last chapter, had
assailed
him, he not only relinquished his
occupation
as a teacher, but secretly withdrew
from his residence. He left a letter for his
friend Elias, desiring him not to be alarmed
for his safety, and requesting him to take charge
of his dwelling and other property, until he
should hear further from him.
Harris soon ascertained that the man whom
he had so grievously injured, was out of the
way. Francis's letter had before made him
acquainted with the fate of his once loved
Mary. Not fearing, therefore, to meet with
any one at the deserted mansion of Balantyne,
who would reprimand him for his misconduct,
he, without scruple, and in defiance of the
remonstrances
of Elias, seized upon it, and made
it the quarters of his troop.
There is a sentiment of an amiable nature,
of which even the most depraved minds are
not totally devoid, that causes us to feel
pleasure
in retracing scenes, from which we have
been for some time absent, where we have
enjoyed
any excitement of the affections, or
indulged
any imaginings of passion or dreams of
romance. Hence, unfeeling and regardless as
Harris was in relation to the misfortunes he
had brought upon Mary Balantyne, he could
not view the scenes of their frequent and
endearing
intercourse with indifference. He
visited
all the well-remembered places where they
had been in the habit of meeting; and, in his
better and softer moments, felt growing over
him a tenderness and regard for her memory,
which even surprised himself, but which, as
they were agreeable emotions, he cherished
with eagerness and zeal.
On the evening of the second day after he
had taken possession of Balantyne's house, he
wandered towards the scene of their guilty loves.
He had even the hardihood, although not
without
experiencing some touches of compunction
in his breast, to approach the fatal arbour.
When about entering it, however, bold and
daring as he was, he hesitated. A thousand
strange thoughts rushed upon his mind. His
spirit faltered, and he turned to retrace his
steps, when he heard distinctly the awful
sounds of Wo! wo! wo! uttered in a voice
which, in dispite of its hollow and unearthly
tone, he well remembered as hers whom he
had on the spot whence it issued, sacrificed to
his wicked passions. His heart became weak
and cowardly. He fled from the place.
But, when some distance from it, he became
ashamed of his retrograde movement. It might
have been but the excitement of imagination
that had formed these fearful sounds. And did
it become hima man of the world and a
soldier
to
be overcome by a non-entity, an ideal
mockery! He resolved not to harbour even
the consciousness of having been so easily
frightened. Besides, he began to suspect that,
if the voice had not been altogether imaginary,
it might have proceeded from some person
desirous
of playing him a trick, and who had,
consequently
,
become acquainted with the
timidity
he had displayed, and would, no doubt,
expose
it so as to render him an object of
ridicule
among his companions. Such a thought
he could not endure. He, therefore, again
turned his steps towards the arbour. And
again, from some inexplicable cause, he
became
alarmed as he approached it. He stole
slowly and cautiously forward, as if he were
afraid to apprize the attendant spirit of the fatal
spot of his presence. He strained to the
utmost
,
his faculties of seeing and hearing, in
order
that nothing, whether earthly or
unearthly
,
should take him by surprise. The wind
was gentle, but to his excited senses, it moved
audibly, with fitful sighs, among the trembling
leaves of the pendent willows that surrounded
him. As he drew near to the arbour, these
sighing sounds became more distinct, and
evidently much louder than was consistent
with the mild condition of the wind. At length
the articulate sounds of Ruin! ruin! struck
upon his ear. A sudden chillness crept over
himhe faltered in his pace, but it was only
for a moment. He struggled with his
weakness
.
His courage returned, and he determined
not to yield again to the influence of terror, be
its cause either real or imaginary.
With a violent effort, he advanced to the
entrance of the arbour. But he advanced
no further; for there now stood before his
terrified
vision a figure which sent a cold
shuddering
through all his veins, and almost froze
the current of his life at its fountain. It was the
figure of Mary Balantyne in her winding sheet,
shadowy, thin, pale, pensive and awfully
solemn
in her looks. She shook her head
slowly
and mournfully as she fixed a withering
gaze upon him. He would, in the surprise of
his first recognition of her appearance, have
sunk to the ground, but for the support
he obtained from the branch of a tree, at
which he caught, while his enfeebled joints
trembled beneath him. Harris, however, was
neither cowardly nor superstitious, and he had
long indulged in absolute scepticism regarding
the spirits of deceased human beings becoming
visible on earth. In a few seconds, therefore,
he began to rally his fortitude, and soon
recovered
sufficient firmness to look at the
apparition
and address it.
Who art thou, said he, that assumest
the likeness of one who is dead, and cannot
consequently be now standing before me?
Wretched man! the figure replied, and
its voice thrilled fearfully like electric fire
along the nerves of the awe-struck criminal;
remember this fatal spot. Dark is thy doom.
We meet again!
The apparition then slowly faded away
among the foliage at the back part of the
arbour
,
and became invisible, like a thin mist
disappearing from the side of a green hill, or
a light cloud by moonlight, sinking behind the
waving tops of the dusky trees. The terrified
culprit was for some time scarcely sensible of
the departure of the awful image. His fixed
gaze was riveted, as if, by enchantment, on the
spot where it had stood, and its fearful words
still tingled in his ears. His perceptions, at
length, gradually returned to their natural state,
and he became sensible of his true situation.
His strength of frame was restored, and perhaps
his hardihood, but not his tranquillity of mind.
He hastened to his quarters. But his
conscience
was now disturbed, and he no longer,
reflected
with pride or complacency on the
triumph
he had gained, in the shades of
Dilworth
,
over the innocence and virtue of the
loveliest maiden they had ever screened from
the glare of the noon-tide sun. But although
frightened into remorse, he was not humbled
into penitence. Instead of seeking tranquillity
in a fixed resolution to sin no more, he sought
oblivion for his troubles in the intoxicating
revel
;
and in the jovial carousals of his brother
officers, the remorseful impression made on his
feelings by the awful apparition in the arbour,
was soon, for a time, obliterated.
Perhaps this power of affording temporary
relief to the conscience-struck mind, is the most
mischievous in its effects upon mankind, that
is possessed by inebrieting fluids. Thousands
who would be driven by the goadings of
remorse
to seek geninue relief in amendment
of life, fly to the fallacious substitute which is
offered in the hilarity of the bowl; and
instead
of cherishing that salutary regret for past
misconduct which would naturally lead to
reformation
as the only means of regaining
tranquillity
,
they seek a transient refuge from
remorse
in the turbulence of a fleeting madness,
P
which removes every good impression, and
confirms every evil propensity.
On the return of sobriety, however, Harris
felt his mind ill at ease. Every object in and
around the place where he had fixed his
quarters
,
reminded him of his crime and of the
awful vision which had denounced him for it.
He hastened to remove from the
neighbourhood
,
and, for the purpose of diverting his
mind from the unpleasant subject that
perpetually
obtruded itself upon him, he plunged
with unwonted activity into the exciting scenes
of the desultory warfare in which he was now
engaged.
CHAPTER XIV.
Hast thou fallen, enfeebled and bound, into the hands of thine
enemy
?
and thinkest thou he will have mercy on thee? Oh! no.Thy
innocence
will plead for thee in vain, for thy foe valueth not the eschewer
of crime. The guilty man who promoteth his evil designs, is more
precious
in his sight than the saint who opposeth his guilty career. Hast
thou virtuously resisted him? and art thou in his power? Then
Heaven
alone can save thee. But Heaven is all-sufficient.
Maxims of Amram
.
Edward Meredith was, at this time,
extremely
active at the head of his troop, in
harassing
the foraging and marauding parties of the
British and tories, and in protecting the
persons
and properties of the whigs from their
attacks
.
For this service, he was peculiarly well
qualified by his knowledge of the country,
which was now the seat of war, as well as by
his zeal to defend his immediate friends and
neighbours from the spoliations and personal
outrages daily inflicted on them by victorious
and insolent foes, who denounced them, and
often treated them, as rebels unworthy of
mercy
.
He had heard of Harris occupying the
house of Balantyne, and he was making
preparations
to dislodge him from it, when he was
informed that he had suddenly abandoned it.
He was, however, determined to make some
effort to capture Harris. He knew him to be
in league with the notorious depradator,
Fitzpatrick
,
whose band of native prowlers, was,
at that time, more dreaded by the whig
inhabitants
of the country, than the foreign enemy.
From the latter, submission procured
exemption
from attack; but nothing could mollify the
rancour of the former, who were goaded to
hostility
more by feelings of private resentment
or a desire for plunder, than by any sense of
public duty.
Meredith was at this time attached to the
division of the army commanded by General
Wayne, who belonged to the same
neighbourhood
,
and was equally solicitous to protect its
patriotic inhabitants from the evils of the
disastrous
war which now surrounded them. It was
on the evening of the twentieth of September,
while Edward was consulting with the
General
on the propriety of penetrating with a
chosen band, through the most private paths of
the country, in order to come unawares upon
the depredators, he received information that
his own house had been plundered and
destroyed
by the troops of Harris.
Ah! cried Wayne, that decides the
question. That ruffian cousin of yours, must
be seized at all risks, or he will not leave a
respectable
house standing in the country. You
see that your mother's loyalty has not been
able to protect her residence from the
destructive
rage of her own relative. The
rebelliousness
of her son is, no doubt, to be thanked for
this. I hope she herself has suffered no
personal
injury.
I thank Heaven, said Meredith, that
my mother is at a safe distance from the
barbarians
.
I conveyed her to Philadelphia
immediately
on learning that the enemy had
landed
in our neighbourhood. I believe also, that
the enemy found little but the walls of our
house to destroy, as on my mother's departure,
my uncle undertook to have every thing
valuable
conveyed to his own residence.
That's lucky enough, observed Wayne.
Your uncle's toryism will surely be sufficient
to protect his own house, though it could not
preserve that of his nephew.But for revenge
or justice, if you prefer a milder wordin
Heaven's name, start off with a hundred men,
and either by force or stratagem, bring the
barbarian
to me dead or alive.
At that moment, they perceived a horseman
hastily approaching.
Delay one moment! Here are tidings,
cried Wayne. Edward paused. In a few
seconds, William Barton alighted, and
informed
them that a strong British force was
rapidly approaching with the hope of
attacking
their encampment by surprise.
Let them come, said Wayne, coolly.
We are not very numerous, it is true, and
my men have prepared for their night's rest,
P 2
for they are much fatigued. But with Heaven's
help, we shall stand our ground and try them.
Captain Meredith, to your post on the left.
I cannot now spare you. When this affair
shall be over, you may hunt the ruffian Harris
as speedily as you please.
That ruffian, cried Barton, you will
not have far to hunt. I am greatly mistaken,
if he will not be among your assailants
tonight
.
Heaven send that I may meet him front to
front in the battle! said Meredith, and he
hastened to the post assigned him.
The British under General Gray were soon
on the field of Paoli. They approached on
the right of the Americans where the artillery
was stationed, and where an effectual resistance
might have been made. But the officer who
commanded there, being too slow in obeying
the orders of Wayne to advance against the
assailants, suffered the latter to approach so
near that they charged his men with their
bayonets
,
before they were prepared for
resistance
.
They were consequently put to flight.
Wayne hastened with other troops to their
support. But it was in vain. The
enemy's
battalions were too numerous for the
force he commanded, and he was obliged
to leave the field with the loss of nearly one
fourth of his patriot band, who being thus
taken almost by surprise, were slaughtered on
that disastrous night.
Edward Meredith's post, which was on the
extreme left of that memorable field, had been
gallantly defended against a powerful attack of
the enemy's cavalry, who, but for this
resistance
,
would have surrounded the main body of
the Americans, and prevented the retreat which
Wayne fortunately effected with the survivers
of the conflict. But Edward's bravery on
this occasion cost him dear. He was wounded
and taken prisoner; and what added greatly to
his mortification, his captor was his
arch-enemy
,
Harris.
Ah! intermeddler! exclaimed the latter,
I have you, at length, in my power. And,
blest be the fates! you shall not remain much
longer an obstacle between me and Miss
Lewis.
I am in your power only as a captive,
replied Edward; and I demand the
protection
due to a prisoner of war.
Fitch! cried Harris, I wish not to argue
with your young Brandywine rebel. He spouts
too much morality for me. Carry him to your
subterranean stronghold. Let none of our
officers
see him. I would not have them know
that he is captured. Guard him strictly. I
shall be with you by noon to-morrow.
Fitch, who was no other than the noted
Fitzpatrick mentioned already in this history,
assisted by several other men, immediately
dragged Edward to an adjoining obscure
hollow
in the midst of the woods, where having
examined his wound, which was in his right
shoulder, and found not to be dangerous, they
placed him on horseback, and travelled with him
all night, by unfrequented paths, until they came
to the foot of a high and rocky precipice, at
the bottom of which flowed a rapid running
stream. Here they halted underneath a
gigantic
overhanging rock, around and above which
towered the tall and dark branches of the
mountain pines.
Mr. Meredith, said Fitchfor I can't
call you Captain, as you don't hold the king's
commissionyou must now dismount and
follow
me.
You speak imperatively, Major Fitch,
replied Edward. You perceive I do not
grudge you your title. I envy it too little
for that. As for your imperative moodwhy
you only follow the example of your
employers
.Lead
on!
Fitch replied only with a wild sarcastic
laugh, which indicated a feeling of indifference
rather than ill-nature at the rebuke. He then
ascended the hill by a narrow path near the
rock. Edward ascended also, and was
followed
by five or six of his escort. After
clambering about eighteen or twenty yards,
they reached the top of the rock, which
presented
a flat portion of ground ten or twelve
yards square, thickly covered with pine trees,
which curtained the face of the hill, and amidst
which they were soon concealed.
Here is an asylum for true men, but a
prison
for rebels. Be pleased to enter, Mr.
Meredith
,
said Fitch, pointing to a
perpendicular
cleft in the rock which was nearly
concealed
from view by a large tree that grew within
a few feet of it. Our accommodations may
not be of the first order, but such as they are,
you are welcome to them.
With so polite an invitation, it would be
uncivil to refuse compliance, replied
Meredith
,
and he bowed ironically to his sarcastic
conductor, as he entered his rude prison.
Faith, Meredith, observed Fitch, as he
followed him, you are a pleasant fellow,
with a stout heart, and I bear you, in truth,
no great degree of ill-will, except for being a
vile rebel like many other hot-headed fools of
our acquaintance.But you have, some how
or other mortally displeased Captain Harris,
who swears you must be
put out of the way
.
Faith, 'tis a pity; you're so young and
spirited
.
But fretting is useless; for, hang it, the
Captain's will must be obeyed.
But my destruction will undoubledly bring
upon Harris the displeasure of his superior
officers
,
as being a violation of the usages of
war. said Meredith.
Oh! faith, it may be so, should it come to
be known. But that is a matter for the
Captain's
own consideration. At present, there is
your resting-place, replied Fitch, pointing to
a quantity of rustic bed-clothes which were
spread between two logs on the floor of the
cavern.
Meredith seated himself on one of the logs
in silence. He believed it to be a waste of
words, and a derogation of dignity, to pursue
the conversation further in relation to
himself
,
with a man he so thoroughly despised.
He was determined also to manifest in his
presence
,
no great degree of concern for his
situation
.
He, therefore, partook freely of the
refreshments
which were soon placed before him,
and affected to enjoy the broad mirth and
humour
of the low jests and vulgar songs, with
which his entertainers, after becoming elated
with various liberal potations of brandy,
amused
themselves until, overcome with their
previous
fatigue and their present debauchery, they
all, except one who acted as sentinel, threw
themselves down on the floor of the cave, and
sought repose.
Meredith now leisurely surveyed the extent
of his rocky prison. It was near mid-day, and
the light of the sun penetrated the gloomy
recess
sufficiently to make the objects around him
perceptible, especially as his eyes were
becoming
familiarized to the darkness of the place.
There was, however, little to be seen. With
the exception of a quantity of fire-arms and
other instruments of war, and some blankets
on which Fitch and his drowsy companions
were stretched, the furniture was merely such
as is usually found in a rustic and slovenly
kept kitchen. Meredith conceiving that this
cavern was one of the grand depots of tory
plunder, had expected to find himself
surrounded
by much of the valuable property of
which the neighbouring whigs had, of late,
been so abundantly robbed. But nothing of
the kind was visible. It is true, he did not see
far into the cavern. His eye could not
penetrate
its dark and winding recesses. He could
not tell the extent of its capacity. It might
have even other communications with the open
air than that by which he had entered. He
was acquainted with several caverns which
were merely elongated passages under ground
with an entrance at each extremity. Such a
one would naturally be preferred as the
lurking
place of robbers and desperadoes, as
affording
them, in case of being attacked at the one
entrance, means of escape by the other.
These reflections suggested to Edward the
possibility of effecting his own escape by such
means. He cast his eye wistfully towards the
dark interior. His arms alone were bound.
The sentinel kept watch outside of the cave,
and had not yet looked into it. The other
tories were all asleep. He could, at least, satisfy
his curiosity respecting the extent of his prison,
and ascertain whether it contained any thing
more remarkable than he had yet discovered.
He moved cautiously past Fitch and his
sleeping
companions, and had advanced to an angle
of the subterraneous passage, when he heard
the sound of voices conversing with the
sentinel
at the entrance. He hastened back to his
rude couch, and had soon the mortification to
perceive Harris, with five or six soldiers,
approaching
towards him. The noise of their
entrance awakened the sleepers, who instantly
started to their feet.
So, Captain Fitch, your prisoner is yet safe,
I perceive, said Harris, casting a look of
scowling hatred at Meredith.
Yes, to be sure, replied Fitch. You
did not suppose he could escape from this den
with so many stout fellows around him.
I supposed it not, returned Harris. But,
Fitch, some how or other, it has become known
to General Gray that we have this prisoner,
and he has ordered him to be brought to head
quarters and treated well.
I have no objection, said Fitch, for I
respect young Meredith there as much as e'er a
rebel among them, and did not quite like your
intentions this morning.
You did not, eh! returned Harris,
haughtily
and impatiently. But in a moment he
assumed
a cooler tone as he added, It was no
concern of yours, Fitch. You understood not
my motives.But it is a pleasant day for
ranging
.
A gallant troop waits without. Buckle
up, my brave fellow, and with your men, lead
us to the habitation of some rich whig that we
may replenish our coffers. I wish to be five
minutes alone with our prisoner. I will then
follow you.
Harris was speedily obeyed, and Edward
was left alone, bound and unarmed, in the
presence
of his most inveterate foe.
Meredith, said the latter, with a look
of ferocity intended to produce intimidation,
thank fate, you are now in my power. You
see these pistols. They are loaded with
deadly
shot. You see that paper; it contains the
only condition on which I will permit you to
live. Read it, and sign it, or in five minutes
you shall be a dead man.
Edward read the paper as follows:
To Miss Harriet Lewis,
You were once the object of my
fond attachment. I addressed you sincerely
Q
with a view to our final alliance, and we
became
engaged. Circumstances have lately given
another direction to my views. It is, therefore,
my duty to release you from your
engagement
.
I do this the more readily and
promptly
,
because I am aware that my cousin, Captain
Harris, of the British army, has placed his
affections upon you, and I am desirous of
being
no longer considered an obstacle to the
success of his suit.
Assure yourself of the continuance of my
profound respect.
Insolent miscreant! exclaimed Meredith,
tearing the paper into fragments. Do you
imagine that my feelings are as base and
depraved
as your own, so as to render me capable
of stooping to the infamy of signing such a
paper
!
No; no; do your pleasure. I will accept of
life on no such terms!
Then, by Heaven! I must get rid of you
as a rival in some way, and it would be folly to
lose the present opportunity! cried Harris,
as he presented one of the pistols at Edward's
breast, adding, Mutter a short prayer, for
you are on the verge of eternity!
At that moment, a voice, issuing from the
dark interior of the cave, cried out,
For-bear
!
in a tone which made Harris turn pale
and tremble at every joint. An instant
after
,
the same awful apparition which had
visited
him in the arbour near Dilworth,
advanced
from amidst the darkness, and frowned
fearfully upon him. The instrument of
intended
murder fell from his hands, and he
staggered towards the rocky wall of the cavern
for support, while the following
soul-harrowing
words were addressed to him.
Wretch! wouldst thou commit another
diabolical crime, that another aggrieved spirit
may haunt thy footsteps, and render thee as
miserable
as thou art accursed! Thou needest care
for no rival, for she whom thou didst destroy
shall be alone thy bride, and that shall be on
thy dying day. Hearken, and let my prophecy
sink into thy soul.
No maid on earth thou e'er shalt wed:
But SHE now numbered with the dead,
Upon thy fearful day of doom,
To be thy bride shall leave the tomb!
Hear, wretch, and loose that prisoner's chain,
Or tremble when we meet again!
So saying, the apparition again mingled
with the darkness of the cavern, and left
Edward
Meredith equally astonished, although
not equally terrified, with the guilty object of
its visit.
It was some minutes before Harris could
recover
sufficient recollection and firmness to obey
the order of the spectre to release the prisoner,
which still sounded awfully in his ears. At length
he convulsively rushed towards Meredith, and
hastily loosening the fastenings that bound his
arms, without uttering a word, he hurried
frantically
out of the cavern. The fresh air and
the presence of his soldiers soon restored his
self-possession. He ordered the sentinel to
leave the cavern and permit Meredith to
escape
,
informing Fitch that he would
satisfactorily
account to General Gray for so doing.
He then marched off with his party to the
quarters of that officer.
The amazement of Edward Meredith at this
miraculous interposition, by which he was
snatched from the jaws of death, may be easily
imagined. To account for it was beyond his
power. That the being who so providentially
interfered in his behalf, was from the land of
spirits, he could scarcely doubt, for it
exhibited
the express form, features, and voiceand
in a corpse-like condition,of one whose
likeness he could never forget, and of whose
death several months before, he had been well
assured. Yet his reason had been so long
accustomed
to reject the belief that spiritual
beings
ever assume material and visible forms,
that he knew not how to reconcile what he had
witnessed with his preconceived convictions
on the subject. His philosophy and his
experience
being thus at issue, it is no wonder that,
as often as he thought upon the strange
occurrence
,
he became perplexed, and was tempted
to abandon the most apparently conclusive
deductions
of philosophy as being opposed to the
evidence of his senses.
It was not, however, at the moment of his
deliverance, that he permitted his mind to
revolve on these intricate points. Time was
then too precious to be wasted in thought.
Self-preservation called for instant action. He
hastened to the mouth of the cavern; and, as
soon as the troops of Harris had disappeared,
he descended the hill, and in about twenty
minutes
,
found himself under the hospitable roof
of a trusty friend attached to the patriotic
cause. Here he remained for a few days; the
bodily fatigue, long watchfulness, and extreme
excitement of mind he had undergone,
independently
of his wound, which now pained
him considerably, rendering some repose
indispensable
for the recovery of his strength
and spirits. His convalescence, however, was
rapid; and to the great joy of his brother
officers
,
as well as that of his favourite troop, he
was soon again at its head, ready to lead it
against his country's foes.
Q 2
CHAPTER XV.
The warlike hosts extend their long array,
In gaudy dress and polished arms they shine;
Their haughty banners glittering to the day,
Diffuse a martial throb through all the line.
Now swells the trumpet's voice and rolls the drum,
The proud steed neighs, and shakes his curving main:
Now Heaven forbid that venturous foe should come,
In search of viet'ry on th' embattled plain,
For then on throne of blood, Death's awful power would reign.
Thaunus
.
It was on a beautiful afternoon towards the
latter end of September, 1777, that Lord
Cornwallis
,
at the head of his grenadiers, led the
van of the British army, in triumphal
procession
into Philadelphia. And, in truth, the
numerous
gay and finely appointed battalions
of both horse and foot, which followed him,
made, that day, a splendid and gallant
appearance
.
Thousands of the inhabitants of both
the whig and tory parties, covered the side-ways
and filled the balconies and windows of the
streets, to witness the imposing spectacle.
What various and opposite emotions, on that
occasion, agitated the bosoms of those
spectators
!
From patriotic hearts, notwithstanding
the novelty and brilliancy of the scene, what
sighs did it draw! and how many generous and
virtuous bosoms swelled with sadness on
comparing
the gay and comfortable appearance of
those enemies of their country's rights, with
the almost destitute condition of her armed
defenders! On the other hand, such were the
divided sentiments of the time, that many
hearts, attached to the cause of British
greatness
,
felt elated at this display of her martial
grandeur, and welcomed the warriors of the
ocean-cinctured isle, whose name they had
so long venerated, with animated cheers, as
conquering friends who had delivered them
from the rule of an insurrectionary party that
had seized the government of the country, and
overturned those political institutions which
they revered, and under which they were still
desirous to live.
To the cheering of these were added the
acclamations
of a still more numerous class of
citizensthe thoughtless, the giddy, and the
indifferent, who cared little respecting the final
success of either party. To them the gaudy
dress and glittering arms, the stately and well
regulated march, the animating and
spirit-stirring
music, the magnificent standards
waving radiantly in the air, and all the other
pompous pageantry of exciting war, were
objects
of admiration which drew forth their
vociferous
applause.
The state of the city was, indeed, at this
time favourable to this display of cordiality in
the reception given to the royal army. As
soon as the result of the battle of Brandywine
was known, the speedy occupation of the city
by the victors, was expected by all parties. The
greater portion of the whig population,
therefore
,
with their families and effects, retired from
it without delay, and left their political
opponents
and those who were but lukewarm
patriots
,
to yield the invaders whatever
reception
they might think proper.
Thus Sir William Howe, at length, gained
the dazzling prize for which, during two
hard-fought
campaigns, he had lavished so much
blood and treasurethe
Capture of
Philadelphia
.
And what did he or his government
profit by this anxiously desired and much
vaunted achievement? Did it, in any degree,
facilitate the subjugation of the young nation
with which they were combatting? Did it,
in any manner, contribute to the extension of
British power or influence over this or any
other country? No;its effects were the very
reverse of all this. It, for many months,
paralyzed
the efforts of a large and well-appointed
army. It did more. It corrupted the martial
spirit of that army by exposing it to the
enervating
influence of a gay and luxurious city,
which, in fact, became the fascinating Capua
that rendered the warlike officers of Britain
effeminate, and her private soldiers impatient
of discipline. This solves the riddle of
America
having been a gainer by the loss of her chief
city, and proves the accuracy of the remark
made by the sagacious Franklin, when he first
heard of the event,that Sir William Howe
had not taken Philadelphia, but that
Philadelphia
had taken Sir William Howe.
In this view of the matter, it might be
questioned
whether the obstructions which
Washington
so anxiously threw in the way of
Howe's obtaining the city, were judicious, or
worth the sacrifices which they cost? I have
no hesitation in saying that they were
decidedly
judicious. It was the duty of Washington
to obstruct the invaders in all their views, and
to harass and annoy them in all their
movements
,
not only because it diminished their
power and embarrassed their operations, but
because
it acquired a reputation for the American
cause which was then very desirable, both to
inspire confidence in its friends at home, and
to secure the aid solicited from other
countries
.
There is, indeed, good reason to
believe
that, had the Americans not
appeared
able to do something for themselves, the
powerful assistance which was, soon after this
period, received from a great European
monarchy
,
would never have been obtained.
But I have unwarily plunged into a strain
of political speculation which the limits
prescribed
for this work will not permit me to
prolong, and which, perhaps, may not be
altogether
suited to its character. I shall, therefore,
return to my narrative.
It has been already mentioned, that as soon as
the neighbourhood of the Brandywine became
likely to be the seat of war, Mrs. Meredith had
for greater security removed to Philadelphia.
Her feelings and wishes respecting the
belligerent
parties were now much changed from
what they had been at the commencement of
hostilities. It is true, there still lurked in her
mind, many prejudices in favour of the
British
name and character. But she had now
begun
to identify herself with the American cause.
Her only son, on whom she looked with all a
mother's pride and fondness, was one of its
defenders; and for his sake she could not but
wish it success. Besides, the credit he had
gained as a patriot soldier, had elated her
feelings
and warmed her heart for the cause in
which he had acquired so much honour.
Her friend, Josias Ellwood and his family,
with whom she resided, were of the Quaker
persuasion, and ahhorred war. Their
sentiments
were, therefore, like those of the
majority
of their sect, in opposition to the resistance
which had been made to the claims of England.
But their opposition, like their manners, was
mild, and consequently ineffective; and they
bore no one any personal hostility for opinions
differing from their own. The pleasure,
therefore
,
which Mrs. Meredith could not
sometimes
refrain from expressing at any success
which attended the American arms, gave them
no dissatisfaction, while she, on the other hand,
from long habit and the remains of a prejudice
still far from extinct in her bosom, could
listen
with complaisance and good feeling to
encomiums
on the government, the policy and
the greatness of the British nation. It was
with no unpleasant emotions, therefore, that
she witnessed from the balcony of her friend's
house, the triumphal entry of the British army
into the city.
There was in company with Mrs. Meredith
on this occasion, a young lady whose feelings,
though essentialy patriotic, were not so
inveterately
such as to prevent her from enjoying
the brilliant spectacle, and bestowing
admiration
on the gallant bearing of many of the
officers
,
and the martial appearance of the whole
army. To this lady, Mrs. Meredith was much
attached, for she was no other than Miss Lewis,
the fair sovereign of her son's heart.
A long line of infantry had just passed them,
and a regiment of cavalry was approaching, when
Miss Lewis observed, Mrs. Meredith, yonder
comes an officer whom, no doubt, you know.
He is a relation of mine, and of yours too, I
believe.
Mrs. Meredith looked in the direction
pointed
out by her young friend, and beheld
Captain
Harris, who that instant recognising the
ladies, bowed to them with a gallant air. Miss
Lewis returned the salutation; but the feelings
of Mrs. Meredith would not permit her to be
so complaisant to a man who had, according to
information she had recently received, repaid
the uniform kindness with which she had
treated him, by the wanton destruction of her
dwelling near the Brandywine. But her
thoughts dwelt only for a moment on Harris,
for she had encountered the gaze of an officer
who rode beside him, which brought a crowd
of disagreeable remembrances to her mind, and
communicated to her an alarm which she
endeavoured
in vain to conceal. Miss Lewis
perceived
her agitation.
You are fatigued, Mrs. Meredith, said
she, with this martial parade. Since it does
not amuse you, let us retire from it.But ah!
do you see that noble looking officer beside
Harris, who is gazing at us so intently? If
he were not so bold, I should think him
venerable
,
though it cannot be altogether with age.
I know that man; at least, I am greatly
mistaken, if I do not, said Mrs. Meredith in
a low voice? and notwithstanding your
favourable
impression of him, the cause of my
uneasiness is that he seems to know me, for I
have suffered much at his hands.
I am sorry you should have cause to
complain
of such a brave looking man, returned
Miss Lewis. When his eyes caught mine
they beamed with so much kindness and
good-will
,
that I was sorry when he rode past so
that I could see them no longer.
Mrs. Meredith had by this time recovered
her self-possession, and was unwilling to damp
the enjoyment of her young and lively friend.
She therefore in a tone of cheerfulness replied:
Miss Lewis, I did not imagine that you
had such a taste for antiquity. The object of
your present admiration is assuredly more than
twice your age.
He is, therefore, the more fit to teach me
wisdom, observed the young lady. He
appears
neither handsome nor sprightly enough
to win my heartbut I perceived something
so kind and fatherly in his countenance, that
I could readily yield him my reverence.
It is well, returned Mrs. Meredith.
Since your heart is safe, you can lose but
little
by bestowing your reverence. But has no
other of the gallant warriors in this brilliant
cavalcade been able to vanquish you?
Not one, in truth, said Miss Lewis, gaily,
well pleased to see that her respected companion
had recovered her cheerfulness. My
whiggism
is sufficiently strong to defy their whole
army. I am resolved to yield to the attacks
of no royalist, till the war be over.
R
Hush! hush! you are speaking treason,
child! said Mrs. Meredith, playfully.
Remember
you are now once more under the
authority
of king George. Behold the ensigns
and the instruments of his power! How
daring
you are to speak so disloyally in the
presence
of so many thousands of his army, and
in the hearing too of me who am one of his
dutiful and liege subjects.
Oh! I beg pardon! cried the young lady,
as a regiment of Hessians was passing. I
really forgot your toryism, and from
complaisance
to you I will not abuse those morose
looking barbarians with the huge brass caps,
terrific mustachios, and horrible music,
sounding
no note but `plunder! plunder! plunder!'
with horrible discord. Must I really call the
monsters beautiful Christians, because they are
servants of king George?
Oh, no! returned Mrs. Meredith. Do
not offer violence to your conscience. I
cannot
carry my loyalty so far as to exact that.
As for praising those outlandish, grim-visaged
Vandals, why I would rather turn whig
myself
than commit such an offence against good
taste.But since the spectacle no longer
affords
us visions of the gallant and gay, let us
retire from it while any agreeable impression
of it remains on our minds.
Yes; let us go. I am quite tired of the
affair, said Miss Lewis, though I am glad
that those frightful barbarians came in aid of
my whiggism, lest the noble bearing of your
bold Britons should have converted me into a
tory.
That compliment is for me; thank you,
my sprightly whig, returned Mrs. Meredith,
bowing, and they withdrew from beholding a
scene with which each had now become heartily
fatigued.
The next day, the officers of the army were
billeted on the most respectable families of the
city, and to the great surprise of Miss Lewis,
he who had been the companion of Harris, and
had excited so much of her attention and
partiality
,
during the procession, presented his
billet, announcing his name to be Sir Robert
Radnor, and took his lodging at her father's
house. Although she had received an account
of him, from Mrs. Meredith, sufficiently
unfavourable
greatly to diminish her first partiality,
yet in his manner of accosting her there was an
undefinable somethinga tendernessa
solicitude
mingled
with a dignity of demeanour,
which in defiance of her opinion of his
unworthiness
,
restored him to her good graces, and
awakened in her mind feelings of respect which
seemed even to herself unaccountable.
Sir Robert was three or four days a lodger
in the family, before he spoke to Miss Lewis
respecting Mrs. Meredith, although he well
recollected
to have seen them together on the
balcony. At length he, apparently by accident,
alluded to the circumstance, inquiring whether
the lady's name was not Meredith, and
whether
she was a resident of the city? He
received
a suitable answer to the first question;
but was informed that she had left town the
day before, accompanied by several of her
friends under protection of a passport from
General Howe, for the residence of her
brother-in-law
,
her own having been lately
destroyed
by her kinsman, Captain Harris, while
he lay with his troop in the neighbourhood of
the Brandywine.
That was an unnecessary piece of
wanton-ness
on the part of Harris, for which he has
since had good reason to be sorry, said Sir
Robert. It came to the general's ears, who
reprimanded him severely; and were it not that
Harris makes a good foraging officer, a
qualification
now of great value to our army, it is
probable he would have been deprived of his
commission. But Harris is a wild,
thoughtless
young man, and the lady's son is a
violent
rebel, which he thought justified the
transaction
;
and which, perhaps, had in reality a
palliating effect in the general's eyes.
Then, observed Miss Lewis, Harris
has been acquitted of an acknowledged
criminal
and malicious act, because he is a good
plunderer, and the individual who has chiefly
suffered from his malice is what you are
pleased
to call a rebel?
My fair young lady, said Sir Robert,
permit me to remind you, that the morality
of peaceful times, cannot be always adopted in
a period of war. Hence what is uniformly
crime at the one time, may often be justified
by imperious necessity, at the other.
Sir Robert, replied Miss Lewis, your
greater knowledge of human affairs and usages,
renders you so much my superior on these
subjects, that I cannot pretend to argue them
with you; but I believe, that the burnings and
plunderings of predatory warriors, often do
more injury than good to the side which
resorts
to them, by rendering the sufferers, and all
who sympathize with them, more indignantly
hostile than they would otherwise be.
There is much truth in your remark,
said Sir Robert, and I must profess myself
at least half a convert to your opinion. At all
events it is an opinion so becoming your
tender
age and sex, that I should be truly sorry
if you did not entertain it. So saying, he
cordially shook hands with the fair moralizer,
and departed to attend on some convivial
entertainment
,
R 2
a mode of expending time, which
from the example of Sir William Howe, was
now becoming very prevalent among the
British
officers in America.
CHAPTER XVI.
The onset took place, they met in the fray, and the strife was
terrible
.
Behold two chieftains meet. The rest pause to witness the
combat. It lasts not long. The sword of the one deeply pierces the
breast of the other. But the victor is surrounded by foes. He has
to yield to multitudes, and is subdued. What boots his victory, or the
pain he has inflicted on a fellow-creature? Such are doings of men.
Can beings of a superior nature look upon them with pleasure?
Reason
answers, No.
Thaunus
.
A few days after the foregoing conversation,
the sanguinary battle of Germantown took
place, and produced two events highly
agitating
to the feelings of Miss Lewis. These
were the capturing of Edward Meredith, and
the severe wounding of Sir Robert Radnor.
It was near the conclusion of the battle, and
the American army was beginning to retire
from the scene of combat, when a troop of
their horse turned suddenly upon an
advancing
column of British cavalry, for the purpose
of checking the pursuit, so as to gain time for
the main body of the Americans to form into
retreating order. The contest between the
two cavalry parties was severe and bloody,
but the British soon obtained a reinforcement,
and their antagonists were obliged to give way.
But their leader attempted again to turn them
upon the enemy. A few only, animated with
his own enthusiasm, obeyed his call, and with
rash impetuosity rushed upon the pursuers.
Several of them fell to rise no more; and their
chief, after having, in single combat,
severely
wounded an assailing officer, was taken
prisoner
.
This was Edward Meredith, and the
officer he had wounded was Sir Robert
Radnor
.
Edward was but very slightly wounded,
although his horse was killed under him before
he surrendered. His preservation was owing to
the magnanimity of the British General Gray,
who had observed his bravery when assailed
by superior numbers, and gave orders that he
should, if possible, be taken uninjured. A heroic
young officer overheard the order and
gallantly
undertook its performance. Mounted on a
strong charger, he rushed between Meredith
and his assailants, commanding the latter to
withdraw, at the same time throwing his own
sword on the ground, he held out his unarmed
hand to Edward, who struck with the
singular
generosity of the action, and seeing
himself
on all sides surrounded by enemies,
presented
his sword and surrendered. This noble
youth, to whose humanity Meredith was thus
so much indebted, became afterwards
well-known
to history as the victim of an unhappy
destiny, which will long continue to excite the
sympathy of mankindit was Major Andre.
Edward was for some days confined with
the other prisoners of war, in the Walnut street
jail. But having several very warm friends
among the tory faction in the city, powerful
intercession was made to procure his
enlargement
on parole, which was granted within
certain
prescribed limits of the city. This
indulgence
rendered Edward happy; for it enabled
him to enjoy the society of her, who was daily
the first and the last in his thoughtsand to
be with whom he could have cheerfully
sacrificed
every earthly consideration, except the
performance of his duty to his country.
But Meredith did not enjoy this indulgence
long undisturbed. The jealous eyes of Harris
were upon him, and his malignant heart longed
to do him mischief. Harris had ever since
his return to Philadelphia, been vainly
endeavouring
to work himself into his former favour
with Miss Lewis. He suspected that she was
not unacquainted with his misdeeds in the
neighourhood of the Brandywine, for she
received
his visits with much greater coolness than
was consistent with her natural affability and
habitual
politeness. Since his rival's capture and
presence in the city, she was even more than
usually reserved, and seemed desirous of casting
him off entirely from her acquaintance. He
became, at length, so enraged by the
preference
which she so decidedly and openly
manifested
for Edward, that he determined to be
revenged upon him, and effect his destruction,
either by artifice or violence.
While Harris was darkly brooding over his
malignant purpose, the unsuspecting object of
his resentment was in the full enjoyment of
that highest luxury which a youthful mind can
know, the society and smiles of the chosen of
his heart. One evening, in the beginning of
December, he escorted her home from a
theatrical
entertainment in which the chief
characters
were performed by British officers, and at
which he was induced to attend as a spectator,
by the special invitation of his friend, Major
Andre. Having left Miss Lewis at her home,
he took his way to his own lodgings. His
path lay along a considerable space of vacant
ground since covered with houses, near the
centre of which, in a lonely situation, stood a
large deserted frame building. On reaching
this building, the noose of a rope was
suddenly
thrown upon him, and he was dragged
inside by three soldiers in masks, who
hurried
him through a dark passage to the top of
a stairway, down which they caused him to
descend into a cellar obscurely lighted by a
glimmering lamp. Here, after binding his
arms firmly with part of the rope, they
secured
him with the remainder to an iron staple
strongly fixed in the wall.
To the demand which he made to know by
whose order, or for what purpose, they
committed
this outrage, he was told that he need
ask no questions, for they were instructed to
make no replies.
Our job is now done, said one of them,
after they had sufficiently secured him. The
rebel is snug enough till the Captain comes
let us be off. They then cautioned Edward,
on the peril of his life, to remain quiet, and
withdrew.
They had not been gone many minutes,
when Edward's gloomy reflections on his
unpleasant
situation were interrupted by the sound
of footsteps in the apartment above him, at
first slow and measured, then rapid and
irregular
.
They were accompanied by sighs and
sorrowful ejaculations, of which, however, he
could not distinguish the purport. These ceased,
and all was again quiet for a short time, when a
loud noise commenced like the breaking down
of a partition or the bursting of a strong door,
with a crash which shook the whole building.
Instantly a brilliant light streamed down the
stairway, and illuminated the cell in which
he was confined. Heavy steps seemed to
advance
along the passage towards the
stairway
,
which were suddenly arrested by an
awful
voice of unearthly sound, exclaiming, Rash
man! where goest thou? Fly from the
dreadful
deed thou dost contemplate, nor burthen thy
soul with a heavier perdition than that which
thou hast already earned!
No answer was given. But the light
instantly
vanished, and a rush of footsteps
towards
the door took place, when the
ejaculation
,
in a tremulous tone, of Awful Being,
have mercy! reached the ears of the
astonished
Edward, and immediately all was silent.
Edward had not time to recover from his
astonishment sufficiently to form any rational
conjecture respecting these mysterious
occurrences
,
when he observed the figure of a man in
black and masked in a black visor, descending
the stairs. He approached with a large
clasp-knife
opened in his hand, and without speaking,
hastened to cut the rope, and set Edward at
liberty. Edward was about to express
gratitude
for this unexpected interference in his
behalf, but his deliverer motioned to him to
preserve silence and fly. He obeyed, and
in a few minutes, reached his lodgings, where
he passed a sleepless night, amazed and
bewildered
in his reflections on this extraordinary
adventure. The next morning, he received,
through an unknown channel, the following
anonymous note.
Your enemy, Harris, was the author of the
attempt against you last night. Fear him not,
nor inform any one of his villany. A power
watches his paths, which has awed his soul,
and will frustrate all his schemes. Leave him
to his conscience and to God!
With the information contained in this short
letter, unsatisfactory as it was in relation to the
more mysterious parts of the adventure,
Edward
was obliged to remain content. It satisfied
him respecting the author and the intention of
the attack upon him; but its being anonymous
rendered it unavailable as evidence against
his enemy, in case he should complain of him
to his commander. But, with the injunction
of secrecy contained in the communication, he
was resolved to comply. He, therefore, could
not use any evidence, if he had it. To know
that no new enemy had arisen against him was
satisfactory. As for his old one, he could guard
against him. Besides, he was told not to fear him,
for his soul was awed, and his schemes would
be frustrated. He had, therefore, no dread of any
similar conspiracy being formed against him, by
the same enemy, at least, for some time. In
the meanwhile, some fortunate event might
occur
,
which would place him beyond the reach
of his foe, and restore him to liberty and the
service of his country.
And was not Edward Meredith happy in his
captivity, which was, in fact, but nominal, and
which afforded him the society of the woman
he loved? Could he be desirous of that liberty,
which would banish him from the mistress of
his heart? Sometimes, it must be confessed,
in the weakness of his nature and the fervour
of his love, he was tempted to prefer his
present
delicious thraldom, and would look
forward
S
to the prospect of his enlargement, with
reluctance and pain. But his mind was imbued
with a strong sense of his duty to the cause he
had espoused; and if he was an ardent lover, he
was also an ardent patriot, and had heroism
sufficient, at any time, when honour and his
country called, to sacrifice the blandishments
of love at the shrine of duty.
But the period of his release at length came.
The defeat of a large detachment of the British
force under Count Donop, in an attempt to
storm the fort at Red Bank, threw into the
hands of the Americans, several prisoners of
distinction. Among others, Captain Harris
was not only captured, but badly wounded.
As his life was believed to be in danger, General
Howe was anxious that he should have the
benefit
of the supposed superior skill of the British
physicians, as well as of the greater attention
and better accommodations he should receive in
Philadelphia, among his friends, than at Red
Bank, among his enemies. It was, in
consequence
,
proposed to release Edward Meredith
in exchange for him, a proposal to which
General Washington readily assented; and
Edward
,
on taking leave of his beloved Harriet,
felt that even liberty was unwelcome, when it
separated him from her sweet society. The
mutual vow, however, was pledged, the
parting
embrace was given, the farewell was said,
and the painful separation accomplished. He
grieved for a space; but his fortitude soon
returned, more heroic feelings took possession
of his mind, and with true joy and alacrity he
resumed his former station at the head of his
favourite troop.
The wound of Sir Robert Radnor confined
him to his chamber, in the house of Mr. Lewis,
for several months. During that time, he
experienced from Harriet, a kindness and
attention
for which he was extremely grateful,
and which contributed much to his recovery.
His feelings towards this young woman were
of a nature that he himself could not
comprehend
.
They were such as he had never
before
entertained for a youthful female. They
were not tainted with the selfishness which
usually characterised his emotions. They had
the ardour of affection, but not of passion. He
wished for her welfare more disinterestedly
than he had ever wished for that of any other
person: and, in a will which he made while his
life was considered in danger, he manifested
his regard for her by a very liberal bequest.
Sir Robert was soon made acquainted, by
means of Harris, with the partiality of his
favourite
for Meredith. He, at first, felt some
dissatisfaction at the circumstance. It was
from Meredith's hand he had received his
almost
fatal wound, and the insinuations of
Harris had given him an unfavourable
impression
of his antagonist's character. This
impression
,
however, was soon changed.
Meredith
paid him frequent visits; and so earnestly
expressed his regret at the accident which had
brought them into contact on the field of battle,
and had occasioned him to inflict such an
injury
on a near relation, that Sir Robert, whose
pride and resentment were now chastened and
mollified by sickness, not only forgave him,
but extended to him his favour and regard.
The mildness of the spring months restored
him to partial health, but he never recovered
sufficiently to undertake military duty.
The wound of Harris, although it confined
him also for many weeks, did not inflict much
injury upon his constitution, nor did it produce
any beneficial change in his character or
disposition
.
It is true, he suffered great internal
inquietude from the dreaded visitations of the
awful spectre which assumed the form of her on
whom he had brought destruction. In all his
dreams, and in all his solitary hours, that
death-like form seemed to be present with
him. On his couch of pain, he saw it, he
heard it; he shrunk from its accusations, he
trembled at its threats of vengeance; and its
predictions of a terrible doom awaiting him,
often forced the cold moisture of an unnatural
perspiration from his agonized frame. Yet he
felt no penitencehe attempted no
amendment
.
The selfishness of his nature caused
him to dread the denunciations of the image
that haunted him; but a genuine sorrow for the
sufferings of her whose form it assumed, had
taken no root in his bosom. The consequences
of his guilt to himself alone were what he
regretted
.
During the spring his health was
perfectly restored, and with it, his taste for
riotous enjoyments and intemperate
gratifications
.
To these, as formerly, he had frequent
recourse, for the purpose of driving from his
recollection the mental impressions which, in
his reflecting moments, so greatly disturbed his
repose.
S 2
CHAPTER XVII.
Thomas, said my uncle, you would have believed it, if you had read
it in the Arabian Night's Entertainments, as having happened in China.
But because it took place in our own plain and simple America, you think
it a mere traveller's story. Yet I tell you, my boy, I saw it with my own
eyes; and I affirm, and my friend of Germantown, the illustrious annalist
of Philadelphia, will affirm also, that the palace of her Elephantine
Highness of Siam, in rich substantial glory, is no more to be compared
to the splendour of that great Gala, than the dim blinking light of our
greasy lamps in Race street is to the bright blaze of the gas-shinersin
Broadway.
Tales at Home
.
Towards the spring of 1778, the British
General became convinced that the occupation
of Philadelphia in no degreee promoted the
subjugation of America. He had now
possessed
it for many months, yet the revolted
colonies showed as little disposition as ever to
submit. The folly of keeping a numerous and
well-appointed army, at an immense expense
to the British nation, idly lying in the midst of
a large city, was now apparent, and was
beginning
to extort censures from every
intelligent
friend to the royal cause. By this time
also, the British ministry had become sensible
of the incapacity of Sir William Howe, to
conduct
the war in America, and early in May,
he received an intimation that he should soon
be superseded in the command of the army.
Sir William was a great favourite with his
officers. He had, indeed, been an indulgent
commander. Under his authority, and
countenanced
by his example, they had enjoyed a
long season of gayety, joviality, and luxurious
dissipation. When, therefore, the design of
recalling him was made known to them, they
resolved before his departure, to honour him
with some brilliant testimony of their gratitude
and regard. For this purpose, the celebrated
entertainment called the
Meschianza
was
devised. It was a fete, which has been justly
termed the
most splendid
ever given by an
army to their general. It was a medley of
entertainments, consisting of land and naval
spectacles, and triumphal processions, tilts and
tournaments, banquets and balls, and fire works,
in the most fanciful and imposing style of
magnificence
that a luxuriant imagination could
devise, or the resources of a large and tasteful
city could produce, when called into activity
by the great wealth and unlimited authority of
the projectors. The expense was borne by
twenty-two officers, and to two of the most
tasteful and ingenious of this number, the
accomplished
Andre and the gifted Delancey, the
devising and arranging of the decorations were
committed. Six marshals and four stewards
were appointed to superintend the processions
and entertainments, and to give order and
regularity
to the numerous company which was
invited to the festivity.
At this day, there is to be seen, at the
southern extremity of Philadelphia, on the
western side of Fifth street, a venerable
building
of large dimensions, which bears, among
the populace of the neighbourhood, the name
of Duke Wharton's Castle. This edifice
laboured long under the evil report of being
haunted by the spirit of some person said to
have been murdered within its walls. It was,
in consequence, for many years uninhabited.
It has lately, however, been taken into the
public service, and now aids the cause of
humanity
,
as an asylum for destitute and orphan
children.
This is the remarkable mansion which, on
the 18th of May, 1778, was selected to be the
scene of the magnificent pageant and costly
festivity under consideration. It was then,
indeed, a noble mansion, the country seatfor
many a green field, now covered with streets,
lay between it and fair Philadelphiaof
Marmaduke
Wharton, Esq. This gentleman was
friendly to the royal cause, and cheerfully
permitted
his residence to be used for the
occasion
.
Between this mansion and the Delaware, a
distance of about three furlongs, the ground is
extremely level, and at the time of the
memorable
gala of which we are writing, was far
from being entirely stripped of its sylvan
grandeur. On that day, in truth, it being the
season when forest verdure is in its prime,
many a flourishing and picturesque group of
oaks, and elms, and walnuts, and willows,
which are now no more, ornamented the
landscape
,
sheltering in their bosoms clusters of
cottages, and skirting the numerous richly
blossomed
orchards and sweet-scented meadows that
lay extended between them.
In making preparations for this splendid gala,
the army of Britain was occupied for many
days. The appartments of the mansion were
decorated by the skill and industry of Andre
and Delancey, both eminent scenic painters,
whose taste gave to the whole fabric, the
appearance
of an enchanted palace. In front of
the mansion was a beautiful flower garden,
with fresh-trimmed walks, arbours and sylvan
seats, amidst which, the most gaudy of the gay
daughters of Flora, were then rejoicing in
their vernal bloom. Eastward of this
garden
,
and separated from it by an ornamented
paling, an oblong meadow, of about four
acres of ground, perfectly level, extended itself
towards the Delaware. This was the field
appropriated
for the grand romantic tournament,
in which the chivalric knights of The
Blended
Rose, were to encounter those of The
Burning Mountain, in maintenance of the
superiority in beauty and merit, of the ladies
of their choice, over those of their antagonists.
Into this field, which was surrounded for
the occasion, by a strong and high fence of
palisades, there were four entrancesone at
each sidewith folding gates. At each
entrance
was placed a guard of twelve soldiers,
commanded by a sergeant. The British
banner
raised itself loftily from the high posts, to
which the gates were hung. It also displayed
itself at each corner of the field, under the
protection
of a suitable guard.
At the eastern gate was a splendid triumphal
arch, inscribed to Sir William Howe. It was
erected
on columns of the Tuscan order, and covered
with branches of laurel, among which, various
flowers, and particularly the red and white
roses of England, were intermingled. On the
top, the emblematic lion of Great Britain,
pressed his rampant foot upon a succumbent
globe. The titles of Sir William Howe, the
victories he had gained, and his various civic
as well as military merits, were emblazoned
on the entablature of this arch in letters of gold.
At the western gate, which opened from the
garden already mentioned, another triumphal
arch arose, of a similar structure to the
preceding
,
but with different emblems. It was
dedicated to Lord Howe, the Admiral. It was
surmounted by a very beautiful miniature ship
of war, and each front was decorated with a
handsome painting of Neptune, with his
trident
,
ruling the ocean. Inscriptions eulogistic
of Lord Howe's naval exploits, were
conspicuously
displayed on the entablature.
In the centre of this field, a portion of
ground, somewhat exceeding half an acre, was
marked off for the lists in which the champions
were to exhibit their prowess. It was of an
oval form, encircled by a range of posts
tastefully
painted, and connected by a
circumference
of strong net-work manufactured for the
purpose. This area had also four gates
corresponding
with those of the larger field. The
avenues leading from these gates crossed
each other at the centre, where, by widening
considerably, they left vacant a large circular
space of green and smooth swardthe spot on
which the gallant knights were to display their
valour in daring tournament.
The sides of these avenues were bounded,
partly by four platforms several feet high, and
partly by palisade fences which connected them
with the circumambient net-work. These
platforms
were constructed of wood, and overlaid
with carpets. On each of them were erected
four splendid pavilions furnished with seats,
with cushions covered with richly coloured
satin
.
Externally the pavilions were adorned
with ribbons and fringes of gorgeous hues,
intermixed
with festoons of flowers and
evergreens
.
They ranged north and south, and
consequently
fronted each other east and west.
Those on the west had on their tops, banners of
white silk edged with scarlet; the banners of
those on the east were of orange silk edged
with black. These were the seats prepared
for the fair ladies, in compliment to whose
charms the knightly combat was to take place.
Immediately behind the pavilions on the
north-eastern platform, was elevated a superb
stage, accessible by several steps, and
surrounded
,
save on the front or western side, by a
handsome row of balustrades. On this were
placed three splendid chairs, the central of
which exceeding the others in magnificence,
was appropriated for General Howe, that on
the left for his brother, the admiral, and that
on the right for Sir Henry Clinton. The
residue
of the area within the net-work, contained
numerous ranges of benches and seats for the
accommodation of the large and brilliant
company
of spectators and guests who had
received
invitation cards from the stewards and
marshals
.
In the outer field also there were placed
many benches, and high scaffolding on the back
ground, for the accommodation of the
promiscuous
multitude that assembled from the city
and adjacent country to witness the exhibition.
To many of these, especially of the juvenile
class, the numerous tall trees then growing in
the vicinity, afforded much facility for
viewing
the novel and brilliant scene.
While artists and mechancis of various
descriptions
were busily employed in making
preparations for this grand pageant, the
sensation
of high expectance, among all ranks and
parties throughout the city, was very great.
Many ladies and gentlemen were invited. Nor
were these invitations, so far at least as regarded
the fair sex, confined to the royalists. Many
of the most fascinating belles of the day, were
professed whigs, and to have omitted these in
their invitations, would have accorded neither
with the gallantry nor the inclinations of the gay
Sir William Howe and his high-spirited
officers
.
Among the whig ladies thus invited,
we may readily suppose that Harriet Lewis
was included. Her whiggism was not, indeed,
of that obstinate description which would
induce
her to deny herself a pleasure of this
kind. Yet she refused both the first and
second
invitations she received, because she
wished
not to confer any favour on those who
tendered
them. The first, from Harris, who
eagerly seized this occasion to ingratiate
himself
in her esteem, she promptly rejected. The
second was from a young officer who had,
some time previous, made her an unacceptable
tender of his love, and to whom she was now
unwilling to afford any encouragement. With
T
such an ornament to their festivity, however,
its projectors were resolved not to dispense.
At their solicitation, Sir Robert Radnor
presented
her a card. He was an inmate of her
father's
house, he was advanced in life, and an
invalid; and whatever might have been his
conduct
formerly, since she became acquainted
with him, it had been such as to merit her
approbation
and esteem. She, therefore, with
her father's approbation, consented to attend
Sir Robert, and was immediately appointed
one of the Nymphs of the Blended Rose, Sir
Robert, invalid as he was, having resolved to
become her knight.
The entertainments of the day began with
an aquatic excursion, or grand regatta. Soon
after mid-day, the galleys and barges adorned
for the occasion, with splendid streamers and
trophies of naval triumphs, received their
joyous
company of fair ladies and gay gentlemen,
from a wharf at the upper part of the city.
Thence, in three divisions, rowing to soft
harmony
,
they proceeded down the river. The
first division was led by the Ferret galley,
having
on board Lord Catheart, General
Abercrombie
,
Sir Robert Meredith, and many other
officers with their favourite fair. The Hussar
galley which led the second division,
contained
Sir William Howe, Lord Howe, and Sir
Henry Clinton, with the officers of their suite,
and their chosen ladies. Then came the
Cornwallis
galley with her division, freighted with
gallant officers and the fair they loved. Each
division was preceded by a barge with a band
of music, whose measured cadences and swelling
strains gave regularity and precision to the
strokes of the well-trained rowers, who, with
graceful action, moved them down the stream.
Around this gay assemblage of beauty and
gallantry, armed borges, manned with marines,
lightly floated in all directions to keep off the
throngs of boats filled with beholders that
pressed towards the procession. In this joyous
and brilliant style, they moved forward, on
the smooth bosom of the Delaware, in the
view of thousands of admiring spectators, who
crowded to the wharves, and filled the
windows
and balconies of all the houses within
sight of the grand and novel spectacle.
Three ships of war, the Fanny, the
Roebuck
,
and the Vigilant, with a long line of
transport
ships, lay at regular intervals in the
middle
of the broad river, highly decorated, their
colours flying, and their yard-arms manned
with the seamen, who, as the grand regatta
majestically passed, uncovered their heads, and
waving their hats, saluted it with loud cheers.
But the principal cheering took place when
the central division arrived opposite High
street. Here, at a given signal, the pageant
stopped
,
and the blithe oars-men rested on their
oars. Each of the war-ships then fired a salute,
and all the bands played, God save the king,
which was followed by three distinct cheers
from the seamen, and responded with long and
loud acclamations by the exhilarated mulitude
on shore!
At length, after floating proudly down the
stream for nearly three miles, the galleys came
to the appointed place of landing, at the lower
end of the city, where the republican
navy-yard
has since been established. Here from
the decks, the delighted company beheld
the extensive mansion which was to be the
scene of their festivity, with the royal standard
of England waving from its towering roof,
and announcing that it was ready to open its
hospitable gates and receive them to the
splendid
entertainments now provided for them
within its walls.
From the landing place to where the
triumphal
arch of General Howe, already
described
,
was erected, a distance of about a quarter
of a mile, there extended a sylvan arcade
twenty-four
feet wide. It was constructed of green
branches from the adjacent woods, wearing
their leafy honours, and enameled with flowers
and blossoms in every gay variety that could
be furnished by the genial month of May.
A carpet of green baize covered the whole
length of the arcade; and as the company
passed
,for
this was their way to the scene of
festivity
,it
was lined on each side within by a
file of grenadiers, and protected without by
several companies of light horse. Another
salute
of seventeen guns from the ships
announced
the landing of the gallant cavaliers and fair
dames. The bands then struck up General
Howe's March, and the brilliant party
proceeded
to the Field of the Tournament.
To describe minutely the magnificent
dresses
of the ladies and gentlemen on the occasion,
would extend this account of the Meschianza
beyond all reasonable limits. A very succinct
notice of the costumes of the Knights of The
Blended Rose, and their antagonists the
Knights of The Burning Mountain, and of
the dresses of the ladies whom they selected
from among the Philadelphia fair, as the
objects
for whom they chose to combat, is all
that can be given.
The White Knights, or those of the Blended
Rose, wore coats of white silk with broad
borders of scarlet, and epaulets representing
white and red roses growing from one stem.
The same device was displayed on their shields,
and their heralds bore it aloft, in the form of
a beautiful boquet embossed on satin, as the
insignia
of their order. The motto was
We
T 2
droop when separated
. They were seven in
number, and their chief was Lord Cathcart.
The Black Knights, or those of the Burning
Mountain, were also seven in number. Their
costume was black ground with orange
borders
,
emblematic of a mountain in flames. A
burning mountain was their heraldic insignia,
and their motto,
I burn for ever
. Captain
Watson of the guards was their leader.
The ladies of the Blended Rose were
dressed
in Turkish habits of rich and gaudy silk,
on which were embroidered garlands of white
and red roses in many a bright and fanciful
festoon. Their turbans were encircled with
chaplets of the same gay flowers wrought in
silk of the purest white and the gayest
scarlet
.
In the front of the sash which encircled
her waist, each had fixed the glittering present
with which she was to reward her knight.
The ladies of the Burning Mountain were
also in oriental habits; but the prevailing
colours
of their apparel were purple and orange.
They also wore in their sashes the rewards to
be conferred on their knights.
When the company entered the area
prepared
for the tournament, the marshals conducted
the ladies to their pavilions. The nymphs of
the Blended Rose were placed on the west
side of the space marked out for the lists.
Those of the Burning Mountain were seated
opposite to them on the east.
Sir William Howe, having ascended his
chair of state, and the marshals having
informed
the heralds that every thing was prepared
for the reception of the knights, those at the
southern gate threw it open, and proclaimed
that the White Knights were advancing.
Immediately
the sound of trumpets at a distance
was heard, and in about a minute the
champions
of the Blended Rose entered, visored,
and, underneath their tunics, vested in
glittering
mail, and nobly mounted on grey chargers
richly caparisoned in their chosen colours of
white and red. Each knight was followed by
his squire on foot, in martial attire, carrying
his spear and shield. Three times did they
make the circuit of the lists, saluting the
ladies
on both sides, as they passed. They then
took their station on the west, in a line with
their own ladies.
Their trumpeters again sounded a long
flourish
,
after which their chief herald made
proclamation
,
in the name of the Knights of the
Blended Rose, that the Ladies of their choice
excelled in wit, beauty and accomplishments,
those of the whole world, and that they are
ready to enter the lists against any knights
who shall dare to deny the same, according to
the ancient laws of chivalry. This challenge
being thrice repeated, the herald at the
northern
gate threw it open, and announced the
approach
of the Knights of the Burning
Mountain
.
Presently the sound of trumpets was
heard from that direction, and the Black
Knights, preceded by their heralds and
trumpeters
soon entered. Their horses were jet
black, but their caparisons displayed the
brilliant
flame of the orange: and their black
armour
was richly variegated with spangles of
glowing gold. Like their antagonists, each
was attended by his squire bearing his lance
and shield; and like them, they rode thrice
round the lists, each time making their
obeisance
to the ladies. They then drew up in
front of their antagonists, while their herald
proclaimed their defiance to the challenge of
the White Knights, in the following terms.
The Knights of the Burning Mountain will
disprove, not by words, but by deeds, the
vainglorious
assertion of the Knights of the
Blended
Rose; and they now enter the lists to
maintain
that the Ladies of the Burning Mountain
are not excelled in beauty, virtue or
accomplishments
,
by any in the universe.
The chief of the White Knights then threw
down his gauntlet, which the leader of the
other knights instantly ordered his squire to
take up. The trumpeters of each party now
sounded a flourish, during which the squires
handed to their respective knights their shields
and lances. These being fixedthe shields on
their left-arms and the lances in their restsa
short pause ensued. Then, at a signal from the
chief marshal, the Knights saluted each other
by a movement of their lances, and wheeled
round to commence their career. On their
return
,
they encountered each other at full
gallop
,
and their spears were shivered to pieces
against their impenetrable shields. They again
wheeled, and received pistols from their squires,
with which they renewed the attack. The
third attack was with swords, which furiously
clashing against each other, or sounding upon
the shields, produced an excitement and alarm
among the spectators, almost as intense as the
shock of a real battle.
At length, at a signal from Sir William
Howe, the marshals proclaimed a parley, and
each knight resumed his station. The
marshals
then, having conferred with the ladies,
delivered their commands that the knights
should desist from further combat, for that the
Nymphs of the Blended Rose and of the
Burning
Mountain, were perfectly satisfied with the
proofs of love and feats of valour they had
displayed
.
At that instant, the whole company was
thrown into confusion by one of the champions
of the Blended Rose falling suddenly from his
horse. Miss Lewis was much agitated on
learning that it was her knight, Sir Robert
Radnor
;
and she was hastening amidst the crowd
to his assistance, when one of the Black
Knights, now dismounted, threw himself in
her way.
Sweetest Nymph of the Roses, said he,
whither fliest thou so hastily?
Knowest thou, she asked, whether Sir
Robert Radnor be much injured?
I know not, fair one, was the reply.
But why so solicitous about Sir Robert?
Methinks
a
melee
like this was an ill place for
one so infirm as he.
Instantly a cry was heard among the crowd,
He is bleedinghe is wounded! Quickness
of thought was one of the characteristics of
Miss Lewis, who was now aware that she was
talking with Harris, whose hostile feelings
towards
Sir Robert, she strongly suspected.
Methinks, Captain Harris, she said, that
you are not quite ignorant of the cause of this
accident.
He started, as if stung by an adder, and
forgetting
himself for a moment, he exclaimed,
Beware of what thou sayst! Beautiful as thou
art, such a charge is too serious not to be
resented
!
Resented! cried a voice behind him.
Shame to thee, uncourteous and ruffian
knight! Speakest thou so to a lady? Outside
of this thronged enclosure, if thou darest
follow
me, I will prove upon thy body, that thou
art unworthy of knighthood.
Harris turned to the speaker, almost
choked
with rage. The countenance was masked,
but the person and voice brought Edward
Meredith
to his recollection. What! a rebel
spy amongst us! said he. It would,
indeed
,
be unworthy of knighthood to measure
swords with a criminal so base. Thou art prey
for the gallows! So saying, he turned his
eye in search of some subaltern officer whom
he might charge with the custody of Meredith,
for he felt assured of his identity, when a
voice that sent a cold shuddering through his
frame, addressed him:
Beware! beware! it said: Wretch, thy
own doom approacheth! The speaker passed
near him. It was the awful figure that was
presented
to his imagination in all his solitudes
and serious hours. He saw it but for an instant;
but that instant was enough to unnerve his
frame. His limbs shook, and he fell to the
earth with a groan which soon brought round
him a crowd of spectators.
In the mean time, Meredith, having
conducted
Miss Lewis back to her pavilion, to which
her father, who had attended as a spectator
of the tournament, now came to take charge
of her, was again mingling with the crowd,
when he became apprized that he was the
object
of suspicion to two officers who had
over-heard
the words of Harris, and who were
evidently watching his movements with close
and alarming attention. He perceived his
danger
;
but he lost not his presence of mind, and
he fortunately applied to a source whence he
procured the means of extrication from his
perilous situation, in the manner which shall
be hereafter related.
The wound of Sir Robert Radnor had
evidently
been made by the sword of Harris, who
was his antagonist; but it was, even by himself,
imputed to accident. A carriage was soon
procured
,
and in company with a surgeon, he was
conveyed to his lodging. Harris soon
recovered
;
but the cause of his disorder remained
unknown
.
One expression only which escaped
him before he had gained his perfect
self-possession
,
excited among those who heard it,
much surprise and conjecture. Friends!
he cried, is that fearful spectre gone! But
instantly recollecting himself, he begged their
indulgence. I have been in a delirium he
said, and I fear I shall become frequently
liable to these fits. He then artfully inquired
for Sir Robert Radnor, stating that his concern
for the wound he had unintentionally given
him, had been the chief cause of the mental
disorder with which he had been attacked.
But, in truth, Harris, felt no sympathy for
Sir Robert Radnor. He had, as Miss Lewis
plainly intimated, wilfully inflicted the wound.
His mortification at the preference which
Harriet
had shown for Sir Robert in accepting his
invitation to the Meschianza, after rejecting
one from himself, was exceedingly great, and
he thirsted for revenge. He accordingly
procured
his enrolment among the Black Knights,
knowing that Sir Robert was enrolled among
those of the Blended Rose, with the view of
encountering him during the tournament, and
inflicting on him a mortal wound which might
seem the result of accident.
U
CHAPTER XVIII.
Dread shade! what mean'st thou? Hast thou not in secret
Tormented me enough? In the thronged hall,
Filled with the gay and giddy sons of mirth,
Can I not find a refuge from those looks
That wither up my strength, and make my thoughts
Intolerable to my own sensations?
Thaunus
.
For a tournament of gallant knights, in the
presence of their fair ladies, to have
terminated
without bloodshed, or disaster of some
kind, would have been altogether out of
keeping
.
It would have betokened a sad
degeneracy
in the heroism, whatever improvement it
might have indicated in the courtesy, of
modern
chivalry. The occurrences, therefore,
related
at the close of the last chapter,
unexpected
,
and, to a few individuals, painful as they
were, did not long interrupt the general
hilarity
of the company. On the contrary, it
gave a characteristic piquancy to the scene,
throwing over it an air of romantic fierceness,
without which many would have pronounced
it a dull spectacle, altogether unworthy of the
genius of knighthood.
Fortunate events, therefore, having so far
preserved the character of the fete, and
rendered
it satisfactory to all, its projectors highly
delighted
with their success, diffused their good
humour throughout the company, and
proceeded
,
with elated spirits, to the remaining parts
of the entertainments.
Accordingly, as soon as Sir Robert Radnor
was removed, and Captain Harris's
mysterious
disorder had disappeared, the marshals
arranged
the company into proper order for
proceeding
to the festal halls. The knights
having
dismounted and sent away their horses,
conducted their ladies, moving to the sounds
of sweet music, towards the mansion. They
passed, walking on handsome carpets, and the
rest of the company following in regular
procession
,
under the triumphal arch of Admiral
Lord Howe, through the western gate into the
garden in front of the house. Thence they
proceeded up a flight of steps into the great
hall, where the ladies being placed on elevated
seats, conferred their rewards on their
respective
knights, who received them kneeling, and
with fervent expressions of gratitude and
everlasting
devotion to the fair donors. The
champion
of Harriet Lewis being absent, his squire
received the guerdon from her with the
expression
of suitable thanks, in his stead. The
article
thus presented was a magnificent broach
of peculiar construction, which had that
morning
been given to her by her father for this
purpose
,
and to which reference will again be made.
In this spacious hall and the four adjoining
rooms where the company were now
assembled
,
and which were splendidly decorated,
the walls being painted in imitation of Siena
marble, enclosing festoons of white marble,
refreshments of tea, lemonade, wine, &c. were
distributed among the guests. After partaking
of these, they were ushered up stairs, to an
extensive ball-room, radiant and gay with
costly
effulgence. Its walls were painted in a
light and elegant slyle, and hung over with
eighty-five large mirrors, bedecked with a
profusion
of bright ribbons and gaudy flowers.
Thirty-four splendid branches were prepared,
when night should come, to banish her shades, and
pour out a stream of radiance that should amply
compensate the want of day. On the same floor
were drawing rooms decorated and lighted in
the style of the ball-room, and containing
side-boards
loaded with every species of luxury.
Soon the musicians poured forth their
mirthstirring
strains, and the knights, with their
ladies
,
commenced, amidst a scene of enchanting
beauty, the exhilarating joyousness of the dance,
which, for many hours, animated the gay and
the gallant,
Who flying on enjoyment's wings,
Forgot the flight of time!
At length, about 10 o'clock, a pause in the
buoyant mirth took place, and the
entertainment
was diversified by the opening of the
windows, and the presentation to the admiring
spectators, of a splendid display of fire-works,
sporting and wreathing their spiral forms in
the field of the late tournament. These had
been planned, with great care and skill, by the
chief of the engineers. They consisted of
twenty different sets of displays, chiefly
radiating
,
in the innumerable figures they assumed,
around the triumphal arches which were
momentarily
changed, as if by magic, into a
brilliant
succession of interesting shapes and
devices
.
At the hour of twelve, supper was
announced
,
and instantly two large folding doors,
before
concealed, sprung open, and displayed to
view, a magnificent saloon, constructed for the
occasion, amidst the trees and shrubberies of
an extensive garden behind the house. This
romantic apartment was two hundred and ten
feet long, forty wide, and twenty-two high.
On each side were three alcoves in which were
contained side-boards and shelves loaded with
provisions, wine, and all the luxuries of the
costly feast.
The sides of this great saloon were decorated
with vine leaves, and chaplets of flowers and
ribbons, intermixed with fifty-six large pier
glasses, which, on each side reflected the
gaudy
scene of festivity in the centre, so as to
entertain
and bewilder the astonished spectator
U 2
with the view of three banquets in stead of
one. Three hundred wax-tapers, in silver
candle-sticks
,
placed along the tables; one hundred
and twelve variegated branches ranged around
the sides, two above each mirror; and eighteen
gorgeous lustres of twenty-four lights each
hanging
from the ceiling, illuminated the
magnificent
scene,
And taught the midnight hour's bewitching time,
In radiant pomp, to rival that of noon!
Twelve hundred dishes covered the
sumptuous
tables, and the guests were attended by
fifty waiters, twenty-five of whom were black
slaves in oriental dresses, with collars of silver,
and bracelets of gold.
The number of guests who sat down to this
splendid banquet, were four hundred and fifty,
about one hundred and seventy of whom were
ladies, whose beauty, glowing amidst the
effulgent
scene, gave them the appearance of so
many houries in Paradise.
At the close of the feast, a herald attended by
trumpeters entered, and announced as the first
toastThe King and the Royal Family!
which was drunk with cheers, followed by the
music of several bands playing the British
national
anthem, God save the king. A
succession
of toasts followed, announced by the
same herald, and honoured by a flourish of
trumpets, and the swelling pomp of animating
music.The feast being finished, the guests
returned to the ball-room, and again drove
thought away in the joyous agitations of the
animating dance.
It was about three o'clock in the morning,
and none of the gay company seemed yet to
flag in their enjoyments, when a female figure
of remarkable exility, dressed in white, and
closely veiled, entered the splendid apartment.
One of the heralds approached to ascertain her
wishes.
A boon! a boon! she said, in tones so
ethereally sweet, that they interested every
auditor, a boon, from your brave
commander
.
Ask it, fair damsel! cried Howe,
advancing
towards her.
Permission, for but a few minutes, to tread
a simple measure, in the dance, with a gallant
knight in this assembly.
Right fair and romantic! exclaimed the
jovial Howe. Faith, this pleases me. It is
a fine incident.Your request is granted, lady.
Choose your partner. Knights, stand forward!
All the knights eagerly approached, anxious
to be selected on an occasion so remarkable,
except one, who, as if desirous to avoid
observation
,
remained aloof amidst the crowd. He
was one, on whose heart the stranger's voice
had, indeed, produced an impression quite
different
from what it had communicated to the
rest of the company. To him, the tones,
though sweet, were unaccountably awful, and,
although it was in the midst of a numerous
assembly
that he heard them, he feared to
approach
the being by whom they were uttered.
The lady looked upon the knightly
candidates
for her favour. These are noble
knights, said she. But he with whom
alone I am to dance, comes not forward. Yet
my eye can reach him. Captain Harris, thou
art the man!
The eyes of all were turned upon Harris,
and all wondered at his evident reluctance to
be seen.
Sir Harris, forward, like a true knight, at
your lady's call! cried Howe.
Harris obeyed. He felt ashamed that his
agitation had been observed; and he was
resolved
not to appear afraid to accept a
preference
which, by any other officer present, he
perceived, would have been considered a
triumph
.Besides,
why should this unknown
lady cause him to feel disturbed? Her voice
and form, it is true, resembled those of the
awful spirit which, for many months, had
haunted him, and rendered his life miserable.
But her features were concealed, and it might
not be she. Nay, it was improbable that it
was she. Spirits are seldom, if ever, visible
to many individuals at the same time. But
this lady was seen at once by a whole
assembly
.
These thoughts, passing rapidly through his
mind, reassured him, and advancing with an
effort towards the stranger, he offered her his
hand, saying, Fair madam, I am proud of
your preference, and am ready to obey all your
commands.
She declined accepting his hand. Approach
no nearer! said she. We dance together,
but we touch not.
He acquiesced; for her voice had the power
of a spell upon his spirit.
Let your musicians play Lough Errock's
Side, first in slow, and, then in quick time,
said she to one of the heralds, who stood near
her. You know it was my father's favourite
air, she added in a low voice intended for
Harris's ear only. He started. The words
sent a thrill of terror to his heart; for it
informed
him, that this was, indeed, the dreaded
spectre of Mary Balantyne. The presence of
his gay companions, and the commencement of
the music, however, in some degree dissipated
his terror. The injunction also to avoid all
contact with his aerial partner assisted greatly
to support him through the fearful task he had
now to perform.
During the time the music played in slow
measure, the company was struck with the
impressive
solemnity of the lady's movements,
which were also distinguished by a
gracefulness
that extorted unanimous admiration. So
light and easy was she in her windings and
progressions, that she seemed to swim along,
rather than tread on the floor, and so accurate
in the formation of the figures of the dance,
that it might have been supposed, that she
made perfection in the accomplishments of the
ball-room, the chief study of her life. But,
when the sprightly strain commenced, the
spectators became really electrified with
delight
at her performance. Her agility and
grace seemed truly preternatural. Harris was
the only individual who felt no astonishment.
He was, indeed, too much overawed to
observe
her excellence. But had it been
otherwise
,
such excellence in the gracefulness and
agility of the dance, would have been only
what he had often rapturously witnessed in the
performances of Mary Balantyne, when, in the
days of her beauty and light-heartedness, she
threaded the mazy rounds with her joyous
companions on the banks of the Brandywine,
and excelled them all.
She had danced about five or six minutes, when,
on passing Harris in her course towards the
door, which was open on account of the warmth,
she, for an instant showed him her features by
a sudden movement of her veil, and
disappeared
with the rapidity of a flash of lightning. A
shock went through his whole frame. He
staggered some distance, and then fell
convulsively
on the floor.
For some minutes the surprise and confusion
in the ball-room was so great, that no one
thought of following the mysterious dancer.
Exclamations of Wonderful! Who is she?
Who can she be? What has she done? What
is the matter with Captain Harris? were
freely
and abundantly interchanged. But no one
could answer questions which every one was
so eager to ask. All flocked towards Harris,
partly from sympathy for his distress, and
partly to obtain some explanation of the
mystery
.
It was some time before he recovered
sufficiently to converse in a rational manner,
and when he did so recover, he was either
unable
or unwilling to throw any light on the
subject. Before he regained his self-command
he uttered several ejaculations relative to the
torments to which he was subjected by the
dreaded vision, which served only to increase
the perplexity and give a dark cast to the
surmises
of the company.
On the restoration of his powers of
reflection
,
his mortification became extreme. He
dared not reveal the truth, and he was too
much perplexed to invent an explanatory
statement
which might seem probable. Indeed, so
uncomfortable did he now feel, that, as soon
as the amusements of the company were
resumed
,
and attention began to be diverted from
him, he withdrew, for the purpose of
returning
to his lodging, where he might, at least
for a season, be secure from witnessing the
disgrace
or pity into which he conceived himself
to have fallen.
After the preceding mysterious adventure,
although the music and the dance were
recommenced
,
the hilarity was gone, and the
enjoyment
could not be restored. The impression
made upon the minds of even the most
unreflecting
of the company, by the singular
conduct
of the strange ladyher informal and bold
self-introductionher haughty and dictatorial
bearingher wonderful dancingher rapid
and unexpected disappearanceand the
overpowering
effects of her proceedings upon the
mind of a reckless soldier like Harris,all these
produced a seriousness of thought which no
attempt at the renewal of mirth could remove,
and which were felt by all present to be so
uncongenial with the gay and splendid scenes
which surrounded them, and the mirthful
purpose
for which they were assembled, that, with
common consent, shortly after the departure
of Harris, they resolved to retire.
Thus terminated the brilliant feats and
costly
entertainments of the memorable
Meschi
anza
of 1778, in Philadelphia. And thus
closed the greatest and last exhibition of
romantic
grandeur, and extravagant folly, which
this fair
City of Independence
was ever to
witness under a foreign rule; for in one short
month afterwards, the gay soldiers of Britain
departed, and, with them, every vestige of
foreign
authority, to return no more.
X
CHAPTER XIX.
Her memory brooded o'er her injuries,
And she beheld them so remediless,
That in her heart of sensibility,
Grief, like a poisonous worm, gnawed deep, and sent
A thrill of madness to her tortured brain,
And nerved her with an awful energy
To meet the horrors of that vengeful hour.
Thaunus
.
Though Harris had left the ball-room
secretly
,
he had not left it altogether unnoticed.
There was one man whose observation he
did not escape; it was the herald who
addressed
the mysterious lady on her entrance.
Unperceived, he followed the steps of Harris,
until the latter reached the place of the
tournament
,
where the officers' servants were
stationed
with their horses. His servant, however,
was not to be found. On inquiring for him,
the herald who had purposely thrown himself
in his way, informed him, that he was then in
one of the recesses adjoining the banquetting
saloon, so overcome with intoxication as to be
unable to attend to his duty. But, added
the herald, as I am now disengaged from my
office, if you will accept of my service, I will
attend you.
Harris accepted the offer. His horses were
found in their proper place ready saddled. The
knight and his attendant were soon mounted.
They proceeded by the eastern gate, through
the triumphal arch of General Howe, along
the sylvan arcade formerly mentioned,
towards
the Delaware. When about a furlong
from the arch, their progress was suddenly
interrupted
by two men who sprung from amidst
the bushes of the arcade, and seizing upon
Harris, with the aid of the herald,who had
volunteered his attendance, after making his
servant drunk, for the purpose of bringing him
into this snarein a moment gagged and
pinioned
him. They then hastened, the two
assailants
being also on horseback, towards the
Schuylkill, which they passed a short distance
below Gray's Ferry, in a flat boat which lay
there ready to receive them.
After half an hour's brisk travelling, being
then beyond all danger from pursuit, they
removed
the gag from their prisoner, but still
kept him pinioned. The dawn soon began to
appear, and Harris became convinced of what
he had, even while it was dark, strongly
suspected
,
that one of his captors was the man
whom of all the human race he had most
injured
the
unhappy Balantyne. He shrunk
conscience-struck and abashed from the first
glance by which he recognized the grief-worn
and now haggard features of the
much-suffering
victim of his ungrateful villany. The two
others he knew not. It, indeed, occurred to
him that they were both disguised, their
appearance
indicating a much more advanced
age, especially in the case of the herald, than
was consistent with the activity and vigour
they had manifested since his capture.
They were evidently not afraid of meeting
with any enemy, for they passed on, with great
confidence, in the broad light of day, scarcely
seeming to prefer by-paths on their route. At
length, on arriving at a tavern where they
found a small party of Chester county militia
on parade, who loudly cheered when they
beheld
the lately dreaded plunderer and
devastator
,
Captain Harris, in custody, they halted
for breakfast.
Balantyne here left them. I will not,
said he, sit at the table and eat bread with
the author of my daughter's ruin and of the
dreadful anguish I have so long endured. I
will go before you to the place of atonement.
Guard him well, my friends, and let him be
brought there by twilight this evening.
The herald now threw off his disguise, and
appearing in the uniform of the militia
volunteers
of the district, was instantly known to the
terror-struck prisoner, as William Barton, on
whose father's family he had exercised such
cruelty. The name of his other captor and
guardsman was also no longer concealed. It
was Francis Holmes. The plot which they
had laid to obtain possession of the person of
Harris, having thus succeeded to their utmost
wishes, they proceeded without delay to the
performance of the remaining part of their
designs
against him. It soon indeed became
necessary
for them to depart with their prisoner,
as several of the militia who had suffered much
from his spoliations, began to clamour loudly
for the infliction of a summary revenge. The
address and management, however, of his
active
captors, extricated him from this danger;
and they set out with him to the place of his
destination, where they arrived at the time
appointed
by Balantyne.
The weather was fine; and the serene
heavens
and the verdant earth combined to
exhibit
one of the loveliest May evenings that
ever adorned nature, as they approached the
place. The scenery around was familiar to
Harris, for he had often wandered amidst its
beauties, in the company of Mary Balantyne;
and he sighed deeply, when he reflected on
the difference of his situation then from what
it now wasand that difference, torturing
conscience
told him was the result of his own
misdeeds
.
At length, the travellers approached, by an
obscure and indirect path through a thick
wood, a small stone building, which Harris
X 2
knew to be the place of worship of a
congregation
of Presbyterians in the neighbourhood of
Dilworth. In this sacred edifice, Balantyne
himself
,
in virtue of his former ordination to the
ministry
,
frequently in the absence of the regular
incumbent, professionally officiated. Into this
church Harris was now ushered. At first he
perceived
no one present, but his conductors.
Solitude
,
silence and solemnity filled the holy place,
and breathed an impressive, and to the
wretched
sinner who now entered it, a heart-chilling
sensation of preternatural awe. On
approaching
the pulpit, however, Mr. Balantyne, who
had been kneeling at his devotion when they
entered, arose to view, and stood in the midst
of it.
Ah! art thou come, at length, said he,
addressing himself to Harris. I have long
waited impatiently for this hour. It is now,
hard-hearted and wicked man, that thou must
atone for the grievous injury thou hast done
my only childthe terrible calamity thou hast
brought upon both her and me. Thou must
now apply the only remedy in thy power
to heal the cruel wounds thou hast inflicted.
Thou must WED MY DAUGHTER!
Harris started with astonishment at the
strange injunction, and looking up to reply,
he was struck silent with terror at beholding
Mary Balantyne herself standing beside her
father.
What sayest thou? resumed Balantyne.
Wilt thou be joined in wedlock to this
ruined
one, thy own victim, and restore to her and
to me at least part of that peace which can
never
altogether return?
Harris now, with a great effort, assumed
courage to reply. Is this scene, said he,
real, or are the figures I behold the creations
of my disordered imagination? Are ye what
ye seem to be, mortal men of this world, and
am I your prisoner? Or are ye but
fancy-formed
images, or beings from the dead, and I
merely the sport of an unhappy delirium?
Answer metell me whether I am on earth
in the presence of earthly beings, and not at
this very moment, enwrapt in the frenzy of
an awful vision? Speak, satisfy my doubts,
and I will answer you.
All that thou beholdest is real, replied
Balantyne
.
All present are heirs to mortality,
and have yet to pass through the dark valley
of death.
Has not thy daughter been long dead?
asked Harris: Or have I been imposed on by
false information?
I have had my revenge on thee, said
Balantyne
.
I have made thee suffer, till the
moisture of mental agony has burst from thy
pores. That I may have atonement as well as
revenge, I will now undeceive thee. My
daughter, in her anguish, had taken a large
dose of a deadly liquid. By my skill and care,
the mortality it would have occasioned, was
prevented. It caused stupor, which the
by-standers
mistook for death. I knew the ruin
she had undergonethe disgrace she had
suffered
.
But the world knew it not. I
therefore
determined to conceal it; and at the same
time, formed the plan of tormenting thee, till
thy conscience should be made sensible of thy
guilt. A fictitious funeral was for that
purpose
exhibited; and by the aid of those bold
men now standing by your side, the other
parts of my design have been accomplished.
My daughter's shame is unknown to the
world. The issue of your crime had no
living
birth. Your victim herself is dead to the
world, and her mind, like my own, I fear,
is for ever dead to tranquillity. Such is our
story; and such have been the bitter fruits of
thy guilt. The customs of the country of my
birth, make marriage, though not a full and
perfect, yet a reputable and conciliating
reparation
,
for guilt like thine and shame like
hers. That reparation for our miseries, I now
demand of thee. By the laws of our church and
of this land, I am empowered to administer
the marriage rites. Wilt thou now yield to
the ceremony?
With the assurance that it was no spirit from
an unknown world, whose visitations he had
endured, the courage of Harris returned, and
it was a quality in which, in regard to dangers
arising from mere human hostility, he was far
from being deficient. He was desirous to
evade this proposal of marriage, conceiving
that if he should become extricated from his
present difficulty, the incumbrance with which
his compliance would entangle him, might, at
some future day, form a great impediment to
his views and progress in life.
The unhappy Mary perceived his hesitation,
and almost intuitively, she divined its
motives
.
She hurried from her place in the
pulpit
.
She stood beside her desolator, and with
a wild energy, she exclaimed:
Father! we will not be baffled thus by a
wretch, wicked and remorseless. It is for thee
I feelnot for myself. In the sight of
Heaven
and of angels, he has already
acknowledged
our union, and he then said, what I firmly
believe
to be true, that
it requires not the cold and
cumbersome formalities of men to confirm
our solemn nuptials
in the estimation of
superior
beings. But to diminish, even in part,
the disgrace which weighs so heavily upon
thee, my father, with these cold and
cumbersome
formalities he shall now comply, or by
the Eternal! who is worshipped in this holy
place, he moves not hence with life!
So saying, her form dilated, her eyes
gleamed
,
her face flushed, and the preternatural force
of an indomitable determination swelled and
invigorated her whole frame, as to the
astonishment
and terror of all present, she drew
from her bosom a dagger, which she held to
the breast of her destroyer.
Father! she said, proceedimpose
upon
us the obligations which, according to
legal
form, shall make us husband and wife;
and, if he answers not properly thereto, this
steel shall find his heart!
Struck with her earnestness, her father
proceeded
with the ceremony, and overawed by
her energy, her destroyer answered according
to form, and the nuptial rites were completed.
It is achieved! she cried. Father, your
disgrace is wiped away. Now let me die! for
I cannot bear to live the wife of a wretch like
this. But shall he live to triumph in his
escape
from me? No! angels, witness that he
shall not! Like lightning her dagger pierced
his heart, and the blood which it drew thence
was, the next moment, mingled with the blood
of her own.
The rapidity with which these fatal and
unexpected
blows were given, rendered their
prevention
by the by-standers altogether impossible. Her
horror-struck father gave a heart rending groan
and fell in a swoon upon the bleeding body of his
child. Francis and Barton were also for some
minutes struck motionless with terror. On
recovering
their presence of mind, they
hastened
to remove the father to his own dwelling,
which was at no great distance; and as the
shades of night were fast approaching, this
they were able to effect without occasioning
any alarm in the neighbourhood. At the
midnight hour, they privately buried the
corpse of the lovely, unfortunate Mary, in the
grave where, in the opinion of the world, she
had already mingled with her parent earth.
At length she rests, each sad pulsation o'er,
Her once loved form to kindred dust returned;
Man shall deceive her ardent heart no more,
For quenched the flame that in her bosom burned.
Francis at first proposed to bury Harris in
some corner of the same grave-yard that
contained
Mary Balantyne; but her lover, Barton,
thought that it would be a profanation of the
sacred ground. Francis also considered that
there would be less risk of the grave being
discovered, and suspicion thereby excited
towards
the awful catastrophe which had taken
place, if the corpse should be elsewhere
deposited
.
With careful privacy, therefore, it was
conveyed to an obscure dingle overgrown with
tall and dusky pines, and there interred where
no memorial shall ever direct a mourner to
drop a tear over the dark grave of the
betrayer
of female innocence, and the victim of
female
energy executing justice in the midst of
madness.
CONCLUSION.
The wound which Sir Robert Radnor had
received
from Harris at the
Meschianza
, was
too severe for the already shattered state of his
constitution long to support. It was some weeks,
however, before any very alarming symptoms
appeared. The day after the fete, he was in
tolerable spirits; and was much pleased when
his esquire visited him for the purpose of
delivering
to him the favour he had received in
his name, from Miss Lewis, after the
tournament
.
But what was his astonishment, when
in this gift he recognized a costly transparent
brooch, encircled with diamonds, which he had
presented to his first wife on her wedding day
about nineteen years before. At his request,
Harriet was soon in his presence.
Miss Lewis, said he, let me thank you
for this very acceptable favour. The honour
of receiving it from you on this occasion
endears
it greatly to me. But it is very dear to me
on another account. It was a marriage gift from
me to my first wife. Here are the initials of our
names; and I see the portion of her dark hair
which I caused to be embedded in the centre of
the jewel. My dear Miss Lewis, a thousand
thousand thanks for this precious relic! Can
you let me know any thing of its history?
Mr. Lewis, who had just a few moments
before
entered the apartment, replied to this
question:
Sir Robert, said he, I alone can give
you the history of that brooch; and it is
expressly
to do so that I now visit you. It was once,
as you have discovered, the property of your
wife. At her death it became the property of
mine, who was her sister; and it is now
bestowed
on you by your own daughter.
My daughter! exclaimed Sir Robert. Is
Harriet my daughter? I was informed that my
child had died. But noit must have been an
error. I seeI feel I have a child. Come to
me, Harriet! Embrace your father. I see
your mother's looks and form perfectly imaged
in yours!
Father! said the astonished Harriet to
Mr. Lewis. Is this so? Are you not my
father?
My child, no; except in true affection.
Sir Robert Radnor is indeed your father!
said Mr. Lewis, evidently very much affected.
But the joy of Sir Robert knew no bounds.
Y
He pressed his daughter to his bosom. Heaven
be praised, he exclaimed, for his goodness
in giving me such a child, the express likeness
of her beautiful motherand good, too, like
her!Oh! my child, there was surely some
latent presentiment of this happiness in my
heart, from the first moment I saw you; for
ever since then, I have borne for you a father's
love. And you have shown for me a
daughter's
duty.
And I have, she replied, felt a
daughter's
affection, with a force of sympathy which
was to myself unaccountable.
You will wonder, said Mr. Lewis, that
I did not sooner apprize you of this connexion,
when I acknowledge that it was always known
to me. My reasons may not speak much for
my candour and disinterestedness. Yet I will
avow them. In the first place, my affection
for Harriet is truly parental. I have never had
offspring of my own; and from her infancy,
she has been to me instead of a daughter. I
felt reluctance, by disclosing the truth, to
dissever
the endearing ties which bound her to
me. Secondly, Sir Robert, you will excuse me
for saying, that the motives which induced her
grandfather to give you wrong information in
relation to her death, continued, until very
lately, to influence me. You had left your
wife in Albany, in a delicate state. She wrote
often to you, but received only one or two
short replies. She died in child-birth,
recommending
her offspring to the care of her father.
His feelings not being the most favourable
towards you, he did not wish to be disturbed
with your claims upon the tender plant, the
rearing of which he resolved to undertake.
He, therefore, deceived you, in respect to
its existence. I shortly afterwards, married
his only other child, your wife's sister,
whose strong affection for her little niece,
was gratified by her grandfather permitting
her to reside with us. At his death, which
took place many years ago, the old
gentleman
divided his property between
Harriet
and my wife. Shortly after that event,
we removed to this city. My wife died a few
years since, and there now remains with me no
one on earth, save Harriet, on whose
attachment
I can place value or repose confidence.
I trust that this disclosure will not deprive
me of that filial regard which has so long
afforded me happiness, and which has become
necessary for the comfort of my remaining
days.
Never, said Harriet, embracing the good
old man, with tears of tenderness in her eyes,
never shall I withdraw from you the care,
the attention, and the affection of a daughter.
Your parental care of my child, said Sir
Robert, excites my warmest gratitude. But
let me remark, as to my apparent neglect, in
corresponding with her mother, that the hurry
and excitation of the very active and harassing
service in which I was then engaged, prevented
my writing so often, and at such length, as I
could have wished. Yet I, in truth, wrote
more and longer letters than she appears to
have received. The troubled nature of the
times and the insecurity and difficulty of mail
conveyances at that period, may well account
for the miscarriages which took place.
However
,
as the past cannot be recalled, regret is
useless. And since Providence has had in
store for me so great a blessing as that of a
daughter of whom I have so much reason to
be proud, I will endeavour to be duly
thankful
,
and shall cherish the precious gift with
affection
and delight.
But Sir Robert was not fated long to enjoy
the society of his new-found daughter. His
general debility was daily increasing. So feeble
was he, indeed, when the British army left
the city, that he was unable to accompany it.
He, therefore, resigned his commission, and
remained with his daughter.
Immediately after the American troops
repossessed
Philadelphia, Edward Meredith,
accompanied
by his mother, visited their
suffering
relative, between whom and Mrs.
Meredith
,
a reconciliation, much to their mutual
satisfaction
,
took place.Edward was now once
more in the full enjoyment of the society of
his beloved, with the additional advantages of
being a free man, and having nothing to fear
from the presence of armed foes or a
ferocious
rival. He informed Harriet that he had
been encouraged to visit the Meschianza from
the facilities afforded to his admission by
William
Barton, who, having entered the service
of Captain Delancey, as a royalist, had been
appointed one of the heralds. The practice of
wearing masks, which it was known would be
permitted to the guests, offered a disguise of
sufficient security, provided no accident
occurred
to excite observation, and that, said he,
I was willing to risk for the pleasure of
beholding
you as a Nymph of the Blended Rose,
and the other glories of the day. I had nearly,
however, paid dear for my gratification.
Immediately
after the encounter with Harris,
Barton whispered to me that the attention of
some officers was directed towards me, and
that if I did not instantly fly, I should be
apprehended
as a spy. I perceived the officers
to whom he alluded. To fly would have been
ruin, for it would have confirmed their
suspicion
.
I observed my friend, the generous
Andre, near me. In my perplexity I resolved
to throw myself on his mercy, and claim his
protection.
My God, said he, in a low voice, what
imprudence! Meredith, you are lost. But
stay; I will lull their suspicion, and get you
off safe, if I should die for it. Be my equery
for a moment: it will show them that I know
you, and will remove their suspicion.
I caught the reins of his horse. He
dismounted
,
and hastening to General Howe,
requested
a passport to enable a friend desirous
of hastily visiting a sick relation in the
country
,
to pass the pickets on the lines. He
obtained
it, and returned. Stay not, said he,
handing me the paper; and avoid loitering
for my sake, as well as your own, for should
you be detected, it will go hard with me for
imposing on the General.
I pressed his hand in token of gratitude,
and in half an hour was beyond the reach of
danger.
Heaven bless the noble-minded youth,
said Harriet. He is, and he deserves to be,
beloved by every one. He was throughout,
the animating spirit of the gay entertainment.
In his own need may he never want a friend,
nor in his danger a protector!
Meredith, with his whole heart, responded
the fervent prayer. Alas! what sorrowful
regret
would the hearts of sympathizing
thousands
have been saved from suffering, if it had
pleased Providence to have granted that
earnest
petition, and to have ordained that the
traitor of West Point, and not the spy, might
have been the victim.
The end of Sir Robert Radnor was drawing
near. He became conscious of it; and under
the impression of this consciousness, one day
towards the latter end of June, he called
Edward
and Harriet into his presence.
My children, said he, I feel that I
have not long to live. But I have become
resigned
to the inevitable dispensation. It is a
great consolation that my last hours shall be
spent in your society, and that my dying eyes
shall be closed by the hands of my own child.
My worldly affairs are all settled, save one
important
matter; and when that shall be
transacted
,
I shall be no longer burthened with
temporal
cares. I know your mutual attachment.
I approve of it. I rejoice at it; and I wish
your nuptials to take place without delay, that
I may have the satisfaction, while I yet live,
of witnessing your happiness, and of winding
up my concerns with this world, by
pronouncing
my blessing upon you as my son and
daughter.
In consequence of this request, Edward
Meredith
was soon made happy in the possession of
his lovely bride.How different was his lot from
that of his gay, accomplished, but unprincipled
rival! Fair, direct, and manly perseverance in
active duty, brought happiness to the one,
while the indulgence of fierce passions and the
commission of insidious crimes brought
destruction
on the other. Thus, even in this
world, unerring justice may raise her scale and
weight the actions of men, in order to assign
to them their due proportion of punishment or
reward. That it is often otherwise, is equally
true; for here is not the consummation of
things. We are here but in probation. The
final decision and distribution are reserved for
a more lasting state of existence.
Were it not so, oh Balantyne! who could
reconcile thy virtues and thy sufferings, with
the impartiality of Eternal Justice? How few
of mankind have been more guiltless! yet how
few have endured more misery! And what
supported thee amidst the fiery trials, and
prevented
thee from sinking under the terrors of
despair?what but thy Christian confidence in
the due apportionment of the claims of justice,
which the Unerring Ruler of all will yet make
throughout his universal Creation!
Soon after the catastrophe which deprived
the sensitive and much-enduring Balantyne of
his last worldly comforthis only childhe
removed for ever from the scene of the
terrible
calamity. Philadelphia was his place of
retreat. There he resided for many years,
leading a life of contemplation, and almost
entire
seclusion from the world.It has already
been stated that from the papers left behind
him, at his death, this history has been
compiled
.
And it is hoped that, while the
narrative
of his sorrows shall awaken the sigh of
pity in warm and generous hearts, the
example
of his endurance will teach fortitude and
resignation to those stricken spirits who are
destined to bear the storms of adversity, so
that, like him, although they may grieve, they
may never despair; but be supported through
all their sufferings, by the consoling assurance
of RETRIBUTION HEREAFTER.
THE END.My Dear Father
,
I can live no longer. My life has
been for some months but one continued
paroxysm
of mental agony. My existence much
longer would bring upon you the most
indelible
and unmitigable disgrace that could, by a
daughter, be inflicted on a father. My last
interview
with Harris proved
fatal to my
honour
.
He ruined me, and then abandoned me
for ever.That interview! alas, it was a stolen
one, unknown to you, and granted at his
entreaty
contrary to your injunctions. Oh! how
I have been punished for my disobedience!
No one has as yet perceived the effects of my
guilt in the alteration of my person. But in
a short time it would become too apparent
for concealment. Then, then, my father, you
would be disgraced for ever; and were I to
live, I would see you dying broken-hearted
and I the cause! But I will not live to witness
such a calamity. In opium there is power to
destroy
life, by lulling the senses into lethargy
and dissolving the springs of animation. I have
provided myself with the precious drug which
is to relieve me for ever from that load of
earthly misery which has become too great for
me longer to endure. Farewell, my beloved
father. Oh! do not curse me when I shall be
dead, for my last prayer to Heaven shall
ascend
for thee.To Miss Harriet Lewis,
You were once the object of my
fond attachment. I addressed you sincerely
Q
with a view to our final alliance, and we
became
engaged. Circumstances have lately given
another direction to my views. It is, therefore,
my duty to release you from your
engagement
.
I do this the more readily and
promptly
,
because I am aware that my cousin, Captain
Harris, of the British army, has placed his
affections upon you, and I am desirous of
being
no longer considered an obstacle to the
success of his suit.
Assure yourself of the continuance of my
profound respect.
Insolent miscreant! exclaimed Meredith,
tearing the paper into fragments. Do you
imagine that my feelings are as base and
depraved
as your own, so as to render me capable
of stooping to the infamy of signing such a
paper
!
No; no; do your pleasure. I will accept of
life on no such terms!
Then, by Heaven! I must get rid of you
as a rival in some way, and it would be folly to
lose the present opportunity! cried Harris,
as he presented one of the pistols at Edward's
breast, adding, Mutter a short prayer, for
you are on the verge of eternity!